I've always held the philosophy you are what you're entertained by. So, those who like Ludacris are definitely telling on themselves about their views of life and women. And speaking of women...Ludacris never met one who wasn't a h-o.Ludacris is the epitome of the sexual hypocrisy that plagues men: you demean and look down on women for being h-oes, yet you hope every woman is a h-o so you'll have no problems getting laid. But then, you're so disgusted with the fact the woman behaves too much like you, so you go and find a "nice girl" because you can respect her and marry her and procreate with her. But then you cheat on her with a "bad girl" because h-oes need h-oes; but then you can't respect the "bad girl" because she's a slut, so you go back to the "good girl." But she's not nasty enough for you, so then...around and around we go. Women are basically being punished for men not being able to make up their minds about what the heck they want from us.He's OBSESSED with sex and h-oes. It makes you wonder if he has hang-ups about it. Maybe Ludapis saw his mother selling herself in a backalley for a dollar and it scarred his outlook on women forever. I guess if she had actually RAISED him and shown him how to respect women-- ALL women--then he probably could have grown up to be a respectable guy instead of the prurient dummy he is.What's the music like? Well I'll give him 2 stars for mentioning TLC in What's Your Fantasy. That's it.Addendum: 7/27-07 Some may wonder why I'm "wasting' my time giving Ludacris negative reviews. Well, first of all, if only people who liked the product were the only ones to review it, everything on Amazon would have 5 stars, which would be an inaccurate sign of its quality.Secondly, I don't like Ludacris. I would give Ludacris more respect if I felt he gave my gender more respect; but he doesn't. My diatribe above shows what my problem with him is, and I feel that argument is valid. There's no way to critique Ludacris' music without critiquing his hypocrisy regarding women. Why should I like him when he seems to have nothing but contempt for us? I'm biased against him because he's biased against me. So he gets a bad rating out of s-p-i-t-e</review_text>
someone get this band a producer and put them in a decent studio, please.  the recording and mixing on this disc is flat-out atrocious.   download a few tracks and hear for yourself.'feburary' and '99 with an anchor' show promise.otherwise it's taking back sunday meets hawthorn heights meets fallout boy meets .... you get the picture</review_text>
Tihs Album is not all that good when it came out in still not good till this day. I like all his other albums better I don't Know why he decided to release this crap.But the only song I really Like is hip hip qurtables</review_text>
this industry is "goin down"u call this an album???  LO</review_text>
I'm sorry but the guy below me doesn't know music if he was slapped with a Gang starr cd. This mess is ridiculous. I wouldn't even want to hear this garbage in the klub let alone banging in my car. They are the modern day version of Young mc....here today gone tomorrow</review_text>
This is not what I expected from such a gifted artist as Jaheim, did he change producers? The music and the man with the voice didn't go together well for me.  This is one I will not be purchasing, it is a serious down grade from his previous two albums. Better luck next time, Jaheim I was truly disappointed.</review_text>
Ok, so the song playing when Brian goes and we see mia for the first time is a song called "Deep Enough (Urban remix)" by Live.  I have the other songs written down, including the one played between the two buildings, so I will find them and tell you.  If you all want only the songs that were actually in the movie, rent the dvd, and take about ten minutes to watch the credits and write down the song names and artists.  That's how I have only the songs that are in the movie</review_text>
There are 2 really good songs on here.  The first is "Untitled," which sounds like Gibbard was listening to a lot of Brian Wilson at the time he wrote it.  The percussion sounds like it could have been on pet sounds.  "Underwater" is a pretty good song...but the real jewel on the album is "Send Packing."  It really is a beautiful, well-written song.  The rest of the album sounds kind of thrown together and most of the songs would have been much better if they had been recorded with real instruments.  Basically, the novelty of the kid instrument thing wears off really quickly.  All in all, I wouldn't spend 10 bucks on it, but a couple tracks are pretty good</review_text>
This is not the music from the movie. This purchase was a Major dissapointment. You would do beter searching for the music credits for titles, then download the tracks form your music subscriber</review_text>
it is beyond me that a record label would put this out. it's so embarassing how bad he rips bright eyes from song structure, subject  the production and even the cover art looks just like fevers and mirrors.</review_text>
Get's one star in appreciation of the technicians who had to record the cd. What a mess! Never should have been made. Even Julie is way past the point of playing this onstage. She half talks her way through her songs, her voice clearly not what it was when she made the film. Sorry Julie, should have left it alone.The rest of the cast is not on a par with the film. Tony Roberts in place of Robert Preston...not on his best day. Leslie Ann Warren was riotuosly original in the film, Rachel York trying to copy her, is not. And Michael Nouri? Dismal.The songs added to the score for the stage.......forget it.Not even worth mentioning any more. Goes into the WHAT WERE THEY THINKING? file.As for Julie refusing her Tony nomination because the rest of the show was overlooked? C'mon Julie, there was a reason for that, the show SUCKED!</review_text>
Cheap Trick's second album is very disappointing to me afterthe good, but raw, "Live In The Studio", 1977-76 recordedCheap Trick. Almost all of the material here is so watereddown that it REALLY COMES OFF WAY BETTER on the later manyLive disks they did.After a good start w/ "Hello There", a concert favorite formany years, is the only thing here to write home about whenone considers how great all the tunes from this overproduced album sounded on the Budokan and other Live recordings later.Tom Werman and Rick Niesen were on a show in 1991 that I hadrecorded on a tape once and Werman, noce a friend of Tom Petersson's said, quote: "My three albums with Cheap Trickgot better and better...", to which the ever sarcastic RickNielsen said, "Selling, maybe." Not realizing that brotherRick was slamming him, Werman then continued, "Exactly"...Oh boy. We now see why producing Cheap Trick albums throughthe years has become like playing Russian Roulette. It's nothard to get better than this and five months later the solid,but somewhat oeverrated 'Heaven Tonight' came out...(And theguys EVEN bought Werman back for Dream Police. Things turnedout better when Pete Comita, then later Jon Brant joined theband. Yep - the best was yet to come - in the '80'</review_text>
After months of searching, I found the out of print cd here.  I had never heard it, but after hearing the fabulous song &quot;My Only&quot; from the &quot;Good as it gets&quot;  movie soundtrack, I had to hear the album.  What a disappointment!  Oh well, it would have been hard to make a cd as good as that song</review_text>
Listening to the Standards being sung by Rod Stewart is like listening to Classical Music being played on a kazoo! If you're new to this music, try out some Sinatra CD's. He's the guy who sets the standard when it comes to singing the Standards</review_text>
Completely worthless! If you liked the film, go buy the DVD because this album has no redeeming qualities.  The sound quality is fair at best, even for a live album.  Almost every track is jammed with totally worthless `commentary' at the beginning or end of the song.  The `commentary' consists of recordings of about a dozen people having random conversations over the phone and laughing for no reason.  It would have been nice if they had put these `commentaries' on different tracks because the way they have it on this CD you have to wait through about a minute and a half of this crap to get to the song you want to hear.  The worst part about the album is the lack of The Fugees, which means no `Killing Me Softly'.  Sadly, you can tell that most of the artists on this album haven't played a show or practiced in a long time as they are a bit rusty and sound horrible, even for a live recording.  Some of them sounded almost as bad as Fallout Boy on SNL</review_text>
"Maiden Voyage" appears on innumerable lists of jazz masterpieces, and it is clear from the first listen that both the composition and the playing are at a level of technical proficiency unmatched on most albums of this era or any time afterward. Nevertheless, the finished product is not one that all listeners will find appealing. To these ears, this album seems aimless and even somewhat annoying. The songs meander without clear structure and Tony Williams' drumming seems at times to be going in a direction opposite that of the rest of the band. The influence of this album is indisputable, but its enjoyability is a more subjective matter. If you enjoy groundbreaking, cerebral jazz such as the music made by Miles Davis' second quintet, then this album will probably work for you. If, on the other hand, you favor Hancock's earlier and more accessible albums "Takin' Off" and "My Point of View," this album may be a bit of a letdown</review_text>
How can he be such an enormous talent when all he does is copy off of other people? sorry i just cant see it. I dont think he does justice to Nolan Porter's "If I could only be sure" on the first track at all: If you want to hear some great music listen to the original!!!</review_text>
Might just be me--but this is one of those CD's that the song they play on the radio is the only decent one. Maybe I'm too old for the rest--but wish I had kept the crystal so I could sell it on Ebay</review_text>
I'm an avid tony yayo fan, but this album just didn't cut it. maybe its just trying to commercialize in the rap game and having pressure. i don't know. but i listened to most of his mixtapes and this album sounds nothing like them. Hopefully his next album will be way better. a few songs are good to listen to. I would think, coming out of prison you would have a lot to talk about, but "so seductive" being your first single?? come on. i am not a hater but just listen to the album and then listen to the gunit mixtapes and you will see what i mean.rating C</review_text>
I can't believe rubbish like this goes platinum. Rap today with a few exceptions is a joke. People like Chingy, Nelly, Ludacris, Ja Rule, Lil Jon and any other idiot with Lil in their name are ruining rap and making it look like a joke. What is really getting me angry is how so many people don't give any respect to real rap legends like Tupac and Biggie, and give tons of respect to all these clowns. People are thinking this is the sort of stuff rap fans listen to. All these people talk about is money, bling bling and sex. Rap used to be about the streets now its just all i've got so much money and stuff. If you want a real rap CD then get one of the following.NWA - Straight Outta ComptonIce Cube - Amerikka's Most WantedDr Dre - The ChronicSnoop Doggy Dogg - DoggystyleNas - IllmaticTha Dogg Pound - Dogg FoodTupac - Me Against The WorldTupac - All Eyez On meTupac - Greatest Hits50 Cent - Power Of The DollarBiggie - Life After DeathYou get the picture</review_text>
I love love tegan and sara and when I found out this was one of their favorite cds I have to admit....I think i was devastated. I just saw pretty girls make graves last night and they really could not have sounded worse.Not just not enjoyable...unbelieveably horrible. I think you should take your money and spend it on a cd that actually sounds like good music. Don't make your ears go through this much pain</review_text>
Before you get all worked up, let me say that he has a voice, but he really doesn't have a style.  he sings songs way too straight, he makes even Bobby Short sound like an improviser!  He also doesn't seem to be in touch with his masculine side, his vocie is very, well if ying is male, and yang is female, he sounds very yang.  He needs to take some liberties with the songs he sings and then he won't sound so obnoxious, then he needs to take some vocal lessons and try to bring out the ying(masculine side) in his voice.  He needs to hear a few Billy Eckstine lp's.  I don't think he can change but here's hoping he'll take my advice.  As far as you buying this cd it is your decision, this is just my honest opinion</review_text>
Many albums, including this one, have the problem that all the songs pretty much sound the same; but this also has the troublesome problem of music that is too easy on the ears and that never gets very exciting - except for the first two tracks.  The use of many poetry elements in their lyrics can't save the blandness of the music.  "What About Everything" and "Life Less Ordinary" are good songs.  The rest pretty much sound the same and will put you to sleep.</review_text>
Sounds like the background music used in the 70's Rockford Files TV crime show...and a little like the CHIPS music too. Similar to music by Tom Scott from back then. The crusaders never really get hard funky or dirty funky, they are more smooth groovin funk. The sound for the times is very clean, too produced for true funkyness. Don't get me wrong I like the old 60's JAZZ crusaders, just not this 70's phase of their career...they sold out to a large extent, and continue to do so, it's where the money is.  No improvisatory feel either. This is for smooth jazz lovers. hard funk lovers will be disappointed, as will true jazzers.  I wish the crusaders kept their jazz chops from the 60's but they keep burying it like it never happened, even to this day, afraid to lose sales if they get too musically adverturous like their mid/late 60's true jazz albums. Their 70's albums like this are partly to blame for today's smooth jazz... in other words, not really jazz, not really funky, just kind of smooth groovin, more for casual adults and offices. not challenging, not offensive, formulated to an extent. But hey if you like this, that's cool, just dont think it's real jazz, or real funk. It's smooth and casual, slightly simmers, pleasant background music, but doesn't COOK like so many other groups from the same time period that mixed jazz, funk, and fusion. It just sounds like they are holding back...I know they can play more advanced, and write more creatively, they just choose not to ever since the 60's</review_text>
Wow, did someone slip the wrong CD into my jewelbox or what?If you're a fan of Allison's other work, epect nothing like what you've heard before.  This is mostly a pop album, and the songs that could have been saved are ruined by the awful engineering.  The sound is way over compressed and artificial sounding.  Even Allisons voice has no drive to it.Steve Earl is no match on the guitar for Joe McMahan who played on the Show CD/DVD.</review_text>
I really really really really like Allison Moorer.  Have been a fan since her first record, have road-tripped to see her numerous times, and love her songwriting and singing.That said -- "Getting Somewhere" is by far the least satisfying of her records.  No memorable songs.  Over-produced.  No "guts", as another reviewer said.When the Allison Moorer/Doyle "Butch" Primm songwriting team called it quits (in more ways than one), their Lennon/McCartney-caliber teamwork was lost.  Not that Moorer sounds like The Beatles, but Allison and Butch complemented each other well when composing music.This CD is not only unmemorable but I doubt I would care to ever listen to it again.  Such a shame.  I've never had anything negative to say about Allison in the 8 years I've been a fan.  But this CD left me cold.It hurts a bit to say this, but I cannot recommend this CD.The closest analogy I can think of that relates to how different this CD is from her earlier work is the B-story line from an episode of "The Larry Sanders Show".  In that episode, Sanders' head writer Phil (played by Wallace Langham) finally got himself a girlfriend and was happy.  As a result he lost his edge.  When he was a miserable person he was an edgy, cynical, funny jokewriter.  When he was a happy person he stopped being the kind of funny that he needed to be to do his job.      Same with Moorer.  Since her recent changes in her social life she has started "singing a sweeter tune" in her life, but it came with a cost.  She doesn't seem to be the same songwriter anymore and it was that "other" songwriter who was so good -- a little edgy, sad, sometimes bitter, or at least that's how I interpreted it.  Granted, that wasn't her entire oeuvre, but it is what made her songs special for me.  Now she's happy and she might as well be writing songs for Barney the Dinosaur</review_text>
Now on their sixth studio album (and second on a major label) Carbon Leaf plays it safe with the inoffensive rock/pop of "Love, Loss, Hope, Repeat." Lead vocalist Barry Privett has a warm, pleasant way of delivering his lyrics, and renowned producer Peter Collins fulfills his duties. Nevertheless, the 11-song collection is most notable for its power of subtlety. In fact, it is so subtle that not one song is memorable.Some lyrics are heartfelt ("The War Was In Color" recounts a conversation between a grandfather and grandson, lead single "Learn to Fly" regretfully summons up inner strength) but with such flat, by-the-numbers melodies these songs have little to stand on. Everything sounds just fine, but nothing is endearing. Every guitar strum and drum beat can be predicted ten seconds prior to its appearance, and Privett, despite his appealing voice, could easily be singing one extremely long song.This project is obviously well-intentioned, but many other bands have done this before and better. These guys without a doubt have talent, but this album will soon be forgotten for good reason. Next time they will hopefully carve out a more unique sound than the one on this record.</review_text>
I was disappointed with the album as a whole.  When I heard the song "Drink to Me Babe, Then", I thought it was great and sounded like The Shins.  The rest of the album was boring lyrically</review_text>
Layla is one of the most overrated songs of all time. Cream is one of the most boring bands in history. Why not do yourself a favour and buy enjoyable bands like Dire Straits, and Metallicawho rock.PS.This Clapton compilation has no good songs so please don'tbuy it at all</review_text>
Having watched most, if not all of John Waters films i was sorely dissapointed by this Album, obviously his name was put to something he hadn't quite looked deeply enough in to. Talk about misleading. As we all know John Waters has a certain reputation for sleaze, trash, camp, kitch and bad taste in all the best possible terms, this album had none of this. Shame on you John Waters for putting your name to a complete load of rubbis</review_text>
I think India is one of the most talented artists today. Her voice is sensational. Sadly, as with many great artists today, this album feels more producer/market-driven rather than artist-driven. I understand that Regaetton is popular right now. I would even understand including a few Reggaeton-flavored songs to "keep up with the times" (Shakira's "La Tortura" comes to mind). But who mixes two genres within a single song?!? "Soy Differente" flows perfectly as a salsa, until Regaetton beats come in. The style feels very out-of-place in this song, as in most other songs in this album. Maybe this kind of thing will work at a club, but not for extended listening. In my opinion, the producers are making this album more marketable while stiffling India's own style. I hope she will regain contol by the next album</review_text>
Oh, this is pure adult garbage all right.I have never heard a more disguisting piece of music then this, then again the movie was garbage also</review_text>
I purchased a copy of this album after a suggestion from a friend.....a few hours later in ended up in the bin.....very dissapointing, bland and not to mention boring and derivative (some people from New York would understand what I mean).  In summary....not only does kylie mingogue (I wont grace her name with capitals) fall flat on cd....she also cannot perform live and rely's on "gay camp it up" imagery to hide behind (a very cheap and politically incorrect exploit).  A very bad performer and a shameful album.</review_text>
Mcmurtrys new album really disappoints.  I am a longtime fan and found the subject matter of the new album slipping out of character with James past work (as well as somewhat inappropriate and overly cynical).  While Mcmurtry has had past hits that either hearken back to childhood extravaganza (See the Elephant) or that provide an echo to the way we Americans spend our time (Holiday), his attempts on Childish things came across as an unfortunate mix of trite and depressing.  In past attempts Mcmurtry was able to find the nuances of the positive and the negative of Americana, yet all the remains in the stinging lyrics of this album is the over-used and overheard downside. The thoughtfulness evaporated on this work.Like many aging musicians, Mcmurtry could not resist the tempation to jump into personal politics to replace the vacuum of meaningful verse.  The cliche and empty "We Cant Make It Here" is a meaningless mix of 70s era socialism and the ills of modern era entitlement policies that displays an ignorance of both democracy and personal responsibility.  Mcmurtry, previously able to frame an issue, seems oblivious that those of different political persuasions could easily fit the same song title to a wholly opposed set of social ills.   Criticism is not intelligence, and we can only hope that Mcmurtry can get on track going forward.  Perhaps he should shun the  "PC Crowd" and seek his own space and more thoughtful views of the complex but substantial American Scene for his next album</review_text>
Is there anything more sanctimonious than filming your last concert and inviting a bunch of fellow overrated hacks (Clapton, Neil Diamond, Joni Mitchell) to the occasion, as if it's some monumental event? Please! As if the Band were anything worthwhile in the first place. Sorry, but the whole concept of a bunch of Canadians (well, four of five anyway) writing this stuff about Americana always came across to me as pretentious -- and it doesn't get much worse than that stupid shot of Levon Helm wheezing through "The Night They Drove Old Dixie Down."These guys were just the beneficiaries of Rolling Stone/elitist rock critic propaganda. (And to think they made fun of prog bands for writing inane lyrics -- huh!) I think Martin Newell put it best when he called the Band "dreadful bearded ghastliness."</review_text>
Michael Jackson is one of the most gifted songwriters/singers of our time. You can discuss his person, you can discuss his behaviour, and all the other stuff, but you can't really take that away from him. And that's exactly why this album is so unacceptable, coming from someone like him - when you've reached superstardom and gone beyond it, you don't release a record that's so horribly mixed up and full of second grade tracks that it's bound to be a faliure. At least, you should expect to hear for it. And hear for it he did, cause the critics didn't go lightly on this one. And it's not that bad, actually. I mean, that's what I have my program function in my CD-player for, and my CD-burner.The album starts on a fair streak - Unbreakable, Heartbreaker and Invincible - are all fair tracks - below average for MJ, sounds like a watered down selection of discarded tracks from Dangerous that were then discarded for HIStory and then discarded for Blood On The Dance Floor, and full of badly placed guest rappers to top it off - but apart from that, if you forget who made this music, these are actually good, funky dance tracks. For Michael Jackson they're passable, but nothing more. *SKIP*On to track 8 - Speechless - arguably the strongest moment on the record. One of only two tracks that Jackson actually penned himself, and it shows. The amount of emotion in his voice will knock you prone, and actually proves very well what the rest of the album lacks: Joy for the music, and personal emotion. The lyrics are like a poem, and one of the most beautiful love declarations in all their simplicity. Top grade to Jackson for this one track, and if you are into his music, buy the CD cheeply just to get this track.Track 9 - 2000 Watts - is another of the stronger moments of the record. This one is simply plain fun, and that's another important lesson Jackson should have lurned - to let go of the reigns, and stop caring whether it's hip or street or down with the trend - because it isn't - but this is darn good pop music, and nigh irresistable. *SKIP*On to track 13 - Cry - penned by R. Kelley. The same R. Kelley who is guilty of writing one of the most horrible songs of all times (I Believe I Can Fly, if you had doubts), but it seems that with Jackson, he can do no wrong. He wrote the endearing You Are Not Alone - major hit in Europe - and this track is possibly even better. Oh, forget about the sappy lyrics, and just enjoy the wonderfull music. This is pop writing in top class, and if Jackson sounds like he takes the Marthyr role a bit too seriously, it's still one of the best tracks on the record.Track 14 - The Lost Children - is the other song penned by Michael alone, and it's not a bad effort - had it not been for the children choir and sleezy intro, you could probably have ignored the lyrics and enjoyed a nice pop tune. As it is, it falls somewhat flat, and becomes completely choking in the end - but yes, it's a nice tune. Thumps up, mr. Jackson.Track 15 - Whatever Happens. Ok, that's one weird track. Michael Jackson featuring Santane. Wtf? Well, kudos for doing this, and it actually works, in a sort of absurd way. Not single potential, and not a classic, but it's not embarassing, and as an album filler, it's completely acceptable as a cureosity.Well, what about the rest of it then? Lead single You Rock My World was never my favorite - the spoken intro is downright embarassing - but the track is not bad. I can accept that on the record. The same is not true for the horrible ballads Break Of Dawn, Heaven Can Wait, Butterflies, You Are My Life and Don't Walk Away. One is worse than the next, and every time I just try to listen to them, I start chocking to the degree of loosing my last meal. Yes, it's that bad, no really, it's horrible. I. Can't. Stand. These. Songs. Period. There are simply no redeeming qualities for me.And then the two monstrosities - Privacy and Threatened - that just sound like a very - very - bad joke on the man himself. Tabloid Junkie from HIStory actually worked, because it packed a great punch, and well, had not been heart before. Well it had been, it was pretty much the same as Why You Wanna Trip On Me from Dangerous, but still. It worked. Ghosts was a good track of Blood On The Dance Floor. Forget about the movie that was - well, embarassing. But the music was good. These tracks aren't. They sound dated, repetitive, out of place and utterly boring and uninspired. Get over it Jackson, we don't want to hear more about the media nagging you, it's not going to make them go away.Well, all in all, what do we have ... To take the album from A to Z:Unbreakable - 6/10 - A fair dance track.Heartbreaker - 6/10 - same.Invincible - 6/10 - same.Break Of Dawn - 0/10 - Horrible R'n'B overproduced. Vomit.Heaven Can Wait - 0/10 - same.You Rock My World - 5/10 - well, at least it sounds new.Butterflies - 0/10 - more vomit.Speechless - 10/10 - the flower in the dirt. One true MJ song.2000 Watts - 8/10 - Very enjoyable, and stands out tall compared to the rest.You Are My Life - 0/10 - even more vomit.Privacy - 2/10 - Yawn. Repetitive and dated.Don't Walk Away - 0/10 - end of vomit.Cry - 9/10 - beautiful showmanship, Kelly + Jackson works - again.The Lost Children - 6/10 - well, it has potential.Whatever Happens - 7/10 - interesting, and well, refreshing, if somewhat strange.Threatened - 2/10 - same as Privacy, and exactly as boring.This yields and average about 3.6/10, or 2/5 stars, which actually matches my fealings for this album fairly well. Yes, I'm harsh, but from a man as gifted as Jackson, you just expect more. Quality control next time, please, mr. Jackson.On the bottom line: Outtakes The Way You Love Me and We've Had Enough showed up on the 2004 Ultimate collection and outranked 2/3 of this album by far. Go figure</review_text>
I felt like I was taking a piss on myself the whole time I listened to this album. What happened to the 40 water of the old days that used to rap with spice 1, 2pac, and mc breed? This clone of 40 raps with the likes of Lil jon (wack as hell), washed up 80 year old too short, and a bunch of losers I have never heard of. The album only gets props because eightball and mjg are on the album and ugk. And they almost played themselves by appearing on this god awful so called "album". E-40 has fallen into this commercial west coast version of crunk called "hyphy" in attempts to breathe life into his lifeless career. The album has some decent beats on it but there is no kind of lyrical content to be found anywhere. E-40 wouldn't know lyrical content if I slapped him with a Krs-One cd. This cd is wack simple and plain, Pee-40 is a beat waster, and he needs to find the nearest car wash and start drying off cars!!</review_text>
If any kid music annoys you, this CD is NOT for you.  These are good old classic songs, but almost ruined with strange styles and irrelevant talking to intro the songs.  I'm throwing it away.  I want my two-year-old to know the songs I know and love, but this was a bad buy on my part.</review_text>
I loved '' careless love`` and saw Madeleine live here in Rio de Janeiro in a reasonably good show.I am quite disappointed with this album however because I had great expectations.Let's face it folks, however smoky and billiesque her voice is she is never going to have the power and the range of the original.She needs to be really close miked and well recorded to get that voice to sound right.This is obvious from seeing her live.So what were those marketing executives thinking by promoting a cd full of soft and slow ballad covers that are obviously going to turn a huge spotlight  on her  vocal delivery? Those songs need an Ella,a Sarah Vaughn,or even a Shirley Horn -to name some  giants- to have a chance of pulling it off with their huge range, timing and phrasing.To compound the problem , the recording engineers/producers did not do a great job on her voice or the rest of the band for that matter.Everything is much too soft and distant (unlike careless love).If you want an atmospheric but still powerful sound you must produce something like the last Shirley Horn cds.Last but not least the rest of the good band are not allowed to play anything remotely interesting but are relegated to  very minimalist backing chores.I think there is a misconception with the record excecs that M.P. has the qualities to make her a modern  pop-jazz diva ala Diana Krall.She has to find her real voice and the correct material to match.Good luck.</review_text>
Having listened to Steven's previous albums, Greetings from Michigan and Seven Swans countless times, I cannot help but to notice the amount of regurgitation on this album.  Stevens blatantly rips off his own music.  I consider Michigan to be Sufjan's masterpiece.  Do yourself a favor and start there</review_text>
I wanted to like BROTHERHOOD, for the simple reason that nearly every New Order fan this side of the galaxy has dismissed it, usually with a faint whiff of snobbery (or at least apathy). Turns out they were right: BROTHERHOOD is half an album. Most of its nine songs feel unfinished, as if the band wanted to cash in on the success of their 1985 smash LOW-LIFE and didn't care about the end result. BROTHERHOOD is a rush job, plain and simple, but there are still glimmers of hope within this bare-bones effort."As It Is When It Was" overcomes the album's overall muddy production by dint of being mostly acoustic, and the melody is quite lovely. "All Day Long", the emotional centerpiece of the album by default, is an intelligent (if half-hearted) protest against child abuse. While "Angel Dust" lacks a decent hook, its subtly danceable beat and effective synth noodlings will at least briefly hold your interest. And the toss-off "Every Little Counts" has a charming sense of humor that is too often lacking in New Order's work.The most popular song on BROTHERHOOD is, of course, "Bizarre Love Triangle". So good it seems to belong to a different album entirely, "Bizarre Love Triangle" is truly New Order's masterpiece. The solid beat, slick sequencer work, and gorgeous melody showcase the band at their best: catchy, danceable, and downright euphoric. (Imagine how well it would have fit on LOW-LIFE.)Sadly, the rest of BROTHERHOOD is unremarkable. The album's production neatly mixes rock with electronic flourishes, which has become New Order's signature sound, but the songwriting doesn't measure up. Buy the album if you're a trainspotter, but casual New Order fans would be better off picking up LOW-LIFE or 1983's POWER, CORRUPTION AND LIES. This one is just a footnote.</review_text>
Why is Dylan taking sole credit on an album featuring a fair percentage of other peoples song writing ?Shame on you Bob</review_text>
Man, can she get anymore stupid and talentless. She needs to spend some of that undeserved bling bling on some singing lessons than her skimpy outfits. All the songs on this album are totally unlistenable! She completely lacks power, vocal range and versatility. Jennifer Lopez represents everything that is wrong with music today. She gets a recording contract because her good looks and success with her acting career. Just because your a great actor/actress doesn't necessarily mean you can sing, too. Some actors/actresses were able to achieve it, but not Jennifer Lopez. She needs to quit the music business while she still can. Please stick to acting...OH, WAIT! I forgot, she can't do that either!</review_text>
I first became a fan of the Gorillaz with their excellent 2nd CD, Demon Days. The interesting thing about this band is that their music is so strange and so "out there" that when you first hear one of their CD's...it sounds like complete garbage. But once you listen again and again, you start to like it more and more. Eventually you end up really liking the CD.That was the case with Demon Days. After enjoying that CD fully, I thought I should check out the first Gorillaz CD, and  I didn't like it all that much.There just seems to be very little actual songs on the CD. Way too much of it sounds like complete filler. There were a couple throwaway songs on Demon Days, but most of the stuff on that CD was great. Here, we've got songs that are just...boring. Nothing happens. I was waiting for the melody or a cool tune to occur in some of these songs, but it never happens. You just listen to 2-D whining into the microphone with dull beats in the background. (Such as on songs like New Genious, Man Research, and Starshine.) Some songs are nothing but beats with no lyrics at all, sometimes sounding just like static noise. Songs like this, such as Double Bass, are cool for a minute or two, but the song drags on for practically 5 minutes. It gets boring. Other songs, like 5/4, M1 A1, and Rock the House are catchy at first, but just don't have staying power. They get old. 5/4 got annoying quickly, M1 A1 and Punk lost their appeal quickly, and Rock the House is another song that would have been better if they cut about 2 minutes out of it. And songs like Latin Simone are just annoying.The remixes of 19-2000 and Clint Eastwood that end the CD are also fairly forgettable, although 19-2000's kind of catchy on the first couple listens.There are some good songs here, though. Tomorrow Comes Today, Clint Eastwood, Gravity, 19-2000, and Left Hand Suzuki Method are cool songs. Slow Country's kind of cool, too. And Dracula's got an awesome, almost haunting sound to it, and it's really absorbing. Although it too, unfortuantely, loses its tune and turns to repetitive and aimless techno noise about half way through it. This small collection of good songs, though, is surrounded by a huge collection of filler tracks. Much of this CD just isn't really that good.I don't know...this CD just seemed empty. Very few meaningful tracks, lots of filler, and some really annoying and repetitive songs. Some good songs were stretched to almost 5-minutes long, mostly given filler techno beats that ruin the songs. Clocking in at 72 minutes, (which makes it 22 minutes(!)longer than Demon Days) this CD was loaded with filler and just not enough good stuff. People interested in The Gorillaz should pick up their superior follow-up, Demon Days, instead of this one. If I listened to this debut CD first, I probably wouldn't have ended up liking this band very much. The good news about this is that the Gorillaz have not hit a sophmore slump; their CDs are getting better, not worse. That is a great sign for the future of this awesome band.</review_text>
Ok, booty rap was good in the 90's, when it was offensive and raunchy like, 2 live crew, Disco Rick and The Dogs, Poison clan etc.....But this is just wack weak lyrics, corny typical krunk beats that start all sounding the same....And is it just me are these guys as rappers, just horrible there voices all raspy, and annoying and one the guy's from the groups always does that annoying shout thing in interviews like hahhhhherrrrrr.....( what is he on crack or something)So if you like radio friendly, pretty boy music then the Ying Yang twins are for you peace...</review_text>
I LUV FALL OUT BOY!!!!!!!!!AWL SONGS GET 10 OUTTA 10!!!!!!DESERVS ALL 6 STARSS!!!</review_text>
I don't understand the previous reviews - I found this recording positively dreadful, with Ruthie Henshall being the only one worth listening to. John Sinclair is abominable as George - he sounds like he's doing a (bad) imitation of Michael Crawford in &quot;Hello, Dolly.&quot; He does strange things to his words - I guess he's trying not to sound British, but why is he singing &quot;Summ-ar weath-ar&quot; instead of &quot;summer weather&quot;?    The Ilona is a bass - almost literally. &quot;I Resolve&quot; has been lowered for her, and yet she still cannot master the range of the song. To accomodate her, the second part of &quot;I Don't Know His Name&quot; has a truly odd key change. Were she remotely talented I could understand key changes to facilitate her singing, but she's not worth it.    The orchestrations are odd, too, with strange sleigh bell sounds appearing frequently. The rest of the singers range from fair (Kodaly - a pretty voice but not much expression) to bad (Mr. Maraczek drags down EVERY SINGLE NOTE of &quot;Days Gone By.&quot; Luckily this is his only song.)    The Broadway revival, to my ear, still has the best voices, except, of course, that Barbara Cook (the original) outshines Diane Fratantoni, who is merely good (but who was a vast improvement over the Roundabout's original Amalia, the annoying Judy Kuhn.)     Get the original or revival recordings instead - this London version I would recommend only to die-hard SHE LOVES ME fans, or masochists. I'd rather sit through another terrible viewing of &quot;You've Got Mail&quot; than listen to this again</review_text>
After reading her excellent Halloween book, I figured her Halloween CD would be worth owning. I always search for "different" Halloween CDs, but this was filled with the same old stuff.Chains, moans, and spooky laughs... then more chains, moans and spooky laughs. Very dissapointing</review_text>
Neither the Amazon review or any of the customer reviews recently submitted mention this fact. I have few classical and pop recordings in mono that do not impact the listening experience such as 'Songs for Swinging Lovers' - Frank Sinatra or Beethoven's Opera Fidelio - conductor Otto Klemperer (Testament Label). The material on these recordings are so good that the listener completely ignores the fact that they are mono recordings. I did not hear anything outstanding on this CD to make me overlook the 'mono' factor.Is this some great jazz masterpiece, recorded live in Carnegie Hall by two giants of Jazz? I personally don't think so. Somehow this material remained in obscurity for all this time and somebody by accident discovered this gem - if you believe that then Elvis is alive and the earth is exactly 6000 years old.With small jazz bands, I like to listen to the musicians communicate with each other within the context of a thesis.Examples: 'Sunday at the Village Vanguard - Bill Evans Trio' or 'New York Reunion - McCoy Tyner Quartet'. I wanted to but could not hear anything of this sort in this recording. This material is more likely to be understood only by the performers themselves and the real jazz aficionados. It may have been hasty but after one listen I decided to sell this CD and I have no regrets other than buying it in the first place.</review_text>
I don't want to hear any more of their music on the radio. It is all just nonsense, and none of it should have ever been made. They are one of the worst hip hop acts in recent memory</review_text>
The main problem I have with this CD is that it seems poorly mixed. There is no sonic depth to it - all the sounds are flat and hard to distinguish from each other</review_text>
Man, have I given this guy a chance.  Multiple chances.  Listened to the CDs, saw the big HBO special.  I mean, his career is red hot now.  He clearly has lots of fans.  Mostly college age (perhaps this should be a warning to some of you).  All I can say is "maybe they'll grow out of it."  He is NOT funny.  His act has no bite, no point of view, no opinion/viewpoint at all.  His comedy consists of spewing observations his audience can relate to (the "this is all happened to us" or "has this ever happened to you?" school of humor).  He runs about manically, acting out every little word that comes out of his mouth (for those in the audience that may not be so good with words).  His fans acknowledge that, yes, they can relate.  "Yeah!  That's happened to me!"  "I know that reference!'  They laugh, cheer, clap, and plunk down their hard-earned dollars for his vanilla wit.  He never actually COMMENTS on the things he discusses in any intelligent, interesting way.  He has no edge.  He's not outraged by anything.  He's cute 'n' cuddly.  Richard Pryor must be rolling in his grave at the very fact that Cook is classified as a stand up comic.  "Pryor?  The guy writing this must be OLD!'  Okay, try this on for size:  Chris Rock is good comedy.  Same with Dave Chappelle.  Carlin.  Laura Kightlinger.  Kinison.  Rodney Dangerfield.  Bob Saget.  Gilbert Gottfried.  Dom Irrera.  Lewis Black.  Robert Klein.  The late Mitch Hedberg.  Jim Norton.  Patton Oswalt.  Brian Posehn.  DeGeneres.  Jon Stewart.  Bob & David.  The UCB.  I'm not even a big fan of Sarah Silverman, but at least she's trying to bring something different to the party.  Anything but this!  God help us.  Let's hope he goes the way of Carrot Top and Dice soon (don't forget, Cook fans, Mr. Top and Mr. Clay were once as popular as your boy here)</review_text>
When I think of the sex pistols, I think the Monkeys did it better as a boy band. Let's face it, dears, that is all the sex pistols were: a marketing ploy. They are f-----g NSync for another generation</review_text>
This one is for you.  But honestly now, the guy doesn't write--beautiful voice--but songwriting is a major appeal.  So  guess a solo garfunkel is a lot like a step above Justin Timberlake.  Ok, there are definitely highlihgts like a Heart in Newyork, (what a) wonderful world, but generally this a very casual compilation, good for a couple listens.  in general, Art Garfunkel isn't really good for more than that.  Check out him witht Paul Simon, that is amazing stuff, but this is kinda boring.  I might have a bit more respect if he wrote the songs--but even though there are good songwriters writing for him, the songs are still sub-par</review_text>
Bought this CD based upon the reviews and the fact that they were recommended with some other albums I like, and man, what a mistake. This CD borders on unlistenable, with no discernable melody/talent to be found. I'm hardly some ignorant pop-music lover...I consider "Blueberry Boat" to be one of my favorite records - but this is just horrible</review_text>
This is not necessarily an indictment of Aimee Mann or holiday music....though I do find such disks as being cheesey. I was a bit surprised when I heard Mann was coming out w/a holiday album.  It seemed a bit above someone who has based a career on not only  original material, but non-mainstream music.It has also always surprised me that at the plethora of holiday disks that are out there and how many more come out each year.  Is it just me - or are there only 18 holiday songs in existance to begin with?  There is only so many different ways to cover "I'll Be Home for Christmas", "Winter Wonderland" - all of which I believe are covered by James Taylor, Sarah McLachlan and Better Midler, all of which were released this month.  I'm guessing they are cheap to produce and easy to pull in profits.That being said - I still like Mann's voice and she comes through with 3-4 songs that are above the fray.  "Whatever Happened to Christmas", "Christmastime" and her original "Calling on Mary".  I also liked the fact that she covered "You're a Mean One, Mr. Grinch".  That seems to suit her more.Not my cup of tea - but the songs I mentioned are the reason the disk gets 2 stars</review_text>
This CD is awesome from beginning to end.  I really enjoy listening to this type of music.  This CD is a must have.</review_text>
Great cd. Imus in the morning recommended highly and the I-man was not wrong. One of the best cd's I've owned in years. I listen to a lot of Buffett, James Taylor, Delbert McClinton, and this cd places high in these ranks</review_text>
This collection of 15 great hits of Nicola Di Bari in spanish is missing one of his most (if not the most) important and popular song: &quot;Lisa de los ojos azules&quot;. I wouldn't buy this CD without that song</review_text>
I have not heard of or listened to, this cd series, but from the sound of it, its all bad interpretations of popular music.  I just want to say that if you want your kids to listen to music and you want to steer clear of the bad stuff... play classical music.  Play stuff without lyrics.  Play a show on tv where the characters sing.  Do anything but, buy a cd where people that aren't the original artists sing songs that were never intended to be for kids in the first place.  Censoring a song or cutting lyrics tends to ruin that song.  There are just some songs that aren't good for kids even if you cut out all the bad words.  Think about this... do you really want your kids coming up to you later in their life after hearing the real version of a song and asking you why the song they heard as a kid is so different from the one they just heard on the radio and then having to explain to them that the song they heard as a kid was a clean version of the song?  Listen... I'm all for trying to keep your kids away from inappropriate stuff for as long as possible, but cds like this are not the way to go.  All they do is make kids think that all music is going to sound just like the music on the cds and when they finally hear the real stuff, they're gonna be asking questions.  Do them and yourself a favor and don't buy these cds</review_text>
This album is the worst DCFC album, why......... Ill tell you why its boring, its repetitive, its way to mellow and im all for mellow but this is ridculous. I mean this is the type of mellow that puts people to sleep, especially the last track. OH MY GOD!!! THAT SONG IS SOOOOO BORING, its called Stability and it will put you to sleep. I am a fan of DFCF and i loved their other albums WE HAVE THE FACTS, PLANS, etc..... but honestly this album did not click with me. i tried listing to the songs again to see if i would probably grow accustome to it, but no that didnt work. Sure this album has its moments, but trust me when i say your not missing out on anything. I would not buy the album, instead buy the 2 stand out songs off itunes or napster; A MOVIE SCRIPT ENDING and WE LAUGH INDOORS. The only 2 stand out tracks</review_text>
The CD is great!!! The legendary Johnny Cash comes thru loud and clear on this CD. However, it took Amazon over 30 days to deliver this item and that was only after numerous emails to them. Their attitude of "just wait a few more days and email us again" was both insulting and annoying. Thank goodness this wasn't a Christmas gift for someone.</review_text>
I bought this cd after hearing Tony on one of the am morning shows, and really likings some of his past offerings, but I have to say that this cd was the pits and a waste of my money.  I was ticked off to have bought this cd from a talented brother and not have gotten my money's worth.  Tony has been on the scene for quite a number of years, and I expected a more mature offering from him than this latest.  There is a great lack of maturity on this cd, and it's an overall disappointment.  Unfortunately, I have to say here that Toney is not alone.  What on earth possessed veteran soul singers the O'Jays to sing a song like Let's Ride?  Who are they singing about girls their granddaughters ages?  Hoochie mommas?  What?  Babyface?  Even he gets in on the foolishness of trying to sing like the hip hop crowd!  And what's up with the explicit lyrics?  We all know you can curse like sailors, but why is this language necessary in music?  And I know that artist have always performed their music, but will someone tell me why it's necessary to perform with so few clothes on?  I would rather hear your music, not see your booty! Sorry, but a review I just read triggered me, and I'd been thinking about the Tony Terry cd for a while.  Hope he comes up with a more mature offering the next time.  Meanwhile I think you're safe in skipping this particular cd</review_text>
As if the song for mesmerize was'nt bad enough. A F***'IN GREASE VIDEO???!!!! Ja officially became a diva with this album. This album is horrible. The pledge had some life due to Nas appearance, thats why it's hard for me to request a zero star rating. Bottomline if Ja's body was made up of his albums, this part would gangrene, maggots would avoid this and you should too</review_text>
I love to hear old standards and such.  But I like to hear people who put their own take on it.   I can't stand to hear cheesy big band arrangements with some Frank Sinatra wannabe.  Where are the male versions of Nora Jones?   Tone down the cheese!  We need more people like sophisticated Shirley Horn and Betty Carter(NOT hams like Buble, Dusk, or boring singers like Diana Krall.  But what can I expect from the music industry?  Rarely do the best song-stylists get lots of attention.  So, hmmm, nevermind.  I guess it's always been that way</review_text>
Um. I have nothing against bands that are "mainstream". That has nothing to do with their quality of sound. (granted, many mainstream bands are horrible, but they all deserve a chance, no?) Dave, though, he has never impressed me. Not that he's awful, I suppose it's okay background music...better than nothing. Just oh so mediocre.I don't understand why is he so highly praised? Voice-wise? Eh. Nothing special. Lyrics? Hah! Music? umm... bland? it's all the same! Maybe I'm missing something?If you like one of Dave's songs, then by all means, buy this! You can be sure your money will be spent on nearly exact replicas of that song.Two stars because it's at least music. But that's on the high side, considering how static it is. Dave will never find a place in my cd player or in my computer.</review_text>
Jeff Buckley sounds like what Marc Bolan would have sounded like if Bolan had taken Perry Como as his musical muse.  Seriously, think about Marc Bolan trying to sound like a '50's crooner and you'll know what Jeff Buckley sounds like</review_text>
Based on other reviews here and comparisons to Jellyfish, Jason Falkner and the Beatles, I was expecting a lot better.  Instead I find this work very shrill and hard to listen to.  Is the guy talented musically?  Yes.  But his voice is mediocre and his songs really don't do it for me.  Sorry but I feel the need to give an honest assessment so others won't be mislead by the breathless reviews here.  I am a big fan of power pop and all good music but this does not rank with the best of that genre</review_text>
There's a review here that compares Hank III with Hank, and then suggests that Hank III adds to the legend with his clever lyrics.  I think that person has never listened to Hank's stuff.  It's hard to compete with, "You wore out a brand new trunk, packin' and unpackin' all of your junk."  That's my favorite Hank lyric, and there are many, many more--very, very clever, very hard to compete with.  That said, I love III.  He has a hard way to go, and apparently he's going it.  I can't even imagine the dichotomy he faces--looking and sounding like Hank, and I'm sure he loves that, yet wanting to do his own stuff.  I bought his first CD as soon as I knew about it, and I've been waiting for this one.  On the first one I was disappointed with his writing (but he's a kid, for pete's sake) and was knocked out by Wayne Hancock.  On the other hand--I didn't know III existed until I saw him on Conan O'Brian, and he was one of those performers who makes your head whip around and hit the "record" button so you can find out who he is.  I've listened to everything on Lovesick Broke & Driftin' and I love it.  Except for Atlantic City--once you've heard The Band do that, you don't need anything else.  Hank III, however, is on his way, and I'm rooting for him.  He's got the stuff.  (And, by the way, to echo the sentiments of others on this board, I don't listen to country anymore, at all!  It's way too pop-commercial-boring-who cares!)  I haven't listened to a country station for more than 10 years.  Go, III.</review_text>
I was never much of a Chili Peppers fan over the years, but I thought I'd give them a chance and listen to this disc.And just as I always thought, it's crap. Very few bands have been able to pull off the repulsive people/repulsive music combo as thoroughly as these guys have. I feel like I need a bath after just looking at their picture. As far as the "music" is concerned, the singing is awful(deadpan monotone voice), the instrumentation is very limited, and the overall production is 2nd rate. The ONLY plus, if any, is that the band manages to show some progression on the newer material, which is still not very good. The fact that this band has been successful over the years just proves that a lot of people have REALLY bad taste.</review_text>
As much as it pains me to say it this live cd is not a worthy billy joel release. In fact one wonders why it was released at all. Billy's voice is strained and is prone to over singing and the arrangements are overblown. From the sound of things Billy sounds like he was drunk or on medication. A lot of the running time is waisted with lengthy monologues with the audience. Why this was put on the CD is anyones guess but it just neans less songs!However the good news is that this CD has now been blown away by his superb new 12 Gardens CD in which Billy is the Billy of old. The one who sung well and sung the songs straight as they were meant to be sung. 12 Gardens is crammed with 32 songs rather than the 26 on offer here and there's no timewaisting audience chat!!</review_text>
I am very disappointed in this CD.  Not because the music isn't good, because it is.  But because it is just not the Pat Green that used to play in Stillwater.  The passionate, soulful Pat Green.  Back then he sang about things that he believed in and loved.  Now he is singing what Nashville tells him to.  And this coming from the guy who sang "Nashville Sucks" with Cory Morrow.  There are a ton of country singers out there that could have released this CD and it would have sounded exactly the same.  But songs like "Southbound 35" and "Three Day" can only be sang by Pat Green.  He needs to revisit his roots and come back to the red dirt country music that he was born to play.  Will the real Pat Green please stand up</review_text>
I bought this album because I loved the title song.  It's such a great song, how bad can the rest of the album be, right?  Well, the rest of the songs are just filler and aren't worth the money I paid for this. It's either shameless bubblegum or oversentimentalized depressing tripe. Kenny Chesney is a popular artist and as a result he is in the cookie cutter category of the Nashville music scene.  He's gotta pump out the albums so the record company can keep lining their pockets while the suckers out there keep buying this garbage to perpetuate more garbage coming out of that town.  I'll get down off my soapbox now.  But country music really needs to get back to it's roots and stop this pop nonsense.  What country music really is and what it is considered to be by mainstream are two different things.</review_text>
This was not as good as I had hoped and half of it is too slow to listen to while I am working out but the rest is good.</review_text>
I was disappointed by Ms. Jackson.  Though it's not such a big loss b/c i didn't pay much for it.  None of the songs "jumped" out at me.  Thank god i didn't waste time putting this on my ipod why upset it</review_text>
now, if we're being completely honest and true to the stats this album is killing the charts, but maybe just because people are lowering their standards. Besides, the fact that I dont like this girl because she is just too rough around the edges, this CD is no "Dangerously in Love". Where Beyonce's sultry vocals and powerhouse notes highlight her entire album, Cole's raspy voice and sometime-y pitch concern me.Aside from the obvious car banger  "I Just Want It to Be Over" and the wildly popular "Love"(which Cole butchers when singing live by the way),nothing here surprises me.  Like I said , you can call me a hater, but with women like Beyonce and Fantasia around Cole's fire will probably be put out soon</review_text>
I can't fathom why anyone would enjoy this album. The lyrics must have come out of a Dadaist poetry circle, and (most of) the guitar work is completely without personality.What is the criterion of a good rock album? By any standards it must be a joy to play it. 6teen Stone misses the mark by such dimensions one must assume it was intentional. But it doesn't so much incite anger than it does disdain for Bush's attempts to emulate Nirvana. Where Nirvana has clearly enunciated guitar riffs and minimalist, evocative lyrics, Bush has dull, throbbing guitar drones that project nothing to the listener but a kind of malaise-inspired anger.There's not much more to say about 6teen Stone. I could tell you about the embarrassment of listening to the lyrics on songs like "Swim": Thinning ice / 14 Hairdryers / Swimming to you / Flame on earth desire." Or the artistic suicide of the last track, "X-Girlfriend", a song composed of a little guitar-wailing and a non-stop chorus that's about six words long.That's about all I can tell you. Mostly I figure I've done enough warning to let you make your own choice. If you do attempt this though, you ought to be told the little good news that there is: there are about 5 minutes of good music are contained on the album, split between "Machinehead" and "Glycerine." The first is an energetic, well-constructed song about control (you might have seen the music video for it about 11 years ago on Total Request Live), the second a serenade featuring over-dubbed guitars, a trembling cello, and a surprisingly coherent Rossdale. They hold the album; about as well as a couple of floor joists can hold a crumbling building.</review_text>
know here is man with absoultely no lyrical skillsbaby dont get with a wanksta  good girl wants a gangstawhat about girls just want normal people no way can anybody like slim thugeverybody likes a pimp onli weird and freakish people doSLIM THUG ISNT A THUG IF HE WAS HE WOULD BE IN JAIL STUDO GANGSTA GANGST</review_text>
I basically love anything Mr. Carter does, but this one has alot of great lyrics (as usual).  I'm so glad he's coming out of retirement.  Any fan of Jay-Z will enjoy this cd</review_text>
I had never heard Leonard Cohen's music but saw references to it frequently when looking at other singers/songwriters.  Given his status/reputation I thought I should get this CD and learn what all the fuss was about.Having had no preconceptions, I have to say I was quite disappointed.  I think the music has not aged well and is pretty unremarkable.  Perhaps the style liberated others to pursue new directions but the work in and of itself is ho hum at best.  Specific example that speaks volumes:  listen to Cohen's singing of his "Hallelujah" and then listen to Jeff Buckley's cover of that song on "Grace" which was recorded in 1994.  Sorry, Leonard, you cannot hold even a birthday-sized candle to Jeff Buckley's rendition of your own song.  It is a very unflattering comparison that pretty much put the first and last nail in the coffin for my appreciation of Cohen's legacy.  "Tant pis, vers le bonheur.</review_text>
I've listened to this piece of work several times, in many positions, on various stero systems, during different moods and I just can't understand the lyrics half the time and the arrangements were best described as 'a wall of mud'.It isn't a question of country music, or contemporary music, with ELH she has demonstrated throughout the years she just loves, and respects, GOOD MUSIC.  The music is good, the woman has impeccable taste but this time I had wished she sat in on the mixing process.I think I understand the aim of this collection but geez, I wish I didn't.  I am too accustomed to hearing ELH's clear voice slice to the heart of the lyrics, take them and present them with a totally unique perspective.  I won't start on her own playing because this review would be nothing but gushing about her near-total mastery of her craft.She's an amazing woman, artist and collaborator -- I love her because she is everywhere in music: supporting new artists, doing background for others, her duets are gems of generosity with respect for her fellow artists, while always doing what's best for the song.  I just hope there's no follow up to WB.I'm very happy with my other 8 ELH cds and I'm in awe of 'All Roads Running' and my [...]is going to be front center next week in Los Angeles.  It's like waiting for Xmas</review_text>
Chingy is perhaps the most generic rapper in the world, he is a wack lyricist and all he ever talks about is gettin pu*sy.  Along with several other wack commercial rappers of recent years he tarnishes the name of hip hop, and because of retards like this non hip hop listeners dismiss the genre as cr*p and talentless (which is not true).  Jackpot went multi platinum, which speaks volumes about the number of idiots who will buy anything with a tight beat.  In fact the beats aren't all that bad, if this was an instrumental this would actually get a higher rating as I would not have to listen to his irritating voice.  If you heard Right Thurr in a club and thought it was tight (like I did), you are wrong, Chingy did not produce this album so he deserves no credit for the beats.  His lyrics are absolute garbage, what is sad is that a loser like this can get decent production, and some top lyricists have to work with nothing.Compared to this album, his follow up Powerballin bombed and with any luck it will be the last we ever hear from this loser.  Find him working at a McDonalds near you soon!!</review_text>
It would be impossible for me to write you a review.  I never received the subject CD.  You sent me some piece of crap dics which I sent back.  I have not received the Gene Watson CD i ordered and paid for.  If I don't get it soon, you will never hear from me again.  Edward N Clark - Herrin, I</review_text>
No need to say more, these f@gs are just making lousy punk pop for the teenage girls and mtv watching kids who think they're quite rebel with listening to this kind of sheit, and these suckers do it just for the money like green day or blink 182. There just have to be some stuff like this to fill all the pop and mtv charts</review_text>
I used to like good charlotte, enough that i bought this CD, but i really don't like them at all anymore.  They try to look all punk, but they are pop.  They whine a lot.  I think it's time to get over the fact that their dad left and they were uncool.  they should at least stop doing songs about it.  They have some ok melodies and words, but for the most part all their songs sound the same.  Good Charlottes first two CD's were almost good, but this one is bad and really whiny</review_text>
This album is lame as hell but next to the air pollution on the airwaves today, this aint too bad thats why it gets a 2. Right before female rappers(there's a few exceptions), I hate all little kid rappers. Even when I was a kid. I don't like anything on this album, I still got the tape and it hasn't "krossed" my mind to even cop the cd. If you like this kind of stuff, or you loved "jump" back in the day then I guess this is for you</review_text>
There used to be a time when rap was not synonymous with the likes of Hillary Duff. No longer is that true, if you call this rap. Puff wasn't that good to begin with, and I never owned any of his cds but I knew of him...anyway, by the time I heard he changed his name to PDiddy, I about laughed until I pissed myself.(...</review_text>
This soundtrack was `heart-brokenly' disappointing to me mainly because it lacks a few songs that were in the film.  I bought this soundtrack for one specific song (and it would've been worth every penny if only it was included): the song near the end when Alexander marches through the desert to return home to Babylon after his recovery.  Such a disappointment that wasn't included.In the other hand, I'm satisfied with some of the tracks that were included.  I particularly liked "Roxane's Veil" even though I don't recall hearing it in the film.</review_text>
This album made me realize that darn record company produces, for examle, two regular albums; two best albums; two tribute albums; and finally two mixture of everything under a sounds-like-new-but-actually-an-old albums  from a musician. This is an example of the mixture of previously released,  re-released, at last, over-released best tracks with a sounds-like-regular  album title.  Let me tell you one thing. JP is dead and gone since Rob left  the band. I doubt there will be more regular JP albums but you'll have  plenty of compilations like this coming out until you stop buying</review_text>
AFI used to be a pretty good band. Then, they decided to go emo-girlie-boy. The lead singer has made adramatic change from smelly-goth-dude to perfect-manicured-emo-girl/guy. What happened to smeely-goth-dude? Some of us actually like the music, not the "emoness". Not only that, but "Miss Murder" was waaaaay overplayed, and now it is encrested into my brain. I mean, come on, it's not even that good of a song.AFI is looking to appeal to the mainstream. There's nothing wrong with that, if you keep your old sound, which this band has failed to do. This, my friends, is AFI's worst album, if not hte worst album of 2006.Check out the older AFI stuff. "Sing The Sorrow" is okay, but if you want truley good music, you have to go back into their ninties albums</review_text>
Despite all the rave reviews I'm wondering if this is a dreaded rerecord. Maybe I'm paranoid, but the country music industry is so sleazy. And some stars feel entitled to cash in. How else can you explain the John Anderson Anthology...Horror.  (John, how could you?) Or the Bill Anderson Oh Boy Classic [Oh boy here comes a rerecord). Hey, the CD sounds great. But what makes me suspiscious is that there are no copyright dates anywhere on this CD except for one. Also the cryptic message on the inside sleeve.  Could someone please clear this up. And not some RCR Bud Logan shill either. John Conlee is one of my hero's and this is really worrying me. I can't look at this CD with Rose Colered Glasses anymore</review_text>
This music is a rip off. All is borrowed to the 4 first albums of Marc Bolan playing under the name of Tyranosaurus Rex. Something more bluesy here and there but nothing allowing to give any credit to this guy.A shame</review_text>
I bought this album after hearing America, their single off this album, and listening to the increasing hype about Razorlight and Johnny Borrell being one of the most talented singer-songwriters of his generation. This follow up is a thorough disappointment compared to their first. It's not bad, but it's not that good either. The songs all sound like I've heard them somewhere before, and the lyrics - well, how many times have we heard popstars going on about waiting by the phone, nothing on the radio, and not known what it all meant, while smoking cigarettes late at night. Yawn...</review_text>
The Kidz Bop series is the ultimate travesty in music. And don't think that it's good just because your kids might love it. Kids also like to eat McDonalds, but don't try telling me that their food is healthy. There is plenty of good music out there than is clean enough for children. And, surprisingly, a lot of these songs are very inappropriate for children, even with the expletives deleted. There is no reason on earth why these records should exist, excepting for the fact that record execs want to milk more money out of the singles once their radio play starts to diminish. I agree with the person who suggested the Beatles as an alternative. Seriously, don't buy this!</review_text>
Yes the game has been missing the constant songs about drugs, girls, cars and jewelery. I tell you Juelz really came with an original formula with this album. The stuff he mentions on this one has never been said before and Juelz is an innovator as well as the rest of the dipset. LOL!!!! These guys listen to other peoples albums and just reiterate the same stuff in a different song and beat. Save your money</review_text>
I am a huge fan of BTNH, but even I will admitt this is not a good album. The worst being "Home" which uses samples from Phil Collins. The whole thing feels kind of empty, with very little of the passion that you would hear on the groups earlier works. There are a few songs worth listening to. Most notably is "Clevland is the City" which is one of the only songs that still sounds like it has any "harmony" to it. Other songs worth mentioning are "What About Us", "Not my baby" and "Pump,Pump",the rest of the album in my opinion is garbage. It is not surprising that the group broke up shortly after this album was released</review_text>
Maybe her harp playing could be acceptable, but when she sings... everything turns awful. The worst singer I ever heard</review_text>
This CD is not at all what it appears to be. They got other people singing and playing the music, so it's not what you're probably looking for. Terrible misrespresentation. I was so disappointed! Thank goodness I used my other party cd's or my guests would have left......and I would have held the door open.....not blamed them for leaving!</review_text>
Wild Card is the best song on this cd.  The rest just didn't do it for me and I didn't care for the Latin flavor.  This cd was a mess.  If the rest of the songs were along the lines of Wild Card, I would have kept the cd.  This didn't say Rippingtons to me.</review_text>
GNR were a very overrated band. I found Appetite For Destruction very dull. This atleast has the band's 3 GREAT songs in November Rain, Civil War, and Live And Let Die. Get this for 3 great songs but stay away from GNRS OTHER CRAPPY SONGS AND ALBUMS!! THEY ARE NOT METAL!</review_text>
After carefully researching as many rain recordings as possible on Amazon and reading all reviews I had hoped I had made a good choice with this CD.  Unfortunately I discovered that not only is the recording looped about every 60 seconds but there is an unmistakable low frequency rumble that is very apparent listening though my 5.1 system and my Bose Tri-Port headphones.  As a recording engineer I recognize this to most likely be a truck or car passing by and passing the sound up through the microphone stands that were obviously not de-coupled from the ground.  The bottom line is I hear this rumble each and everytime I start to relax and it renders the CD completely useless to me.  The recording is otherwise a good one and the stereo image presented seems authentic.  Since nobody else has complained of this rumble, I will assume that it will only bother someone with a trained ear</review_text>
Very possibly the worst CD I have ever heard in my life. I could barely FORCE myself to listen until the last song was blissfully over.This is not music. It is stupid noise!</review_text>
Out of all of the early '90s, L.A. gangster flicks, this one probably had the best set of Chicano oldie tracks.  The movie was laced with them, yet none are on the soundtrack.  Kind of a waste.Sure, you can get those oldies anywhere.  But it would be nice to have those songs from this movie on one cd.  Again, it was a good sequence they used.Aside from that;  It's okay, I guess, if you're a fan of b-list L.A. Chicano rappers.  But, even if you are, you can get better music from their respective albums.  LSOB's first CD from '91 was tight.  If you have that, then you're really not missing anything by letting the  'Loca' soundtrack pass.</review_text>
Greatest Hits collections of rap artists are usually a pretty bad idea. Most good rappers pack a visceral punch on first impact, but this wears thin with repeated listenings. This is especially true of gangsta rap. With what allegedly should represent the best work of B-T-H on one disk, this collection falls on its face trying to get around itself. Arranged back to back, the rapid-fire syncopated delivery that constitutes virtually every track on this collection wears thin. The raps blur together, and after two songs, the obscenity-laced machine-gun vocal play loses its novelty value, sounding more like a stylized novelty than any type of artistic vision. Once the raps lose their ability to hold your attention, all that remains are the rhythm tracks, which are serviceable at best. Their biggest hit, "Tha Crossroads", appears here in a version that is completely unrecognizable from its better-known form, further reducing the value of this collection. Worse, they include a warmed-over version of "F- Tha Police", an exercise in futility that only serves to dissipate the power of NWA's original.Spending money on this collection is like buying old newspaper articles. It might have had some value when it first hit the stands, but who wants yesterday's papers? 		C    Tom Rya</review_text>
Rob touches on so much with this CD.  My favorite song is one that hasn't got any airplay and, in my opinion, the public missed out a great hit!  "Streetcorner Symphony" is about people coming together. It's what I call my happy song.  Each day as I go to work I play the song as loud as I can get it!  We, my daughters and I, saw him live and he also called it a happy song!  I can't wait for his live albulm to come out! There are fast and slow songs on this CD and will be worth EVERY PENNY you spend to buy it! Incredible voice and songwritting</review_text>
however despite what Amazon reviewer Kristy Martin may believe, Ms Croft does not need to get her freak on. Wow. I guess hip hop can do no wrong. In a soundtrack which is filled with apporpriate trax to supplement the film, here comes another fanboy/girl of hip hop's hopele$$$ley misplaced garbage. Thank you Kristy for proving to be yet another white suburban supporter of the most mass marketed crap to come along. (Missy)This song is soo done it's practically taboo to listen too. And Outkast? Puhf_ckingleez. These clowns sold out a long long time ago</review_text>
This was one of the most dissappointing debut albums to come out of the Mid Nineties G-Funk heyday. Warren G. didn't even produce one song on this sorry attempt at making hard/soft gangsta rap except for the title track that was already used on his album a year before. The skits are ridiculous, the music is halfass, and the lyrics are amateur. There is absolutely nothing that keeps the listener's attention for a whole album. This is similar to other West Coast rap albums that play it too safe such as W.C. and the Madd Circle's debut and Coolio's "It Takes A Thief". One star for the hit single "Summertime in the L.B.C.".</review_text>
Any group that is so lacking in imagination that it has to steal as unusual and distinctive a song title as "Boulevard of Broken Dreams" (a 1934 hit song) deserves to be ridiculed, not rewarded with a Grammy.I'm just full of original ideas. I can't decide whether to write a song called "Wake Me Up Before you Go-Go" or "Grandma Got Run Over By A Reindeer" - or maybe "Do You Know The Way to San Jose"?</review_text>
I did not like this cd at all.  There was not even one song that I liked.However, given the positive result the cd received, it may just have been my personal taste.  I also got her new cds, and did not like those eithe</review_text>
I woke up this morning to the grating sounds of "Good Little Girls" blaring over my clock radio's single, worn-out speaker.  A speaker that has helped introduce some great songs over the past year, such as "There Goes My Life" and "Live Like You Were Dying".  "Good Little Girls" is easily the worst country song I've ever heard - and I thought Neal McCoy was bad!  Blue Country is the C&W equivalent of Wham!  (a dated reference to be sure)Maybe I'm just getting too old for country music</review_text>
I agree with all the other reviewers .. nice quality recording for its time considering it was in the vaults for decades ..great playing  from all concerned(except the  cursed Drummer) , I cannot imagine what poor Jerry Gemmot went through with THAT DRUMMER .. he should have been  dismissed immediately ..or shot ..it would have sounded better without him .. Gawd' awful .. spoils the whole dang thing .. any way .. I cannot listen to this anymore without getting uncomfortable , so it's back to Soul Of A Man , Re-Kooperation ,  Live Adventures , Super Session , and Kooper Sessions with Shuggie</review_text>
Any one who is a fan of Luther Vandross will be sorry if you purchase this CD.  It's not a tribute.......it an abomination</review_text>
Anyone ever see any of these rap "artists" perform live? They're the most boring, derivative "entertainers" in the world. They walk up and down the stage grabbing their crotch and YELL their lyrics. They go from talking on records to yelling on stage. Quite a stretch. All this is done with about thirty of their no-name friends prancing around stage with microphones saying "YEAH!" "UH-HUH!" "WHAT!" "THAT'S RIGHT!" "UH!" etc. Get real.Meanwhile, the only "music" provided is a backing track cued by some dude backstage. It makes for the most dull, predictable "concert" you'll ever see.I can't wait until all this nonsense just disappears. In a world of common sense, these idiots would still be flipping burgers at McDonald's.</review_text>
and he's a super-talented drummer. The day the Foos release a best-of compilation I'll probably pick it up. Otherwise, I'm sad to say that the average Foo Fighters album cut just doesn't cut it for me. All of the songs on THERE IS NOTHING LEFT TO LOSE are mediocre, run-of-the mill "alternative" rock. Only "Stacked Actors" has some real songwriting substance and it does have some swagger and bite, but to be perfectly honest, it still isn't a huge turn-on in my book. "Learn to Fly," the other track that got some airplay on alt-rock radio, may as well have been written by The Outfield or some other average rock band along those lines. I almost gave this album two stars, but unfortunately I think that rating would be just too generous.Foo Fighters HAVE made some really good songs, like "Everlong." But I honestly don't think they'd be nearly as big if Grohl hadn't drummed for one of the most highly revered and charismatic bands of all time, NIRVANA. Elsewhere, their fantastic cover versions such as Gary Numan's "Down in the Park" and Prince's "Darling Nikki" suggest they are great rockers but less great in the songwriting department</review_text>
This is a pep rally on CD; an unsingable, emotionally charged pep rally.  It really upsets me that this is the face of today's Christian music.  The melodies are not easily singable at all, and the songs use all the same musical cliches.  This is worship manipulation at it's best.  If you read the words to learn something concrete about God, you will find nothing of substance.  They talk about actions to give God and our response to God, but no meat-and-potatoes of WHY we should be doing this.  God IS great, but WHY?  This is VERY disturbing, and completely unacceptable for congregational worship.</review_text>
I was hoping to hear the rockin' spanish flavor of the Robert Rodriguez band Chingon, but what the hell is this?!!!The Amazon recomendations lead me to this album, and hinde sightI should have read a little more before buying, but I was too excited to hear more of the Rodriguez Chingon.I hope this helps you</review_text>
With Perverse, Mike Edwards set out to prove that Jesus Jones was more than a `sunny, breezy pop band', what he ended up proving was that if they weren't no one was interested. Sad to say, but pop hooks were what people expected from JJ, and actually there are some here, but they are smothered by industrial/techno gook. Stick with DOUBT, that's where JJ peaked, even if some claimed they had `sold out'. Here they are pushing the boundaries, but that doesn't always make for a great listening experience</review_text>
This album is disgusting.No musical talent.  This people are the farthest thing from musicians.  If you enjoy overproduced music, and a rip off of fellow label mates FOB and P!ATD - buy this.  It is boring and it is a weak attempt at a record.  Shaant can't sing either.  Go back to Buffalo</review_text>
I thought something must be wrong with my stereo when I first played this cd.  Brooks and Dunn have created some great work, but this is far from it.  Many of the songs are so dischordant, I would  swear that the studio engineer had gone tone deaf or something.  About two decent songs, the rest are not worth having around.  Try some earlier stuff for a better taste of their talent</review_text>
While some would call Orange and Acme "studio" albums, suggesting that they lack originality, but they have rythm. I would call myself a big JSBX fan, I play Orange and Acme constantly, however I feel that this album is a little too much free form, and free noise for the everyday listener. I would recommend that anyone interested in JSBX start with Acme and then move on to Orange to develop an appreciation for JSBX, because it is a rather acquired taste</review_text>
Too Lisa Loeb for me. Sorry. Maybe if someone else wrote her lyrics</review_text>
See Bonnie Raitt be slowly overtaken by the blahs, actually one is temped to think the album will be cool when listening to `The Fundametal Things', but no</review_text>
Metallica were simply one of the worst most overrated and pathetic bands ever. Most of their trite albums deserve no stars. Their only good cds are either Master of Puppets, or Black Album. KILL EM ALL is such a bore!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! James Hetfield, the lead singer just screams and can't sing at all!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Why???? Why can't he sing more proper like Lou Greamm(Foreigner), & Mark Knopfler(Dire Straits)????????Each and every song on this album is bad!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Don't listen to the people who rate Metallica's albums a five star. They are overrated....Green Day is better. Get Them, Dire Straits, and Foreigner insted.Ps. This album is worth a minus trillion.</review_text>
Back 2 Da Basics *1/2 StarsYo Gotti has made some decent albums, but this one is just so ridiculous and silly that it made me sick, gotti who thinks he put memphis on the map, has some good songs here and there, but the rest are just ridiculous, obnioxus and real pretentious.This is not a good albumThumbs Down</review_text>
Simon &amp; Garfunle wrote a lot of forgettible music(most notably for the film The Graduate, which would have been a better film without thier dated msuic).  This cd dates very badly as all thier music does, it's got a very limited appeal, only for diehard fans, but beware thsi music really sounds DATED, I mean it's really unlistenable</review_text>
he just needs to retire. screw this non-gangsta. no real G sings, they just rap, GOD</review_text>
This CD Is garbage. Juvenile should go hang him self after putting out this album. He was alright when he first came out but now he sucks the big one. If I was you dont listen to the retards who tell you "this is a good comeback album" . Instead of wasting you cah on this crap i recommend Welcome Back by Mase. That is a good comeback album. The only thing that makes the album even worth noting is the beats of Mannie Fresh. Juvenile just was a waste of those excellent beats. A shame they couldn't go to Ja rule, whose CD sucked with his beats. He has the vocal and writing talent but his beats blow</review_text>
I've never written a review, but I just wanted to let you know if you buy this album you are a complete idiot, and you're killing Hip-Hop. Stop killing my music</review_text>
Robin Gibb has one of the most distinctive voices of the 1960s. With the BEE GEES or as a solo artist he has enough hits to make his own live show. However, in this LIVE recording he chooses to recreate mostly BEE GEES hits on which he had a secondary role on their famous three part harmonies. Thus he needs the help of another lead singer, chorus and The Neue Philharmonie Frankfurt Orchestra. But everything goes wrong here: Robin's voice remains buried among a real bulk of unmixed music; the lead singer (no list of credits) is a poor substitute to Barry Gibb's famous falsetto; the female voices are not very inspired, to say the least; while the orchestra is frequently out of tune and noisy (the winds on Juliet are really unbearable). Post-production seems to be non-existent and the overall sound is chaotic. Lines notes by experts Andrew Mon Hughes and Ann Grootjans are interesting and illustrative, but they seem to belong to another album. The message from Robin Gibb seems to be clear: "I can do it all by myself". Well, he cannot. He should re listen to ONE NIGHT ONLY (1998) and check for sound, harmonies and production</review_text>
Presumably the label is trying to cater to mid-range fans who have a Prince album or two but don't want to buy them all and who want more than a single disc hits collection. The way this is laid out though is confusing at best:Disc 1 seems to be for the mid-range fan and it makes sense that they would choose the single edits though some of those chosen are questionable. ("My Name is Prince"? His take on "Nothing Compares 2 U" when Sinead O'Connor's is definitive?) Disc 2 compiles 12" mixes and remixes and similar rarities..i.e. for the diehard only who has to have every little bleat His Purpleness every records.BOTTOM LINE:This is haphazardly thrown together. Middle range fans are better off with THE HITS/THE B-SIDES which compiles his biggest chart stuff with a pretty decent selection of interesting flip side material (some of which equals his singles)</review_text>
There is a reason why you cannot listen to any tracks on Amazon- you wouldn't buy if you could. I read a number of reviews and figured that it was worth a try given that Metallica was mentioned as being similar in some small way. This band is nothing even near Metallica. I have thrown the disk away- don't bother</review_text>
I can't beleive this guy's arrogance to try and re-record songs that are essentially and always will be Sinatra's domain. Any idiot will tell you that once Sinatra got hold of a song it was and always will be identified with him. Fact. Ask Tony Bennett or any other great singers and they will tell you. Sinatra IS the voice and then this upstart thinks he can do better. Not only does he murder 'a very good year' but also attempts (badly) 'mr. bojangles' even attempting to ape Sammy Davis's mannerisms. I had the misfortune to hear this once and came to the conclusion that is was a)a joke or b) a blantant attempt by Williams to crossover to boarder appeal. Now i see it actually meant it. Robbie you will never be able to sing standards and please don't attempt the Rodgers and Hart songbook (though i suspect you will if your latest album bombs) your voice is flat most of the time and your attempts to look cool on the cover can't cover up your mediocrity. The only time i'd like to see you swing is from a lamppost. Stick with 'songs for swinging lovers''come fly with me' to hear the real thing. An insult to classic songs</review_text>
Listening to this album made me question my own life.  It is simply unoriginal, boring and really bad.  Save your money</review_text>
The lack of someone lurking behind Prince's shoulder while in the recording studio and having the courage to tell him when he produces second rate nonsense has been missing since the departure of the Fargnoli management team. This is a poor track incorporating biblical references that have little relevance or sense of genuine compassion to the katrina disaster. Musically the lack of emotion conveyed by the unnecessarily complicated chord changes and irrelevant reference to Sade also make the feel of this track disjointed. While Prince fans will generally hype this track, the reality is that "4 the tears in your eyes" this isn't and to add a charity track with an instrumental showing off your musical skills is just pure self indulgence and frankly crass. Lets hope this is not an indication of the upcoming 3121.</review_text>
I love south music like three 6, lil jon, master p, but this is a disgrace to every rapper alive and dead. Man JD is just signing anyone these dayz to make money cuz he can't get no one wit talent. every song on here sounds like it was hurried up. Fu*k so so de and fu*k dem franchize boyz they make me sick.</review_text>
all i got to say about this is that dudes need to stop making this kinds of records cuz this is not hip hop, its not what LL, Rakim, KRS-one, Kool G Rap, Ice T, Ice Cube, NWA, and (rip) BIG AND PAC, started.  We as fan have the power to end this buy simply not buying the album.  PLEASE DO NOT BUY THIS, THIS FAKE RAP IS GOT TO STO</review_text>
A lot of people are meriting Ja's credibility on all his albums because he has been able to keep his voice on the airwaves since 1998. So he released his sophomore album Rule 3:36 in Sept 2000, that is one of the worst Ja albums I've heard (not the worst, The Last Temptation takes that title).Ja tries to be "gangstafied" on this album but fails terribly. Starting with the first single "Me & You" thinking his thug style can attract women. I haven't bought the concept in 2000, and I'm still not buying it six years later. Or how about the flat falling track "F*** You" featuring Vita and 01?Or as many revewers have pointed out that he tries to boast his singing vocals on this album, which seriously damages his creditablity. How about the song "Put It On Me" before Lil Mo joined song. Sounds wack(er) with out her. Or how about the late Barry White imitation on the song "Extacy" (and thats one of the decent tracks on this album). Oh and remember when "Between Me & You" was highly antacipated that you downloaded the single on Napster? Well do you remember that the origonal/demo that some of you downloaded didn't have Christina Millian singing the hook, but had Ja singing it himself. Thank god that wasn't on the album.Now there are some listenable tracks on this album that I would like to point out. "6 Feet" is a standout track, and is possibly the best track on this album and my personal favorite. "Watching Me" is another tight track, as Ja spits with a load of energy within him. "I Cry" and as mentioned earlier "Extacy" are decent at best. Other than that, most of the tracks on this album are skippable.Overall, a sub medicore Ja Rule album. Most of the 4 and 5 star reviewers are either big time Ja Rule fans or just in love with mainstream overrated rap ("Put It On Me" [Remix]). To me, this album is nothing else but a pop rap, falsafied thug rap album that just doesn't appeal to me. I recommend this to hardcore Ja Rule fans if they don't have this already.Lyrics: CProduction: C+Guest Appearances: C-Musical Vibes: D-Favorite Tracks: Watching Me, 6 Feet, Die, ExtacyHonorable Mention Track : Chris Black (skit</review_text>
Not what I expected.  It wasn't as 'manly' as I had hoped</review_text>
can it be that people are letting their personal beliefs block the receptors in the brain that signal bad music?  ive listened to many bob dylan albums, and every one is a gem.  freewheelin' is my favorite, but so what?  it doesn't matter which ones we love, because we all know what bob dylan's worst record was, and its saved.  im not one to question this man's beliefs or anything like that, bob dylan deserves all the respect in the universe, but could it be that bob dylan made a transfer to christian music to help us all see how bad it is?  could he have made the transfer to make a mockery of the christian faith?  almost certainly not.  but only a seriously bad album could have planted these seeds in my brain</review_text>
I've always seen Sheryl Crow as a middle-of-the-road rock artist.My wife and I got a couple of her disc's, plus that "very best of" CD and was really looking forward to her latest, but this one...zzzzzzzz, makes me wonder what they're putting in Sheryl's coffee.Some reviewers are saying there's "heart and soul" all over this album?That may be, but it's also very slick dullsville stuff too.As for the album cover graphics, I don't see the Roger Dean Yes covers or the 60's style psychedelia like one reviewer wrote, but a very "modern" graphic art that lots of artists and bands have been using. Kelly Clarkson, the Vines, the Donnas, the list goes on.Highlights: Good is Good (I guess it's time for a new "very best of" collection)</review_text>
THIS ALBUM IS OKAYNOT THEIR BEST.A FEW SONGS ARE GOODOTHER THANTHAT THIS ALBUMIS FAIR.PURCAHSE IT WITH YOURMONEY INTELLIGENTLY!!!!!!!!</review_text>
You know, after REALLY trying to like this album, I must agree with K Johnson. Oftentimes a really good album sounds horrible (or just plain plain) upon one or three spins, so when this album didn't move me the first time, I decided to hang back and try again in a few days. Then again. And again. And one more time. Usually after three or four COMPLETE spins (which was like work, with this one)the jems will work there way to the surface. Sufjian Stevens was like that. So was Z by My Morning Jacket. But the problem was that I really wanted to like this one. All the reviews I read were hyping this as the album of the decade, and I wanted them to be right.Unfortunately, none of them were right. It is a plodding, lifeless album wanting desperately to be 'hip' and failing miserably, to the point of being embarassing almost. Like your 40 something hipster college prof with a graying ponytail (who will LOVE this, by the way), it will be pointless to argue with those who like this album. I have to say that it is obvious these guys put a lot of work into this, and they do have talent; it just doesn't get me there. I hope they can live up to the hype next time. I truly do..</review_text>
On an episode of Seinfield that is probably overexposed enough as it is, the always wily and oh so goofy character of Kramer is playing a game of Risk and exclaims that the "Ukraine is weeeeak".  This causes him to get a thorough scolding and a little bit of trouble.  I think the same basic sentiments work with this New Order release.  It probably wasn't worth the ungodly long eight year wait although it produced the excellent "Rock The Shack" and of course "Crystal", which I'll get back to later.  Unlike Kramer I feel I can make this statement safely as I'm not dealing with a burly, alcohol swigging Ukranian, but New Order fans, which aren't the most intimidating bunch out there.  Keyboardist Gillian Gilbert is not here as she felt taking care of her kids is more important, which it is, maybe.  This album features the guitar of Billy Corgan, the frontman of the seminal 90's group Soundgarden.  Too bad they couldn't get Billy to collaborate five years earlier because at this point he was already full blown crazy, and wasn't writing very good material or really using his guitar, at all.  New Order also made the mistake of having Corgan to backing vocals.  Now a synth is high pitched and shrill enough, but to top that off with a Billy Corgan squealing like a pig cherry is probably not the best choice.  So...Someone Like You is more or less unlistenable.  It has some pretty terrible lyrics about how Bernard doesn't want to wash his car.  Now I can relate, I wouldn't want to wash my car in Britain since it rains all the time and would probably be an altogether futile affair, but this topic doesn't result in the most captivating and well-written material.  New Order occasionnally want to rawk out with guitars on this album, something they don't do very often, just like Van Morrison.  Now I'm not sure if I've heard a Van Morrison song but I've always figured it was a give that they rawk out with guitars.  Case in point of this `not so good of an idea rawking' is Rock The Shack.  Rock The Shack kind of sounds like New Order's take on someone commissioned to write an epic Gilligan's Island rock song, pretty amazing huh?  '60 Miles an Hour', `Primitive Notion', and `Close Range' all suffer from being a little too vanilla and a little too bland.  New Order have patches here where they sound like they might be suffering from the same middle-aged blandness that has crippled other 80's artist like Depeche Mode, The Cure, and Tears For Fears (who've actually always blown).  However, they do succeed fully well on two songs here.  There is `Crystal', which is truly an excellent rock song and show New Order can succeed with a harder guitar edge and is probably one of the two or three best songs of New Order's career from the 90's and beyond.  How this didn't get more airplay than it did is a mystery to me, because it has the alternative rock of today written all over it.  The other is Run Wild which is really a great little slow song, in the vein of `As It Is When It Was.  Probably New Order's only full-fledged ballad it serves as a fitting acoustic, moving ending to an otherwise disappointing album.  Get Ready is good beginning and end, just not end between.  Kind of like that movie Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me</review_text>
Can we say, "money making ploy?"  WoW.  I, like many others, have grown up with Disney.  Perhaps I simply do not understand why kids of any age would listen to this garbage as opposed to the actual movie songs?  This is not like "Kidz Bop" or anything related to that which "kidifies" music - these are timeless movie classics that did NOT need to be redone - and as a further insult, they are poorly redone.  I am very, very let down by these "Disneymania" albums. :o(</review_text>
Hey, that just goes without being said. All of their live albums suck because they suck. Go Creed! I can't wait for Scott Stapp's solo album! Awesome, baby</review_text>
Im not surprised that this album is garbage because fiddy has been putting out trash lately (think tony gayo). There are no standout tracks and prodigy doesnt even rhyme anymore. All prodigy does is spit run-on sentences throughout every track and havoc sounds like he's just there to be there. Amerikaz nightmare was a sign that it was over for them. Did we really have to hear this one to see that? If you are a mobb deep fan buy every album before amerikaz nightmre and keep it moving</review_text>
..and what's the point? All of these songs (minus a few) are on the anthology, along with countless others. The Beastie Boys didn't put this out, their record label did.  It's just way for corporate to make money. If you consider yourself a real Beastie Boys fan, that is you're interested in all the other music they made that wasn't put on radio, then don't buy this.  If you occasionally heard them on the radio and Fight For Your Right is your favorite song, then go ahead. The Beastie Boys are much more than just their greatest hits.  To fully appreciate them, you have to listen to an album all the way through.</review_text>
As for many of these kind of unknown groups, the music in the album is useless. In the meaning that this music has no use. It is not relaxing. It is not for contemplation. It is not spiritual. It is nothing but electronic esperiments that many vendors try to deliver under the name of "ambient". But ambient music is music. THis is crap.Well differently from TWO A.D. where probably the producers realized that crap is crap and no more crap was good to be sold, because people isn't stupid.TWO A.D. is light years away from this crap.Don't waste your money. Listen the the samples by yourself to grab what I mean.Sergi</review_text>
Why are they butchering Pac's songs like this. I advise anyone to get the bootlegs over this album. The original Ghetto Gospel and Loyal To The Game are 2 of my favorite Pac songs but the one's on here are painful to listen to. Afeni should have let DJ Quik, Daz, and whoever else that worked with Pac do this album. They should have just digitally remastered the bootlegs. This started with Still I Rise to Until The End Of Time to Better Dayz and the quality has been going down and down and they hit rock bottom with this one. The 2 stars is 1 because it is Pac and another for the song Uppercut. The most obvious butcher job is Black Cotton where Em chose a fast beat and you could tell he is trying to speed up Pac's rhyme. I hope they do better with this last album due out this year</review_text>
Come on.  I cannot play these dual discs in my car nor any regular CD players. J&MC are excellent though</review_text>
People buy fast food, they know its bad for them.People pay the Geek Squad 229 to do 5 minutes of work.People ALSO pay 10 bucks for words & techno beats called "pop music".Amazing, if you had this much money:go get a gym membership.Pay off your cars.Donate it to children's hospital.Why support some teen that in 2 years will die from the music scence and laugh in her mansion</review_text>
Boston have to be one of the worst bands EVER!! THE SINGER SCREAMS AND THEY MADE SOME OF THE LOUSIEST SONGS LIKE ROCK N ROLL BAND, AND THE HORRIBLE MORE THAN A FEELING. THEY WOULD NOT HOLD A CANDLE TO SMART BANDS LIKE METALLICA WHO ROCK! I JUST GOT METALLICA'S 4TH LP TODAY. GET AND JUSTICE FOR ALL BY METALLICA INSTED</review_text>
I have never been able to see what the big deal was about this band.  All of their records, in general, sound exactly the same, and this one is no exception.  Post-Velvets guitar/organ drones, lackadaisical vocals, blankly uninteresting non-lyrics (they could have recited their grocery lists and it would have been more interesting), and a dramatic lack of energy; all of Yo La Tengo's trademarks are fully represented here, and if you can stay awake through it, you're a better man/woman than I.  A surpassingly boring record, even from this usually very boring band.  If you've heard the Velvet Underground, Neu!, Stereolab's early records, and Sonic Youth, you've heard Yo La Tengo in total.  If you're a big enough fan of those named bands, YOU could probably write songs that sound like &quot;Painful.&quot; But you would probably write better ones. Avoid this like the plague unless you suffer from insomnia</review_text>
After reading so many positive reviews, I was very exited when I recieved this cd in the mail. I popped it in my bose wave radio, turned it up to 85, and listened to the most annoying hissing sound I've ever heard coming from my system. I regret purchasing this cd</review_text>
Please change your name to (KID RAP)..  When you start producing true ROCK cd's then and only then you should put rock back into your fake name...  Stop playing both sides..  I realize that the rap- hip hop scene is much easier because over half the fan base is little girls /boys and people that dont have a clue what music is all about..Do yourself a favor and take the rap/hip hop out of your so called music. One day you will realize that the rap/hip hop scene is like a bad smell that real music fans hate and wish would go away..</review_text>
This movie was only good because of two reasons.  RAMMSTEIN, and Queens of the Stone Age.  Other than that, completel out of control P.O.S. that keeps its viewers contemplating whether they have died and this movie is their eternal punishment in hell</review_text>
Sarah Brightman is one of my all time favorite artists.  But this disc is just a complete waste.  It is missing so much, and has too many songs that don't belong.  Like the phantom songs.  As much as I love them, save them for the Andrew Llyod Webber collections.  Can't we have a nice singles collection with just her solo works starting from "Dive"?  Her "Classics" album had it right.  Except their version of "Captain Nemo" was the rip off live version.  And THIS cd doesn't even have the Captain Nemo song, which is a HUGE fan favorite, and definitly was a single.  It is also missing How Can Heaven Love Me, Eden, Harem, and Beautiful.  All singles as well.  Save your money.  Either buy the "Classics" album for a somewhat better compilation, or just make your own mix like I did.  Because Sarah has so many wonderful songs (And quite a few bad ones I will admit)  And it seems on here they give you some bad ones (like requium and nella fantasia), and leave out the good ones.  "It's A Beautiful Day" and "What You Never Know" are good, but are the weakest songs form Harem.  Why on earth would you leave out "Harem" and "Beautiful", but leave on Beautiful Day and WYNK?  Whoever put this set list together must have not put much thought into it and is just trying to cash in.  I bet Sarah didn't have much say in this compilation.  This is just a waste.  Beautiful album cover though</review_text>
I've never been a fan of Metallica. I like Ride The Lightening, Master of Puppets, and that's it. That's the extent of my enjoyment with their abilities.However, if there is one quality I've always admired in Metallica, it is their lyrics. They've always had excellent lyrics in their songs, and that was what got me to keep buying albums.However, I can't credit them for any lyrics on this one. Unfortunately, we're dealing with a bunch of covers.Some of the songs are pretty good. The only one I can say I really like is Turn The Page, though Seger's original version is leaps and bounds ahead of it. It's got decent music, and the vocals aren't bad. Metallica just couldn't figure out how to honor a classic, and they occasionally sounded like James was trying to lift a thousand pounds while he sang, leading his voice to sound overly forced.Other songs, like Killing Time, were not spared on this album. Unlike with Turn The Page, Metallica didn't even do a halfway decent job covering this. They destroyed a pretty good song. And to be honest, Metallica's guitarist just can't compete with Sweet Savage's (Vivian Campbell??).Tuesday's Gone was also destroyed. It was too slow and acoustic, but not in the good way it was in the Skynyrd original. In this case, James' voice was terrible. It sounded like he was bleeding the entire time and trying to ignore it. That is, at least, the effect I get from it.Overall, if you're a die hard fan, you won't like this. It just doesn't have what Metallica did have for songs back with Ride The Lightening and Master of Puppets. If you're just looking for some Metallica, you might as well get this. As long as you are just a small fan, and not a huge one.Otherwise, this may come as a dissapointment</review_text>
It was about time the spell Kasey Chambers originally cast on me wore off - I'd become a huge fan of The Captain and Barricades & Brickwalls, but there was all something a little nagging about even those two very good records.  Chambers, a unique betty boop squeak of a voice, was a lustrous presence in rootsy contexts, and the best moments of those records were snarky updates on an old form, but the worst moments were forgettable alt-country duldrums of patched together cliches.  Wayward Angel, Chambers' third album, had some great songs on it, but its pop and country predictability overtook a good half of the album.  Carnival shows Chambers at her weakest - sad girl anthems of generic empowerment about the rain, bad girl anthems of doin-wrong that sound about as risky as songs on The Disney channel's afternoon lineup.  "Light Up A Candle" fakes its slinkiness and turns dull, "Surrender" adds a Dido production of drum machines and computer bleeps that don't mask the song's epic ordinariness,  ballads like "Dangerous" limp along to their own generic lethargy.  Chambers isn't without charm - "Sign On The Door" and "I Got You Now" are impossible to not find fun - yet Chambers worst instincts as a song writer threaten to take over even the good songs - "Hard Road," a sad and moving movie-ready duet, borders on self-parody - lines like "There's a heavy jacket/ there's a heavy load/ there's a weight on my shoulders/ it's a hard road" read like a laundry list of related lines from every sad and moving movie-ready song you've ever heard</review_text>
especially when there's a pretty girl invovled but this is just dreadful. the songs are so cheesy, her voice is out of place in half the songs. it's whiny, irritating, dull and at this point, I'm not sure who's more talented, her or her sister. they got the looks, sure, but there's lots of pretty girls in this world, doesn't mean they deserve a singing contract just to look hot on the cover of the cd. & that's the only thing that intrigued me to listening to this album. & I'm sorry Jes, but maybe u really are as brain dead as people say</review_text>
Jessica is blessed with a powerful and beautiful voice, but you won't get the chance to hear it on this CD. This CD is a complete let down. It is her worst one yet! Don't get me wrong. I love Jessica, but seeing her waste her God given gift on a bunch of kitty cat songs is just so... tragic</review_text>
When will amazon allow a zero stars rating????</review_text>
as much as I have been a lifelong fan of black moon and buckshot in general this album just lacked the ironically titled "chemistry"between buckshot and 9th Wonder.  The beats were a bit lackluster and boring and rides that razor thin line of boring and laid back with most of the beats raiding the boredom zone.  they are working on a part two so I hope they take their times to create something permament rather than something disposable as this album was.</review_text>
I like funny rappers who have some talent at least. I do not think that his songs or the man is funny at all. And even the people that I know that enjoyed this the first couple times say that they don't like it at all by the third time. Truly bad pointless music that makes all rap music seem like a joke. Avoid this one</review_text>
Tihs Album is not all that good when it came out in still not good till this day. I like all his other albums better I don't Know why he decided to release this crap.But the only song I really Like is hip hip qurtables</review_text>
Judas Preist's 1974 debut album.This is simpley weird, i could see why the band hates this album so much...simpley becuase it is so uneven and utterly sloppy and the production sounds like they recorded it in BFI dumpster. When i first got this, i was like "What the Hell?", granted, debut albums are far from perfect, but this was just downright miserable. This sounds like a combination of Pink Floyd,Rush,Black Sabbath and Cream on an acid trip. The song ROCKA ROLLA was OK and so was ONE FOR THE ROAD, but the rest of the material was abismal. SAD WINGS OF DESTINY was such an improvment from this mess! The coolest thing about this album is the weird scrapping guitar effects Tipton makes on one of the songs! I'm surprised that this was even issued on a CD, the band doesn't even acknowlege the existance of this album and i can see why! Fortuanatly they prooved to be so much more then what this platter of stange noises provided us with. I know that there are some that like this, but not me! It is very blues based in some songs, and the most annoying thing is that some of these numbers will put you to sleep. Any one expecting a rocking metal album from the Preist will be let down by this</review_text>
NO STRINGS ATTACHED IS TO MY MEMORY ONE OF THE WORST ALBUMS EVER MADE.NO ONE LISTENS TO THE STUPID BOY BANDS ANYMORE.THIS PIECE OF C@#P DOES NOT SELL EVEN A THOUSAND COPIES TODAY UNLESS THE PREVIOUS REVIEWER IS BUYING UP ALL THE MILLION COPIES HIMSELF.DONT BUY ANY ALBUM FROM N STYNC OR THE EQUALLY HORRIBLE JUSTIN TIMBERLAKE.GET ANY BEATLES ALBUM INSTEAD</review_text>
Dull and uninspiring, listening to this CD I couldn't see what distinguished the Doves from the other insipid sound-a-like bands that plague the modern music scene. If you like The White Stripes, Franz Ferdinand, Arctic Monkeys, The Killers then be grateful that they've saved rock music from boring dross like this</review_text>
Charlotte Church had the most beautiful and captivating voice I ever heard when she debuted.  I purchased all of her albums and played them to death. This CD is horrible!  Her beautiful voice is no more as she makes no attempt to even use it.  Some of the other reviews said this release is the result of her growing up.  Ridiculous!  She could easily have kept the angelic voice as she grew.  This is simply a tragic waste of talent</review_text>
I absolutely love Charlotte Church's voice, but I couldn't stand even 1 song on this CD.  She's lowered herself to a "Brittany Spears-wanna-be."Monotone songs, horrible bass, every song sounds the same.  I am extremely disappointed in this collection of music.Buy this one and you're just wasting your money.Would the REAL Charlotte Church please come back????</review_text>
The Schumann that is presented here is a forgery. Don't get me wrong. I'm not railing against Schumann at all. The question here is what makes Schumann great, and the way that Bernstein presents these symphonies says Schumann is great for the wrong reasons. The real Schumann that lived was a completely different person than what we might assume from listening to this particular presentation of his music. Schumann was not a hopeless romantic. He was one composer in a long line of "classicists" which ended with Brahms, yet at the same time he was an innovator, pushing forward, trying to find new stylistic and technical means of expression. He had plenty of dignity, and he didn't write his music as a desperate plea for the world to like him, which is exactly what it sounds like here. Bernstein trudges through these fine works as if he were dying. Yes, many of these performances are the slowest on record, but this is a BAD thing. These beautiful works lose value immeasurably when they are saturated with thick, waxy, overly romantic textures and phrasing. Tell me, did Schumann ever write: "To be played extremely histrionically and melodramatically, with the greatest possible amount of cheese and theatrics" in his score? No! HE DID NOT. These performances are not more expressive than others in the real sense of the word, and any person in his/her right mind should be able to see this. You may be able to hear the orchestration more clearly than in Karajan's filth, but that's not saying much at all. And for this slight favor Bernstein does for the music, he makes it infinitely worse when he stretches the fabric of these works beyond their limit. The most blatant example is the third movement of the second symphony, taken at half tempo. All semblance of melody and motion is lost. This movement is supposed to be several minutes shorter than the first, and not the longest movement of the symphony, not to mention the longest movement in the entire set. In fact, almost every movement of every symphony could stand to have at least a minute hacked off of its timing. Also, while looking at the scores, you might notice that Bernstein does away with detail work this time around. Carefully laid out phrasing and the dynamic arch are thrown out of the window in favor of grand "romantic" gestures. Observing details in Schumann, ironically, helps to make the music speak more freely and honestly. This isn't honest music-making here, only a self-indulgent conductor once again plastering his image over the face of great art</review_text>
With the caliber of musicians playing on this album, I expected a hard hitting original. Instead we get re-arranged covers and lots of "filler" salsa. No surprises here. The classic salsa albums are worth your cash but if you are curious, you'll play this one once</review_text>
Je suis un peu du par cet album... c'est morne, le son est pas top... a trane dans les longueurs... bref ennuyeux! mais bon il faut se mettre  l'poque aussi! a  qd mme 13 ans</review_text>
How can ANYONE say this chick has talent?!!! My God, she is sooooooooo bad. And yes, I actually listened to it. The only reason it sounds semi ok is because she's got millions backing her and that much technology could even make me sound good! She doesn't write any of her songs and she can't hold a tune. Gives Celine a run for her money? Please!!!! The only singer she sounds better than is Paris Hilton! But whatever. If you like it, that's all that matters. If you like pretty young pop stars, Christina Aguilera is MUCH better. She can actually SING!!</review_text>
Hmm sounds good, jazzy and chic. This should only be played in lounges. The only tracked I liked was amour. The rest I wanted to close my ears. Too much noise</review_text>
I love this band and have all the rest of their cds</review_text>
This is another "Rip-Off" CD. 3 songs and a Video, don't make this a good purchase.I expect a CD to have, at least, 8-10 songs on it.</review_text>
A mix of the softest chessyest mushy reggae from the 80s. Don't even bother...</review_text>
I bought the CD because I thought it was instrumental music. Then I hit the tracks with vocals - Yikes!  This is the only CD of Lee Ritenour that I bought.  I am a first time listener. I must say that I do like the instrumental music very much. However, I really hate the tracks with vocals.</review_text>
I would have to say that there is nothing whatsoever WRONG with the band Jet, but when you don't have any particular characteristics to call your own, there's nothing to complain about. Of course, this means that there's nothing to compliment, either..except maybe that they do an excellent job sounding a hell of a lot like too many other bands. People compliment them on bringing the 'old' and adding the 'new...' but I hear nothing new in their music. It's just ordinary, clichd classic rock, except for some reason no one told them that the classic rock era was about 40 years ago. If I want to listen to classic rock, I want to hear it on the classic rock stations, not the modern rock stations. Those are for the new songs, only.An indepth and entertaining review of this album can be found at the Pitchfork Media website...I can't post the link due to strict review guidelines.</review_text>
If you have children that are five years & younger, this would be a good album to put in your child's boom box or get it in cassette for their tape player.  but if your children are six and up.  Your better off finding the real songs and burning them if you can find these songs.  This album should be saved strictly for the poor folks who wnat music for their kids but cannot afford it.  This ablum would be number 1 if it were sold in Rwanda, Sudan or other third world nations since it could be sold for like dirt cheap.  Parents, if you buy this album, after your children turn 6 years old.  pack this CD and other Ki8dz Bop CD's and send them to Africa.  This is Pop music for impoverished folks</review_text>
I REALLY,REALLY HATE FOREIGNER AND I RANK THEM AS BAD AS GREEN DAY.DONT MAKE THE MISTAKE OF BUYING THIS DISGUSTINGLY AWFUL CD WHICH CONTAINS TRASH LIKE WAITING FOR A GIRL LIKE YOU WHICH HAS TO BE ONE OF THE MOST MORONIC AND STUPID SONGS EVER.GET ANY LED ZEPPELIN ALBUM INSTEAD</review_text>
First of all, I am a fan of Madonna's music (not all of it, but a lot of it) as well as a huge ABBA fan.Now I realize that sampling has been very successful for many artists... and apparently it is here as well, but why can't these producers make something more intriguing or dynamic?Gimme Gimme Gimme (the ABBA song that is sampled here) is a fairly simple song to begin with (as many ABBA songs are) but the complicated arrangements (both vocally and instrumentally) are what made ABBA's songs interesting and fun to listen to.But taking a few bars of the original song, repeating it over and over and over, adding a dance beat, various other musical effects and a new melody does not add up to a pop masterpiece.I think she would've been better off either following a similar chord progression to Gimme Gimme Gimme or just doing a cover...Perhaps Benny and Bjrn should've stuck to their strict "no sampling" rule here!For some reason many of today's dance/pop songs get too caught up in the production and lack any real substance... A good example of a radio-friendly dance/pop song with a somewhat complicated chord structure is Acoustic Alchemy's "So Kylie" on their American/English album (the song sounds simple enough but if you really listen to what's going on, you'll notice subtle chord changes and a really nice progression).Now I'm not going to say "Hung Up" is a terrible song, because everyone has their own taste.  But I'm sorry to say it just doesn't do anything for me..</review_text>
Ok, first off, this is the first Corrs release i've listenend to. I'm offering my opinion without knowing anything else they may have done. I've listened to the cd 10 times or so, on random occasions when i need a break from my normal diet of punk and garage rock.It sounds good. A little TOO good. I agree that it's overproduced, doesn't sound even remotely spontaneous. The studio work is well done, but OVERdone. I'd like to hear something else to see what they REALLY sound like.The content of the songs is what bothers me. Aside from being sappy, sentimental drivvel (this is pop music, after all - i wasn't expecting anything else), everything sounds like a commercial ditty or a part of a movie soundtrack. Mmm-hmm.Track 1 - I see a not-so overweight soccermom smiling on a treadmill at Curves(TM), then hopping in the Ford Expedition(TM), and cheering on the kids at their soccer game with a SunnyD(TM) in each hand.Track 2 - Helicopter pans out as mid-20's girl drives curvy mountain road in VW Cabrio(TM)(R) with top down, thinking about handsome lover... "LMN"(R) watermark in lower-right corner of screen...Track 3 - Sad animals. Images of puppys in cages.Track 4 - Actually, I like this one. Mellow, laid back.Track 5 - Ugh.Track 6 - This one is the MOST clever! I see the band members - 3 girls, 1 guy - on one side of a table under a hanging lamp in an otherwise black room, while 3 gentlemen in suits open a breifcase full of money, push it towards them and say, "As you're aware, the radio has lost it's credibility. The kids are figuring out that there are other bands out there, beside what we pump across the airwaves at them. We need to entice them back. If you want a single, and this pile of cash says you do, then you'll do what you can to save this dying medium. Hell, you work in the word "radio" and we'll double what we're giving you." Come on, the song even SOUNDS like a PSA for the International Radio Marketing Council...Track 7 - Sounds like a Pepsi commercial.Track 8 - Ugh. Wait, wasn't this Track 5?Track 9 - Sappy, but ok. Sounds like they actually put effort into the lyrics. Thumbs up.Track 10 - Not remotely original, but alright.Track 11 - Interesting sound. Good beat. Correct me if i'm worng, but was that a semi-Pagan reference there? That would be a bold move, for which i'd applaud them, if in fact it is. Not that i'm Pagan or anything, but hey, its a religiously positive, non-Christian reference that doesn't involve Marilyn Manson, and that takes guts. Especially for radio-loving girls bands.Track 12 - Laid back. Almost has a jazzy, lounge feel.Track 13 - Produced by former Ace of Base member? Bubbly, upbeat, not too bad.Track 14 - Written and produced by Avril Lavigne...Track 15 - WOW! A RELATIVELY CELTIC-SOUNDING SONG FROM A RELATIVELY CELTIC BAND!! And instrumental, too - big thumbs up! In fact, maybe that's the key.Whatever. Long-winded, i know, but fair. This album didn't turn me off to the Corrs completely, but i don't have very high hopes now.Flame away, kiddies.</review_text>
I live in Buffalo and I'm a big prog rock fan; so when I saw this CD at the library, I knew I had to give it a free listen.But make no mistake - this CD under-delivers on many levels.I always wanted Asia to be a great band - it had my favorite guitar player (Steve Howe), a top-shelf drummer (Carl Palmer), and a proven bass player/vocalist who was up to the task (John Wetton).  But there was always a bit too much "pop", simplicity and repetition in their music to totally engage me.  Hey, progressive rock is mostly about "different", complexity and change, right?  Asia was a progressive-pop band (akin to the later albums of Todd Rundgren's Utopia) that made good music, but didn't really pioneer much of anything.Same with this CD.  There's little here that's new or better than the studio versions of the songs.  Palmer's long drum solo got boring after a while.  Steve's acoustic solos can be found on other Yes recordings, and done much better there  -  here, the recording quality is so bad that it sounds like he's playing tuned rubber bands at times.  (Honestly, I remember hearing better fidelity from my old Kenner Close'n'Play!)  O.K., it WAS cool to hear Steve express his pleasure at playing in Buffalo again!  But the so-called "keyboard solo" by Geoff Downs was underwhelming to say the least, and reinforced my suspicion that he was sort of the weak link in this group of otherwise great prog virtuosos.I guess if one loves a band too much, they can blindly overlook some shortcomings on almost any CD by that band, and that's just fine for those people.  However, the OBJECTIVE reality of this CD's value comes creeping in on many other's existing reviews:  namely, the production quality is sub-par (to the point of being annoying at times); the vocals and harmonies are often off-key (you really shouldn't have to wince this much during 79 minutes of music!); this is clearly a single disk album that was issued on 2 disks for some reason; the packaging and liner notes are scant; and the performance just doesn't add much to the studio versions.  This is for Asia completists only.Asia did make a solid 5-star progressive-pop CD with their first studio album.  I love it.  But they never improved upon it, and never stretched out into new territory.  Perhaps this 1982 live recording exposes some of the weaknesses that kept this potential supergroup from going from "good" to "great".Support your local library.  (And in this case, save some cash!)</review_text>
Clipped, petite and looking more like a leather bar Anne Murray, Crow drags out the hits and the `friends' for this all-star live bash. Half the album is standard issue and straight ahead stage sweat with the morning beer-buzz afficiando going it alone without a little help from her friends (All I Wanna Do, Everyday Is a Winding Road, A Change Would Do You Good, Leaving Las Vegas). With only slight variations on these overplayed originals (a sychopantic crowd and some tinkering with the rhythms) Crow's solo chores rarely rate more than a grudging ho-hum. The rest of the album is a parade of snap-on tools (Dixie Chicks, Stevie Nicks, Eric Clapton, Sarah McLachlan, Chrissie Hynde) who easily steal the spotlight from their downhome hash-slinging waitress/host. Reduced to the role of supporting guitarist, Crow butters the toast from the sidelines as femme contemporaries like Nicks (who unravels admirably on Gold Dust Woman), Hynde and McLachlan flounder about the mike in a haphazard hit (Hynde's If It Makes You Happy)-and-miss (McLachlan's The Difficult Kind) headbutt at Crow's hits. But it isn't until Clapton's suspendered, cigar-chomping husk is rolled out to update Cream's White Room that the sour stench of monstrous micalculation reaches it's devastating climax. Fresh from watering the daisies and still in his jammies, Clapton's return to the electric psychedelics of his Paleolithic past  is a fumbling bumbling fiasco unleashed with the grace and finesse of a diarrhetic Brontosaurus. It's horrifying to think that this is what Cream would have sounded like if they hadn't broken up. Thank God for egos. It's almost a relief to hear Richards mindlessly croak his way through the old Stones Exile-era toss-off Happy, as if a cadaverous ex-junkie with the durability of a cockroach and nine lives would be anything but. Besides, Richards provides wonderful comic relief and criticizing his artistic capacity is as futile as pointing out the flaws in the bandages on an Egyptian mummy. The wrapper finds the entire gang, from Spanky Nicks to Buckwheat Clapton, joining hands for a bizarre entreaty with a kindergarten  rendition of Dylan's Tombstone Blues - a fitting finale if there ever was one</review_text>
This album contains only rap and no rock songs.  This was very disappointing to say the least</review_text>
Their new stuff is even worse. But this is still sexist, boring, annoying music at its worst. There are much better artists out there, so why listen to these two untalented rappers</review_text>
This is the #1 Worse Song of 2006 (#2 is "SexyBack" by Justin Timberfake). For real. His voice is awful and I don't know who is worse: James Blunt, Macy Gray, or Shakira. Imagine the three of them doing a performance together on a stage. It would be pure he11</review_text>
Ya, Abomination to God also set it right in his worthy review. I remember the days where this panzy was praised and all of you ate that "One Call Away" and "Right THURRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRRR" garbage. Does 2 stars explain anything? This apparently is equal to that D4L s***, which is actually the lowest of the low. Anyways, didn't I tell you Chingy would die one year after -Jackpot- hit?Now that he's dead, everybodies focused on T-Pain, OH S***!</review_text>
Lonestar didn't really surprise me with their 2001 effort.  I'm Already There and Not A Day Goes By suffers from "Amazed" syndrome.  Amazed's 1999 multi-format mega success is spread all over this album, their wanting to sound like every '80s heavy metal band power ballad.  Did they listen to Monster Ballads 2 too much while making this album in Nashville? I'm Already There comes off as very Diane Warren-ish in its sappy lyrics.  Their wanting to be diverse as a country band is okay, but these songs don't work for them.  These songs are just complete fluff and their other songs are far better than this.</review_text>
Can this be the same D-12 that packed in witty rhymes in a non-serious demeaner? Well, I guess this really does prove they are only a side-show. Eminem has different production, so the group will have different production. Eminem went more serious, now the group is more serious.Besides that, Shady himself (or what is left of what he use to be) is basically a no-show. In any track Eminem's in, it's usually the strongest, and that is the case here; However, that doesn't mean he was great. That means the CD itself is misconfusion, contradiction, and a side-show for Eminem's next CD ("Encore", which was better then this, but not that great overall, as well).D-12 is the commercials to the Eminem Show, everyone's just waiting to get in between them. That's the case here</review_text>
A lot of people are saying that this album is better than their 1st one. That's not saying much because their 1st album was terrible. There was only one direction they could go -- up. It's hard to imagine them doing worse than their first LP. I said this about the Young, Fly, & Flashy album, and the same applies here, so I'll say it again: When the hottest line on your entire album comes from Bow Wow, your album is in serious trouble. But let me balance that statement though. This isn't exactly one of those album you buy when you want lyrical gymnastics. This is simple, bass heavy, crunk music. It's effective in it's purpose, but it's totally generic (the recipe for most party songs). And some of these songs are just flat out horrible. "Stop Callin' Me" isn't only horrible, but it isn't about anything if you're paying attention to the wack lyrics DFB put on it (and whoever wrote the hook should be slapped). And who's idea was it to let Dame Dash (yeah, THAT Dame Dash) scream all over a song (Bricks 4 The High)? I want to know who the guy was that said "yeah, that's a good idea". Dame is doing what he does best, so he's not at fault.....I blame the idiot that put him on the song. "Suckas Come And Try Me" is probably the worst song to come out of the south since Drama dropped his album. And if you ask me, the "White Tee" remix was a step backward from the original. It would help if they could talk about something other than "haters", postin' up on the block (I swear they say that on the album at least 100 times), rims, jewelry, and weed. But expecting them to change up their sound would be silly on my part I guess. Besides, if people buy this, why should they change? That's another story though. In short, the album fails to seperate DFB from the pack. The beats are generic and the rhymes are terrible ("I'll make you 1 2 step like Ciara"? Come on, I could write that in my sleep) And it's hard to tell if there are four rappers or just one because they all sound similar.Once you understand the purpose of this album though, then you can find a few decent tracks, but don't go getting your hopes up just yet. There are only 3 or 4 songs worth hearing. "My Music" is listenable and DFBs put down some decent lyrics that are helped out by Bun B's good appearance. The best beats on the album are on "Don't Play With Me" feat. Three Six Mafia and "Freaky As She Wanna Be". "Don't Play With Me" features production from DJ Paul & Juicy J, so you know it's tight. I love Three Six, so that's my favorite song on the album. And "Freaky As She Wanna Be" will be the second single off the album if they're smart.On Top Of Our Game is good for what it's supposed to be good for (partying and....well, that's it), but not much else. Jermaine Dupri is trying his best to keep his label relevant, but I don't know if this approach is gonna help him any. This album is better than their debut, but that's not really saying much. This should be pretty obvious, but I'll say it anyway. If you're into lyrics, then this isn't for you. If you want crunk beats to bounce to, then this is right up your alley. It depends on your preference, but this listener has heard better crunk music and recommends passing on this one.Standout Tracks: Freaky As She Wanna Be, I Think They Like Me (Remix) feat. JD, Da Brat, & Bow Wow, Don't Play Wit Me feat. Three Six Mafia (My Favorite), and My Music feat. Bun B.</review_text>
I'm surprised this show got past Season 1. Honestly, more talent can be found in my local karaoke bar. This show does NOT discover talent, they produce and market it. It is really demeaning to musicians everywhere. The judges are a joke, I guess the producers tell them what to say. Simon "the jerk" Cowell tries hard to be rude to everyone, hey...he has made a living out of it. Randy Jackson's vocab is limited to "yo", "yeah" and "dawg". Paula, who's the only one who I think deserves to even comment on the singers..unfortunately praises everyone, be it for their performance/energy/character/looks/(fill with any word of your choice). All in all, a total disaster...only in shows this sh*tty, can no-talents like William Hung be hailed as a celebrity. I am shocked people other than the families of those participating would actually spend time and money voting for these posers. On a more positive note, it's good that people don't actually buy the albums, thus resulting in total disappearing acts from Idol winners like Ruben and Fantasia...now we just need the American public to stop tuning in to the shows. Well, hope is all we have, right</review_text>
It is hard to imagine what the American songbook ever did to Rod Stewart that he would decide to degrade it like this, not once, not twice, but three times.  Stewart's decision to approach these shop-worn standards ranks up there with Napoleon's decision to invade Russia during the winter, it is staggeringly ill conceived.The problem, of course, is his voice.  The selection of material seems ideally suited to showcase his limitations as a singer, which are countless.  For starters, he has almost no range at all.  Next, his raspiness has no inherent beauty, and these are songs intended for beautiful voices.  By their very nature, the selections are vehicles for skilled singers, their simplicity allows excellent performers to interpret and express individual perspective.  Stewart, because he is a rock and blues singer, never learned the fundamentals of singing and certainly never developed a mature, expressive voice.  He scratches along the surface of these listless vehicles with the charm of a man skating over ice with sandpaper strapped to his shoes.Banks of strings and fabulously misguided collaborations, (Dolly Parton!), do not mask but highlight what is wrong with this project.  Bear in mind that I like Rod Stewart; he's from Scotland and he's the prototypical Brit blues belter.  If you want to know what he's actually good at, dig out your copy of Jeff Beck's first release, Truth.  Stewart delivers some of the best blue-eyed twelve bar wailing ever recorded.  But that's the problem.  On Truth it was the cigarettes, whisky, and swagger in his voice that made him great - it wasn't about singing technique - it was about authenticity.  Here, the focus is on singing, and his limitations are embarrassingly spotlighted.  Albums like this never get made unless the performer already has name recognition that guarantees sales, nightmares of this stripe could never stand on their own merits.  To be avoided at all cost.</review_text>
I purchased this album because I am a fan of the Last Poets.  Upon listening to the samples provided by Amazon.com, I thought I was getting an album that would contain very similar content to the Last Poets: some great politically charged poetry, perhaps accompanied by some funky beats.  However, when I listened to the whole CD, I was disappointed to find out that the vast majority of the tracks sound the most like "Get Out of the Ghetto Blues."  If more of the tracks had the sound of the title track, this would be a five-star album, in my opinion.  True, Scott-Heron has a lot of great social commentary throughout the album, but not in the form I had hoped for.  I would take the Last Poets' album "This Is Madness" over this particular Scott-Heron album</review_text>
Even as dedicated of a Radiohead fan as I am, I really don't care much for this album. I say thank goodness for "Creep" because we may have never heard from them again (or at least not in the same way) if that song had not become as popular as it did</review_text>
Boo-Wop? haha ok, anyways I bought his through Middle-Piller distro. and it's got a couple of o.k. songs on it. The problem is the singing and the overall production. This is definetely a home-recording on computer deal. The vocals are waaaaay weak. What exactly is a "re-worked" debut album??? I thought once an album was out it was done, set in stone? Apparently not,so mister monster gets to pull a Blitzkid (who changed their first album cover years after it came out!) and take the cheezy way out. A definete step up from bands like Blitzkid,but still in the cellar of rock n roll. Do yourself a favor and buy some good old deathrock from the golden years</review_text>
I really liked this when it came ut on vinyl, but in retrospect, it was the cause, not the music. B. Raitt is grand, G Nash with an excellant Cathedral, J C Young, and the highlight to me We Almost Lost Detroit by the great Gil Scott-Heron. But the second disc is second rate. Edit the filler and it rates higher</review_text>
Generally harmless, except for one very offensive song about siblings that hate each other and hate their parents.  The song is probably funny to ultra-sophisticated, cynical adults.  But the song is totally inappropriate for a four year old.  I wouldn't bring this CD into your house</review_text>
The Movie was bad and unreal and so was the soundtrack, spend your money elsewher</review_text>
I cant believe there are so many positive ratings given to this sub-par Testament release.  Testament must have taken hints from Metallica and tried to attract a different audience.  This is not a horrible album, but compared to any other Testament album, it is easily their worst.  Only the die-hard Testament fan, or those into commercial metal should pick this up.</review_text>
Their new stuff is even worse. But this is still sexist, boring, annoying music at its worst. There are much better artists out there, so why listen to these two untalented rappers</review_text>
Generally harmless, except for one very offensive song about siblings that hate each other and hate their parents.  The song is probably funny to ultra-sophisticated, cynical adults.  But the song is totally inappropriate for a four year old.  I wouldn't bring this CD into your house</review_text>
I'm mean, I know these guys don't have a shred of originality.. Afterall, that make some of the same crappy beats you can put together on piano's and they just got to mess up classic songs also.He's about as good of a musician as he is an actor.This country is just too unoriginal these days</review_text>
Anyone who rates this more than one star has mental deficiencies.Seriously</review_text>
The music of Dowland is wonderful - but Sting isn't up to interpreting it. You can't even distinguish the words half the time, just a jumble of nice sounds from his pretty tenor - he doesn't possess the skills to carry it off. This music has to be interpreted by someone with an ability to express thoughts in heightened language...Sting, for all his merits, hasn't got that in his repertoire yet.It's an exercise in pretention, laughable at times. The letter reading is ridiculous. I love both Sting's voice and Dowland's song, but this CD is a failure.</review_text>
I can't believe I just spent over an hour of my life listening to ten (TEN!!) different mixes of this not too remarkable dance hit. By the third version, my brain turned to jelly. By the fifth, I needed a drink. By the final re-mixed version, my hangover already started to set in. This e.p. is for DJ's and masochists only.- Tom Rya</review_text>
Great cd. Imus in the morning recommended highly and the I-man was not wrong. One of the best cd's I've owned in years. I listen to a lot of Buffett, James Taylor, Delbert McClinton, and this cd places high in these ranks</review_text>
After souring to dizzying heights with their first four albums (a feat achieved by only a handful of bands) the inevitable fall seems to have come on this disc. The Bunnymen built their reputation on moody, psychedelic concept pieces that culminated in Ocean Rain. For this release the band moves into more 'mainstream' territory, eschewing album-wide cohesiveness for a more radio friendly approach. Unfortunately these lightweight songs don't work as well as the tantalizingly obscure sound they abandoned. If you're new to the Bunnymen you're probably better served by checking out their first four albums (Crocodiles, Heaven Up Here, Porcupine and Ocean Rain) or skipping forward to their more recent efforts Evergreen and Flowers</review_text>
Metallica never recovered from the death of Cliff Burton, as this album is prime evidence of.  He helped to bring depth to the songs that is not present here.  Also, Newstead only gets one song on this album, which is ironically the best song on the album.  In the history of Metallica, this album marks the transition from artistic song writing to commercial</review_text>
I received emails about delaying my order three times. Since it showed that the product was available, I didn't understand why I had to wait less than two months to get my order. I was so disappointed by the Amazon this time! Doing business like that, I am not sure how long you will survive</review_text>
Hooba...stank...stinks and will always stink. I don't know about the rest of the CD, but listening to The Reason is about as pleasant as sticking your hand into a running garbage disposal.  I'm not a perfect perrrrsssonn. Egad</review_text>
After hearing "I'm N Luv (Wit a Stripper)" I don't know why anyone would want to buy and listen to this CD in its entirety. I'm not going to type a bunch of long paragraphs about why this CD sucks. This CD is a waste and T-Pain is illiterate. There! I said it in one sentence. Holllaaa</review_text>
Not exactly the "vaults" blowing open, as stated in the promo.  These are mostly leftovers and one-offs from the late 1990s, when the group was on hiatus from serious recording.  That's why the set is overloaded with forgettable jingles from television shows, literary journals and graphic design firms.Whats good is the material that was recorded for albums and subsequently rejected, such as "Reprehensible", "Rest Awhile" and "Certain People I Could Name".  But there are too few of these real songs, and they'd have fit a lot better on that long-awaited b-sides collection from their major label career</review_text>
Unfortunately, I forked out $14 for this CD.  Upon first listen I am extremely dissapointed.  Being a huge fan of SP for years this album offers none of the harmonic resonance of Green's previous work.  Also gone are the magnificant beats we have come to expect from this artist.  Use this as Sunday background music on a rainy day; but do not expect to get the party started with this album...</review_text>
Guys...it's not that GOOD. I have the album on my computer, and I gave it a few listens, but...it has no substance. It's not interesting or anything new. It's catchy. And irritating, after more than a song or two. That's all ("Bandages" is enjoyable once in a while, I will concede).If you're looking for catchy and poppy (and there's nothing wrong with that), then buy it. If you want something new and original - don't.And if you want good indie dance/electronica-type music go for something like The Faint, The Bravery, or Le Tigre.</review_text>
I love his voice, but the arrangements are way too complex and stilted.  There are about 12 key changes in every song.  The melodies are buried so far beneath his reinterpretations that one can barely recognize the songs. I feel these affectations detract from the songs.  While his vocal gymnastics are very impressive, the result just isn't enjoyable to listen to (unless you are a voice student or professional singer)</review_text>
that this great music sounds so awful on this CD.I wanted an introduction to Kate Bush's music, and this CD seemed a very good way to start.  When I put it on, I couldn't believe how muffled and dull it sounded.  I could swear I'm listening to the music through a wall of cotton.I went to the existing reviews here on Amazon, and, sure enough, Ferrara Brain Pan's spot-on review stated exactly what I was feeling upon listening to these recordings.It is inexcusable that an artist of Bush's stature is represented in such poor technical fashion - and a shame, considering how good the songs are.Another little beef is that the CD clocks in at under 49 minutes - in other words, there's room for 30 more minutes of music, which I'm certain could have been well-used, considering the vastness of her catalogue.I will be looking for the remastered individual albums, but if I didn't know how good Kate Bush was outside of the context provided by this butchered collection, I wouldn't bother buying any more of her material.Shame on EMI for allowing this.  I give it two stars (instead of one) simply because the music is so very good</review_text>
I liked the Santana - Steven Tyler song/video. Since I found out about the sneaky root kit this software installs and the idea of no free use of something I buy within reasonable means - I wont buy the CD.Want to make sure that Sony loses money in this effort - will teach them a lesson. I have been burned by Sony's proprietary [...] before on other items, so I will stay away.</review_text>
This CD is 100% pure junk! The CD is sung by KIDS! They have high-pitched voices that aren't even good enough to win the school talent show. The other singers are ADULTS who have voices that aren't anything impressive, either. If the songs were sung by the original singer it would of been better.Stop this s****y music!</review_text>
I got the cd with only disc 2...it was unopened and had 2 copies of disc two it was rediculus...im happy onme of my friends could make me a copy of the first one...</review_text>
Do not buy this cd, the first two reviews said this is a good cd. NOPE. I'll tell ya the real about this cd. I believe this was 305's first cd, and I don't see how this cd was ever in mass production. While It does have a few decent cuts most of this cd belongs to a different artist. 305 got much of the material for this cd on Techmaster P.E.B's masterpiece Bass Computer. Any one who has both cd's can tell. If your looking for bass, you'll find it here. But you can find knock with any bass artist. I give this cd one star for biting Techmaster</review_text>
Maybe its just me but the piano is out of tune badly enough that it should not have been recorded. I had to force myself to finish listening to the concerto and did not even bother with the rest. Sad piece of work</review_text>
Trash, and irrated plus the good albums ya'll give them 0's.so now I'ma let the world know</review_text>
although prince is an utter genious! this cd is merely a boring contract filler. i suggest you buy one of his older albums or the new album "musicology" instead</review_text>
FLCL is THE WORST anime of all time, and possibly the worst thing to come out of Japan since the Pearl Harbor attacks, and the soundtrack is just as bad, if not worse.  Its nothing more than J-pop mixed with bad Japanese rock.  Bad guitar playing, boring drum beats, and inaudible bass; you've heard one Pillows song, you've heard them all.  Only "otakus" with no life love this s*** (like Matthew G. Salisbury).If you want good Japanese music, go for King's Evil.PS, that album cover is possibly the worst ever made</review_text>
Just listening to the samples of this new remix of "GOLD:35th Anniversary Edition ~ The Carpenters" I found it to be in my opinion sadly remixed very badly. Certainly not a tribute to the excellent talent Of Karen Carpenter and Richard as well. I wonder what Richard was thinking when he remixed these songs? As another review noticed and I agree with, is the bass on some is so loud it almost drowns out the pure excellence of Karen's deep resounding truly perfect voice. This is not a CD you want to get if you really want to appreciate the true pure sound of The Carpenters. The older CDs (if still in production or if you can find them used) "Carpenters Classics 25th Anniversary" a 2 CD disc 98:04 minute Collection remastered digitally, is a much better pick. Especially for those who remember The Carpenters when Karen was still alive and the original arrangements were nothing to mess with. The other CD's worth finding of The Carpendters especially if you like the Talent of Karen's deep resounding perfect voice, would be The CD "Voice Of The Heart" This is a hautingly beautiful collection of Love songs by Karen who lets each song touch your Heart and Soul making you feel as if you were right there as she sings each song. The other one I would highly recommend, if Christmas is your Holiday, would be "Carpenters Christmas Portrait"... "Special Edition digital version....Celebrating 70 continuious minutes of the Seasons best..." with Karen and Richard. There are 34 Carpenters songs as timeless as their sound,and 11 performances heard on this Holiday CD for the first time. These CDs are all the songs you fell in love with the first time you heard Karen sing. These are the arrangements so beautifully done with her and Richard. This new remix maybe OK if you have not been familiar with how wonderful the original songs The Carpenter's recorded and later remastered-Not Remixed- sounded. For this reason I give this 35th Anniversary remix a 2 star rating. These older CDs are how The Carpenders really won over their fans, took the Music Industry by storm and gave a generation of Music lovers reason to Love The Carpenders music and the sound they gave each song. Talent that can still win over anyone who truly appreciates the timeless talents only The Carpenters could deliver. As I more or less said in my Title for this review and taken from an old saying "if it ain't broke don't fix it!" or in this case Don't Remix it!</review_text>
I just want to slap who ever keeps coming out with these.HARD.Okay,there are some song that deserve this.To be ruined by off key 10-year-olds with annoying high squeaky voices.But come ON!They KILLED 'My Immortal'!That is a beautiful song!I'm listning to it as I write this!And also,little 6-year-olds cannot properly appreciate it!And,let's face it,'My Immortal' is not exactly a kiddie song.I mean,do you want your little 4-year-old boy listning to 'Your face it haunts my once pleasant dreams,Your voice it chased away all the sanity in me,These wounds won't seem to heal,This pain is just too real,There's just too much that time cannot erase'?Please,STOP BUYING THIS CRAP!Not only do they ruin the great songs of our generation,but they also put on some really innapropriate songs.I mean,come ON!Go look up the lyrics to 'Toxic'!That is DEFINATLY not a good song for little children.Of corse,the only reason any child would like this is because their older sibling listens to it.Then someone should sit them down and explain why this is NOT for them.Die Kidz Bop</review_text>
I was (and still am) a huge fan of "Mr. Show".  It was the only reason I kept my HBO subscription.  It's hard for me to believe that the same talent that created "Mr. Show" produced this weak offering.  Might be the least funny comedy CD I've ever heard.  Virtually all the material in the album has been done before, and much better, by other comedians.  Most of the bits just lay there and die.  Mr. Cross seems to realize this and tries to make up for it by saying f*ck a lot.  Sorry, it just doesn't work.Don't waste you money on this one.  Get the "Mr. Show" DVDs instead and forget this ever existed.</review_text>
Following on from the fantastic 'The Duel' Allison Moorer's latest release 'Getting Somewhere' is a massive, massive  disappointment.Quite simply the material on 'Getting Somewhere' is weak and gutless.On the rare occasions Moorer tries to emulate the beauty and feel of 'The Duel' - such as on Hallelujah & New Years Day - Earle rips the heart out of the material with such an amateurish, pedestrian and thin production that you feel cheated ! Business and pleasure rarely mix and Moorer should take a long, hard look at this release and give serious consideration to re-installing RS Field next time around.If Moorer wants a guitar groove that burns , drums that drive and vocals that mesmerise then Earle is simply not the man for the job.Moorer is a fantastic talent who has one of the finest female voices of any genre (she can write a mean song too ! ) . This CD showcases none of her abilities and should be consigned to the bargain bins immediately</review_text>
When it comes to Big Star's 70's output, you can call me a HOPELESS FANBOY, because after listening to In Space, it seems that ONLY a hopeless fanboy would think that thirty-some-years later, exactly one-half of the classic Big Star lineup could---or in forever difficult Alex Chilton's case, WOULD be so inclined---to attempt to recapture the lightning-in-a-bottle transcedent pop magic that made those 70s discs so great.  This disc has WAY MORE in common with Chilton's oft-times difficult, mostly self-indulgent solo work than with any of Big Star's previous fascinating pop near-perfection. While I'll admit that I have enjoyed a good chunk of Chilton's solo work, (in a slightly guilty, rolling-my-eyes, "Oh...that Alex!" sorta way...) my musical sensibilities are somehow offended by the fact that THIS group and that THIS particular collection of songs are presented as "Big Star."  In Space is connected musically to the original Big Star by little more than the fact that two of the same guys in THIS BAND were in THAT BAND.  If you don't expect much, you won't be disappointed.</review_text>
This album is way overated, let me tell you why.Wack MC:MF Doom is a bad rapper, not the worst, just bad. He can flow but his rymes are weak, corny, and somtimes it doesnt make sense at all. The corniest ryme I heard was- "We rock the house like rock 'n roll/ got more soul Than a sock with a hole." LMAO! It gets worse "Take it from the Tec-9 holder/ They bit and dont know they neck shine from shinola" What is he talking about??? He is not a genius MC, Nas is, he is even worse than Aesop Rock. Which they rap with words and dont even make any sense.Filler:This Cd has too much filler, they have like 10 songs that last only 50 secs. Some of them is not even neccasary.Average Beats:The beats are either average or just sucks. I can make better beats on Fruity Loops. However Track 22 "Rhinestone Cowboy" had the best beat on the entire album. The beat was hot to tell you the truth, but that only gives it one star.Overall this album sucks, just download "Rhinestone Cowboy" and call it a day. I think Madlib can make good beats its just that he didnt show it here. I dont recommend this album, if you want a good album get Mos Def "Black on Both Sides" It 10x better than this</review_text>
Do you know why this double CD is often in the bargain basement?  SImply because it is an inferior product.  For some very odd reason, the compiler at the record company decided to put 13 live songs instead of the studio versions that we all remember.  For all we know, it may have been a copyright problem. I bought this for my Dad about 5 years ago, but we were both unaware of the live recordings until we played it. The live recordings on this CD are dismal and not related to the awesome "Hot August Night".Fortunately for me,  I own the right Neil Diamond CD's which contain the studio versions.  These are still available . The first is called "12 Greatest Hits" (A black and white photo a young Neil), and the second is called "12 Greatest Hits Volume 2" (a colour photo of Neil sitting on a sofa).  Both of these contain all the studio versions - and not one live recording in sight!!!Just released is a new compilation called Neil Diamond GOLD, as part of the GOLD series but I do not know if it too contains the dreadful live recordings. All I know is that it is missing a lot of key tracks</review_text>
..of little teenage white girls trying to sound like thirty-year-old black women.  First it was Britney Spears, then it was Christina Aguilera, now it's Joss Stone.  The former at least have something going for them; Britney's first album had catchy beats, and even though Aguilera's style is incredibly trashy, she does have enormous vocal power and range if she would only stop trying so hard.Try as I might, though, I just don't understand the appeal of Joss Stone.  I didn't buy this album; a friend of mine likes it and I've had to listen to it enough times to want to rip my ears right out of my head.  I don't see what is fresh or original about ripping off Janis Joplin and the generally much more talented black soul singers.  Maybe it's the Rick Astley effect: you don't expect THAT voice coming out of THAT face.  You don't expect a squinty little teenaged blonde to growl and screech like a deranged cat.  But that effect can only take you so far, as Rick Astley himself found out.This album is not only an unpleasant listening experience because of the stupid songs ("Dirty Man" basically just repeats "You're a dirty man..." with very minor variations, along with a great deal of unnecessary caterwauling) and the nails-down-a-chalkboard voice of Stone herself - it's a depressing reminder of how low our culture has sunk, when it can't come up with any culture based on its own heritage but slavishly copycats things from another culture that seems more "cool".  Stone, like Aguilera and Spears, tries to sing like an older black woman, a woman with soul - an Aretha Franklin or a Gloria Gaynor.  But Stone et al. sound like little girls clattering around in grown-up shoes.  They haven't been alive long enough to live similar experiences of the women they are trying to imitate.  Their singing rings hollow to me, show-offy and fake.Stone could rival Aguilera in shameless and unnecessary vocal theatrics, though she has nowhere near Aguilera's sweetness or range.  Her voice might be described as "smoky" by some; to me it sounds gravelly, sandpapery, and as pleasant as scraping your knees on asphalt.I don't understand why anyone in the right mind would willingly put themselves through the ordeal of listening to this CD, much less enjoy it.  I guess fake is good enough for some people.  It makes me chuckle, though, to hear people rave about her voice as "authentic".If you're looking for soul, try Macy Gray.  She's for real.  Try the hugely talented but woefully ignored Tasmin Archer and Karen Rodriguez.  Those are fresh, authentic voices that will make you realize what a load of bollocks Joss Stone and her ilk truly are.The only white woman I have ever heard who could sing like she was black was Linda Ronstadt.  Go back and listen to a Ronstadt classic like "Hurts So Bad" and compare it to this modern-day drivel.  Ronstadt sang with real feeling, real knowledge, real pain - worlds apart from this fake plastic imitation of soul that seems to be the rule and not the exception these days.I gave this one star because there is no zero-stars option.  Joss Stone is just a musical Chav, an unconvincing shoplifter of another, better culture</review_text>
I WOULDN'T KNOW I NEVER GOT MY CD AND ITS BEEN OVER TWO MONTH</review_text>
I admit to being curious about Rihanna's music because like a previous poster from Brooklyn stated " I was not trying to become a Rihanna fan!!".  I was really pleasantly surprised by the quality of this disc and although Rihanna is no vocal powerhouse, the songs on the disc were produced in such a way as to mask this fact and create more than a few enjoyable songs.I really loved her lead single, PON DE REPLAY and since I don't listen to the radio, it never grew old to me because I heard it so infrequently. It's almost an instantly classic dance track with its hypnotic beats & fun lyrics.The other standout tracks to me are:HERE I GO AGAIN - like the island beats of the music and again, her vocals are utilized well on the trackWILLING TO WAIT - more of a straight r&b track with great beats that again, work well with her vocalsLET ME - has an interesting "go-go" beat mixed with a middle eastern soundRUSH - again, a great dance trackIt's unfortunate that her vocal skills are so slight because there are 2 ballads that although featuring very pretty music production, ultimately fail as singles because she is such a weak vocalist: THE LAST TIME - Rihanna attempts vocal runs that are way out of her league and NOW I KNOW - although she has moments where her voice sounds pretty, this song would've been a big hit for a stronger singer.Honestly, I'd recommend this disc to others who are curious about Rihanna's music and to those who like Ashanti - ultimately they are cut from the same cloth as "artists".  They are able to produce enjoyable singles (through the magic of ProTools) but don't do much in the way of live vocal performances</review_text>
This is nothing like the classic dead you've heard about.  Far from it.  The sound is too polished.  &quot;Alabama Get Away&quot; and &quot;Althea&quot; are okay but the rest is junk.  I think most dead heads would agree that this is not the one to look for if you just want some of the Deads' best music.  Really... The Grateful Dead with a polished sound??  Just doesn't seem to fit.  Save your money for one of their greatest hits compilations,plus American Beauty, Worjing Man's Dead, Europe '72 and &quot;Dead Set&quot;</review_text>
Sorry, Bill!Poor lyrics and only fair production have made this a most disappointing purchase.  The guitar playing is adequate, but not good enough to save this material.  I hope Bill spends a little more time on the thought process before bringing out his next material.</review_text>
First of all FLOETIC was a brilliant album and after I heard SUPERSTAR on the radio I thought FLO'OLOGY was going to be a classic too. I was wrong. This album lacks originality, its inferior to be precise. The first time I popped this CD into the system, I found myself being friends with the skip forward button. The length of the records is despicableThis CD is not worth having....the only track that stands out for me is SUPERSTAR and I think COMMON is amazing</review_text>
I bought this album because I loved the title song.  It's such a great song, how bad can the rest of the album be, right?  Well, the rest of the songs are just filler and aren't worth the money I paid for this. It's either shameless bubblegum or oversentimentalized depressing tripe. Kenny Chesney is a popular artist and as a result he is in the cookie cutter category of the Nashville music scene.  He's gotta pump out the albums so the record company can keep lining their pockets while the suckers out there keep buying this garbage to perpetuate more garbage coming out of that town.  I'll get down off my soapbox now.  But country music really needs to get back to it's roots and stop this pop nonsense.  What country music really is and what it is considered to be by mainstream are two different things.</review_text>
I've been down for Monica since the beginning; but now I am FINISHED, I love Monica's voice, but whats up with all these singers wanting to be rappers...WTF!!! I want the soulfoul Monica from the first CD, "Sideline Ho" ARE YOU SERIOUS!!! again WTF!! Could someone please come out with a soulful mature CD, cause this one aint even close.</review_text>
I got this CD after seeing what I remembered as a decent video on Fuse TV.  Maybe I was half-asleep, because after listening to this ho-hum entry into the world of emo copycats, I can't even remember or recognize which song it was.  This album is ultimately forgettable-- better off listening to any Jimmy Eat World CD again and again, which is actually an enjoyable experience</review_text>
If you are looking for boring, lifeless adult contemporary music, then this CD is for you.  If you are looking for a great guitar CD, this isn't it.  I had such high hopes for this CD after the Robert Johnson CDs and the Cream reunion, but all winning streaks must come to an end, and Clapton's comes to a screeching halt with this.  Of all the Eric Clapton CDs that I like, this isn't one of them.  I'm glad Clapton is now in a happy place (and deservedly so), but this CD just doesn't do it for me</review_text>
many people have judged this album as a masterpiece i know. But to me this is just a collection of boring ambient sounds. This is unusual of me because i usually like ambient music. Another double ambient album - Seti - Pharos - is a real masterpiece.It is a real pity because the cover of this album is really stunning - but - you know - never judge the cover by its album.Please if you have any feedback to this write to - carlogiova@yahoo.it - i would be happy to share thoughts.</review_text>
Kate Bush's second album, "Lionheart", may be the weakest in her catalog.  Its clear Bush did not want to fall into the trap of constructing "The Kick Inside Part Two", and instead reaches in a number of different directions, some successful, some less so.Musically, the album takes stabs at ballads similar to the first record ("In Search of Peter Pan", "In the Warm Room"), a more pop structure ("Wow"), rhythmic shifts ("Don't Put Your Foot on the Heartbrake") an almost shuffle ("Fullhouse") and a gret rock song ("Hammer Horror").  Lyrically, Bush has added a level of sensuality to her work ("Symphony in Blue") and shows no sign of shying away from controversial subjects ("Kashka from Baghdad").The problem is that it doesn't hang together well to my mind-- admittedly, my rating for the album is in many ways relative to Bush's other work, no album with the absolutelyu amazing "Kashka from Baghdad" can be all that bad, and certainly "Symphony in Blue" is strong enough to stop you in your tracks, but the album just doesn't work for me.  For early Bush, try her debut ("The Kick Inside") or the stunning "Never For Ever"</review_text>
The music on this album is performed so exquisitely; the orchestrations so subtle and yet illuminating, that one is almost tempted to forget what a "What for?" musical this is.Donna Murphy plays the title character of Fosca, a hugely unprepossessing woman who suffers from more maladies than there are stars in the sky. She lives in a remote miltary outpost where she falls in love with the handsome, virile Giorgio. Giorgio in turn is having a torrid affair with the beautiful, but vapid Clara, a married woman back home. However from the time Giorgio comes into Fosca's sphere, she becomes this relentless succubus in her pursuit of him. She shows up EVERYWHERE he happens to be; her ferocity matched only by her inexhaustive capacity for self-pity. To depict Fosca musically, Sondheim comes up with the most monochromatic score of his career. Everything is SO lugubrious, dark, portentous, tragic; punctuated by militaristic strains (with snare drums)because the soldiers like to...umm...march.  In the end, Giorgio is worn down enough by Fosca's attentions that he succumbs. He believes he has fallen in love with her, shortly after which she...dies.As I mentioned earlier, the material is beautifully performed (Marin Mazzie and Jere Shea render the opening "Happiness" with a marvelous sense of delicacy and sensuality. Donna Murphy evokes the proper pathos in the haunting "Loving You."), but you come away wondering what the point of it all is. If Sondheim is trying to show us how love is largely a chronic disease, then he succeeds admirably</review_text>
I am at a loss to hear what people appreciate about this CD.  We were barely able to make it through one listening.  This is a classic example of a CD that NEVER would have been produced had the artist (using the term very loosely) not already been famous for something besides music.  The lack of talent and originality on this CD is apalling.  It only gets a star because that's the lowest rating.  I want my money back</review_text>
I should first state that I am a huge EJ fan. His music has been extremely important to me over the years. He is, without a doubt, a genius ... I would go so far as to call him the Mozart of our times.But, Elton can also write bloated, self-indulgent tripe, and if you ask me, this album belongs in that bucket. I give it 2 stars just because of SSMLT, one of his all-time greats. I never cease to be blown away by that song. But the rest of this album? Booooooring!!!</review_text>
The second CD was scratched and hence I cannot play it. I would appreciate it if you would send me another one and also include the information needed to return the damaged one sent to me.Thanks.Jeann</review_text>
Am I The only ones who actually liked nelly's first album, I Thought it had charm, style, grandier to me and kind of scale and kind of importance, you thought it mean something, but this is just a lame gimmick from the start, I Mean there are some moments and some good songs (including the sexy and very funny music video hot in herre with cedric the entertainer), but the rest are just horrible, there is nothing else about this album that I Can engage with nor cared about and who cares?Country Grammer was funny and good, this one's an utter disaster.One of the worst albums of the decade.</review_text>
Nelly could make the wort rapper sound like a lyricyst, and how dare him to diss KRS-one, he just said the truth and he really did not diss him on Number 1, he just added to why he sucks. Lets face it, all his songs are basically dumb and and really don,t have much texture involved. And how funny is it that his friends really have no skill and they are all over this album it is just laughable. If you buy this album, you throw away good money. Unless you like bubblegum rap. This is more for a teen white girl who wants to be cool, but lets face it ,its played out</review_text>
I first became a fan of the Gorillaz with their excellent 2nd CD, Demon Days. The interesting thing about this band is that their music is so strange and so "out there" that when you first hear one of their CD's...it sounds like complete garbage. But once you listen again and again, you start to like it more and more. Eventually you end up really liking the CD.That was the case with Demon Days. After enjoying that CD fully, I thought I should check out the first Gorillaz CD, and  I didn't like it all that much.There just seems to be very little actual songs on the CD. Way too much of it sounds like complete filler. There were a couple throwaway songs on Demon Days, but most of the stuff on that CD was great. Here, we've got songs that are just...boring. Nothing happens. I was waiting for the melody or a cool tune to occur in some of these songs, but it never happens. You just listen to 2-D whining into the microphone with dull beats in the background. (Such as on songs like New Genious, Man Research, and Starshine.) Some songs are nothing but beats with no lyrics at all, sometimes sounding just like static noise. Songs like this, such as Double Bass, are cool for a minute or two, but the song drags on for practically 5 minutes. It gets boring. Other songs, like 5/4, M1 A1, and Rock the House are catchy at first, but just don't have staying power. They get old. 5/4 got annoying quickly, M1 A1 and Punk lost their appeal quickly, and Rock the House is another song that would have been better if they cut about 2 minutes out of it. And songs like Latin Simone are just annoying.The remixes of 19-2000 and Clint Eastwood that end the CD are also fairly forgettable, although 19-2000's kind of catchy on the first couple listens.There are some good songs here, though. Tomorrow Comes Today, Clint Eastwood, Gravity, 19-2000, and Left Hand Suzuki Method are cool songs. Slow Country's kind of cool, too. And Dracula's got an awesome, almost haunting sound to it, and it's really absorbing. Although it too, unfortuantely, loses its tune and turns to repetitive and aimless techno noise about half way through it. This small collection of good songs, though, is surrounded by a huge collection of filler tracks. Much of this CD just isn't really that good.I don't know...this CD just seemed empty. Very few meaningful tracks, lots of filler, and some really annoying and repetitive songs. Some good songs were stretched to almost 5-minutes long, mostly given filler techno beats that ruin the songs. Clocking in at 72 minutes, (which makes it 22 minutes(!)longer than Demon Days) this CD was loaded with filler and just not enough good stuff. People interested in The Gorillaz should pick up their superior follow-up, Demon Days, instead of this one. If I listened to this debut CD first, I probably wouldn't have ended up liking this band very much. The good news about this is that the Gorillaz have not hit a sophmore slump; their CDs are getting better, not worse. That is a great sign for the future of this awesome band.</review_text>
Understand, I love Springsteen.  Born to Run is my second favorite album of all time.  I have seen him live over a dozen times.  I personally think he is the single most important American rock and roll artist ever (with apologies to Elvis, Chuck Berry and Dylan).  I even loved Nebraska, so don't tell me it's an E-Street band thing or a rock versus folk thing, but this album is unlistenable.Some reviewers have called it beautiful and powerful.  That's rubbish.  There is a complete absence of melody on this record, as was the case with much of The Ghost of Tom Joad album (with a huge exception being "Youngstown" - a great song).  The apparently willful attempt to alter his singing style to sound like Woody Guthrie or Jimmy Rodgers is just frightening.  Dylan could pull it off, Bruce just disappoints.  But it's the songs and lack of anything remotely resembling melody that makes this record a failure.  Believe, I listened to Devil & Dust 10-15 times in hopes of finding what I am apparently missing.  I couldn't. I thought The Rising was a nice album.  I even liked the Devils & Dust solo tour (Bruce is a powerful performer, and maybe even more commading when it's just him on stage), but I doubt this CD will ever find its way back into the player</review_text>
look i really despise bush. he's an idiot. and i know people are gonna have different opinions on that. but what i wish wouldnt happen is people giving this 5 stars cause its against bush and they agree. seriously the music is really not good. however if you do buy it make sure you watch the DVD eh? its got a great will farrel skit on it. 2 stars for that and the few decent songs on here (ie no w by the ministry)thats all</review_text>
Bob James - the mastermind of smooth Jazz. "H", "Touchdown", "Grand Piano Cannyon". Eternal pieces of Art. Brave and thoughtful new directions in Jazz. We owe him a lot.But the recent releases of Fourplay -including "X" - don't meet my expectations at all: predictable, repetitive, overproduced Computer-music.The typical Fourplay sound squeezed out like a lemon in another CD.Larrys guitar playing takes a nice direction on "Tournabout" - but then the song falls back again to old routine. "Screenplay" is a good one (one of two songs that were done by Bob). The rest, hmm... some nice solos constricted in predictabiltiy.Don't get me wrong, I like all of the guys. Every single member of the group has done great things in the past.So - a bit more breveness,  Yes Please</review_text>
It is bad! As much  as I like "10 new songs", this one disappointed me a lot.</review_text>
Kate Moss?  That gawddamn rollerskate song?  Oh, no.  The spoken tracks are equally repelling.  There is really no atmosphere to this album</review_text>
This album is lame as hell but next to the air pollution on the airwaves today, this aint too bad thats why it gets a 2. Right before female rappers(there's a few exceptions), I hate all little kid rappers. Even when I was a kid. I don't like anything on this album, I still got the tape and it hasn't "krossed" my mind to even cop the cd. If you like this kind of stuff, or you loved "jump" back in the day then I guess this is for you</review_text>
I was very excited to hear that this new Muppets Holiday offering was coming!  The previous two Christmas albums ("A Christmas Together" w/ John Denver & "A Muppet Christmas Carol") have long been family favorites at hour house in December.  However, this time I am disappointed.Most of the songs performed on this cd include voices not done by the original puppeteers that made them famous.  I realize it is impossible to perfectly duplicate the voices to match the puppeteers that are no longer with us.  But, to focus on these voices so much (Kermit, Rowlf, Dr. Teeth, Statler & Waldorf, The Swedish Chef) in this album, only produces a disappointing reminder that the "Muppets" we grew up with are long gone.Maybe I am being a little hard on this cd.  But, there are plenty of Muppets they could have focused on for this project that are still performed in the original voices (Robin, Sam, Honeydew & Beaker, Rizzo, Louzeland, etc).  Those voices added to those of Ganzo, Miss Piggy and Fozzie would have made for a more familiar feel.There are a couple of good cuts on the album.  One is "Merry Christmas" by Pepe.  The other is "Santa Baby" by Miss Piggy.Sadly, over all I can not recommend this cd.</review_text>
Another torrent of mild tripe from everyone's "favourite" DJ, Tiesto.What on earth is he going to do when the supply of inane, pastel-coloured eurovomit dance music runs out?When I think about the number of times I've heard him touted as "World's Number One Best Voted DJ" or "DJ Mag Top 100 Finalist", you'd start to think that the man can actually mix records, when in fact rather than mix them, he tends to grind them together roughly into a nightmarish aural paste then reconfigure them violently in new, unusual and horrendously nauseating forms.  I can absolutely confirm this. I have had the startling and displeasing experience of witnessing it live.The sad truth of the matter is, that there are any number of drug-addicted fluoro-pants-wearing 16 year old ravers out there, and all are quite willing to buy boring rubbish like this.  Or at least all are prepared to ask their mum and dad to buy it for them for xmas.I sign off in disgust</review_text>
Don't get me wrong with the 2 stars some songs here are really good.TrafficURAdagio For StringsNyanaThose songs are just great and the best off the album.But songs likeWalking On CloudsSweet MiseryLove Comes AgainForever Todaycan only be enjoyed so little times but they are good though.  No song here is annoying in the beginning and I see a lot of 5 stars and either they are just suckers for Dj Tiesto or they wrote the review as soon as they got it.  Cause after months of having this you will see yourself skipping to songs just to hear the good stuff.Dj Tiesto shows he does a good job working with vocals but for a number 1 Dj I expect to be hearing his stuff for a long time before getting annoyingVerdict: 2.8 out of 5.0 Not bad for the first 20 listens but damn I could have enjoyed it much more</review_text>
Periodically throughout Eric Clapton's solo career, his music mellows out to such an extent that it barely resembles rock 'n' roll.  His self-titled debut got his solo career off to an unimpressive start, and his most recent offering, &quot;Reptile,&quot; makes adult contemporary sound exciting.  A similar weak period occurred in the late 1970s through the early 1980s, with &quot;Backless,&quot; &quot;Another Ticket,&quot; and &quot;Money &amp; Cigarrettes&quot; all competing for title of Clapton's Most Forgetable Album.  The country is mellow, the blues are mellow, and even the rockers are mellow.  This is easy listening for classic rock fans</review_text>
The only thing you can say about today's music is that it's disguisting, gross, and made by recording artists who drop out of school and seem to think that a life as a rap music artists is so cool, until they get shot.  Every copy of this CD should be burned</review_text>
I got this album because Obie Trice did some great stuff on the 8 Mile soundtrack, so I figured I'd check out what else he'd done.  This album just doesn't live up to that.</review_text>
This is anything but soothing. The tone is too high pitched; nothing like the deep bass of crashing waves along the rocky Carmel coastline that I was hoping for. I did buy the twofer and got the Ocean Surf CD by Dan Gibson and found it much more relaxing, even though it isn't a tumbling surf sound. I was able to fall asleep... which was my goal. Now if I could only return Ocean Waves.</review_text>
Shannon Lawson is capable of a much better album.  I saw him down in Nashville when he was with the Galoots, and it was amazing!  If they were to put out a CD I'm sure it would be one of my favorites.  Shannon has a voice and a talent for bluegrass music and that's what Nashville should have let him do on his first solo CD.  Instead they gave it this generic, overproduced sound, leaving Shannon sound like everyone else.  With the way bluegrass is selling these days, it's a shame that Shannon couldn't showcase his enormous talent in the proper arena..</review_text>
I was a huge fan of the jam , but Ive grown to despise Paul Weller and this CD strengthens my view. This is a covers cd and hasn't got a patch on albums like all mod cons or sound affects.With paul weller everything is about a  quick buck and ripping off a loyal fan base , with over a dozen jam compilations ,rarities, box sets and dvd's in the last few years.[since he bought the exclussive rights to all the jam recordings from the rest of the band].This album is bland  so give it a miss and spend your money on the new stiff little fingers cd which features bruce foxto</review_text>
As a fan of Pete Seeger's music, I bought this CD in the hope that the family connection would ensure similar quality of the music.  Disappointingly, I've found this album really grates on me after a couple of songs.  Peggy's vocal style in particular becomes mighty annoying to listen to over the length of the album, as her delivery can best be described as a neo-hillbilly twang.  I may end up combining the best half-dozen songs from this album with some other folk albums to generate a listenable &quot;best-of&quot; set, but I'd find it unthinkable to listen to this entire set in one sitting.  Only devoted fans of the genre or the duo should invest in this set; more casual fans of folk should direct their dollars to any of Pete's fine albums such as the Carnegie Hall classic</review_text>
[First of all: I only gave this one star because the rating doesn't let you go any lower] I only listened to this album because someone who was utterly disgusted with it threw it on the floor and stomped on it, leaving me to pick it up. I proceeded to suffer through it so I could give you fair warning. If you buy this, consider yourself warned</review_text>
There is now no trace of delight left in this band. All songs are either moderately slow and somewhat self-indulgent or frightfully slow and quite self-indulgent. I do love this band and pronounce praises upon them whenever I receive a doe-eyed look saying their name, but this CD and the CD previous (which did have 1 tune, "Apples," with which one could smile) does, for the first time, take away any anticipation for their next collection of chopfallen tunes.First, we loose the Roses, then the Ned's disband, following that, Swervedriver breaks apart and Velocity Girl is gone forevermore. Now my Charlatans have become charlatans of the great band they once were.</review_text>
Okay, I used to think that Nelly was a fun guy to listen to. He made songs that I used to enjoy, such as St. Louis, E.I., Country Grammar, and Ride Wit Me off of the CD "Country Grammar". Then there were a good amount of other good songs on "Nellyville". And the good thing about these CDs was that there were not too many skip tracks. But with Nellyville, Nelly brought us the obnoxious Hot In Herre, a single that got plenty of radio playtime, but I could not stand. This was not a good sign for the future. Then comes these two new CDs, Sweat and Suit. I have not listened to most of Suit, but I have listened to most of this, and it is pure garbage. This is the same Nelly who made Hot In Herre for sure. It has a bunch of catchy songs that live off the beats and the hook to drive them to get radio playtime. Most of the tracks are much worse than Hot In Herre, if that is believable. I just want a decent CD from Nelly, I am not expecting a classic. Instead he drops the definition of materialistic garbage, and I shake my head in disgust. Avoid this one and get one of his older CDs, or a CD from a better artist</review_text>
I find it utterly disturbing how simple it is for a talented D.J. to round up 3 bafoons and exploit their childish and idiotic personalites all for their dirty dollar; Ripping off the kids droned and purged on the MTV feedbag, and this man Paul Wall probably gets under my skin more then any of them.Notice his rhymes don't descend any futher than his mouth, his car and his money. What excactly does that say to me about my life or the world around me? Does it reach artistic heights?Or is it just another jackass looking for his 15 minutes of fame?And still people eat it up like Chicken N Dumplin's on a cold winter's dayThis is excactly whats very wrong with today's hip hop, it's all capitalizing on mindless club music artistic talent is down the toilet infinitelyStay away from this awful garbagedon't let MTV rob another cen</review_text>
Mostly bland, by this time it seemed that BAD was dead in the water, nothing here matches the excitement of THIS IS. Especially annoying are `Sightsee MC!', `Ice Cool Killer' and `The Big V'. BAD goes rap? No thanks. It's easy to see why they did the whole BAD 2 thing. Buy THE GLOBE instead</review_text>
This album is pure crap! Just a marketing move to capitalize on the sales from Straight Outta Cashville, until he can make a real new album, not this microwaved crapola. If you like Buck, get Straight Outta Cashville, an Beg For Mercy, than wait for his future release, with actual new tracks. I strongly advise you not to buy this. It is a total rip off. I wasted my time Downloading this</review_text>
I can't believe the other people giving this high marks. I love the wheel, but darn if this isn't just terrible. There isn't even a single on it; I can't believe the studio released it. Thank god I got a promotional copy and didn't have to go buy it in the store. The Catherine Wheel needs to get back together--quick</review_text>
With much anticipation we awaited the arrival of Clay's second album, thinking this one would make the career of one of our favorite singers... and instead we fear that it is likely to end his career.  While Clay's voice still sounds great, the CD is an entire collection of uninspired, underproduced remakes ... not one of which goes beyond the original.  As you can see, this CD is nowhere on the billboard charts, and we're very sad to say in our household, that it's for good reason.  Save your money and buy one of the much better Idol CDs ... and almost any of them are, most recently Kelly Pickler and Carrie Underwood.</review_text>
Thankfully I checked this out of the library and did not spend money on it.  I felt the need to add a review though to spare those who might be thinking of buying it.  I made it through the CD once with my kids, but that was it.  We will not be listening again.  As others have said, go buy the Radio Disney CDs (or possibly later version of KidzBop if they come with better reviews).  The singers (kids AND adults!)on KidzBob are out of tune and just painful to listen to.</review_text>
God, I can't believe this guy. Ja Rule was never a gangsta in his life, he can't talk gangsta. And stop trying to be like Tupac, Tupac actually was a gangsta. Your a fake and if he was still alive he would not only not role with you but diss you so badly you'd wet your pants. This guy should be booted out of the game, not only his he lying when he talks all this gangsta s*** as if he went through it, his ruining hip hop. Yeah and Ja, stop dissing Eminem and 50. You know perfectly well that they'd kill you in a battle anyday. Ja Rule has always been s***. Go listen to real rap</review_text>
Who the **ck are GNR?? Plus they make awful music! I can't stand this annyoing album. The music is awful, so as the lyrics. There is not ONE good song on this piece of s**t. It is a album that contains 12 crappy songs. AXL ROSE is a very annoying lead singer just screams and sings horribly, and SLASH is terrible too. In THE WAY STAY AWAY FROM THIS AS WELL AS GNRS OTHER ALBUMS. LEAVE GNR ALONE....GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS GNR SUCKS.I recommend buy these albums insted.FOREIGNER 4LOVE OVER GOLD-DIRE STRAITSON EVERY STREET-DIRE STRAITSCOMBAT ROCK-THE CLASHHOW TO DISMANTLE AN ATOMIC BOMB-U2AMERICAN IDIOT-GREEN DAYANIMAL MAGNETISM-SCORPIONSLOAD-METALLICARELOAD-METALLICAAND JUSTICE FOR ALL-METALLICAMASTER OF PUPPETS-METALLICARIDE THE LIGHTNING-METALLICASELF TITLE BLACK ALBUM-METALLICAPAST MASTERS VOL 2-BEATLESPHYSICAL GRAFFITI-LED ZEPPELINSOME GIRLS-THE ROLLING STONESGREATEST HITS-NEIL YOUNGTHE LAST DJ-TOM PETTY-GNR ARE AS BAD AS PINK FLOYD, PEARL JAM, NIRVANA, and AC/DC. AVOID ALL ALBUMS FROM THOSE BANDS.</review_text>
I am a 23 yr old mother of a 2 1/2 yr old. Not only are these children HORRIBLE singers, but there is a reason that most parents don't let their children listen to the original songs... they teach them things they don't need to know.   I thought this would be a "kids" version that would get rid of that stuff when I let a child I was babysitting put the cd on... and was appalled at how much they talked about sex and other innappropriate things for children.  They didn't take that out!  Children are exposed to that every day in our world now, telling them it is "normal" and "ok".  Parents have a big enough job to teach their children right and wrong with the way the world is today.  It becomes a much harder job when you give them something that is for "kids" that teaches them that those things are "normal".  They assume if it is ok for a kids cd, it can't be that bad.  I think this is horrible and would never spend a penny on it for a child!  Some of the songs I like in the originial version and do listen to, and this CD has ruined them!  But when it comes to children who are too young to understand that it is just a song and doesn't mean what they say is ok... I think it is the WORST thing you could buy for your child</review_text>
I understand why the Beatles are the top sellers in rock music as they suck. They only made about two decent songs in their "Hey Jude" a pretty song, and "Ballad Of John And Yoko". The sixties was a horrible decade of rock music. I would have to be said that only very few good songs came out in the sixties, which one of them is Neil Young's "Down By The River".I have listened to the Beatles for about a month and thought how lame and pathetic their music was. They were hugely one of the most overrated bands of all time. This ONE album is definately not the album to buy at ALL unless you are a sick moron who does not have a good taste in music.Here you will get 25 of the worst songs ever recorded. If you want good music, I recommend go buy albums from Foreigner, Dire Straits, Green Day, Guns N' Roses, and Metallica insted. Don't buy this album at most costs as you will waste money on 25 awful songs</review_text>
I remember listening to this years ago, and I thought I would add this to my cd library, now I know why it has been years sense I've listened to it,, very sqeaky, dull, slow paced stuff, Bob Segar makes this stuff sound like tin foil..</review_text>
I agree with other reviewers.  Don't waste your money.  I should have listened to the samples.  To hear more awful fakes, visit the  producer's web site at drewsfamous.com.  Listen to their selection of garbage before you make the purchase</review_text>
This album is one of the best sonic youth album...I advise everyone to listen this album...Break the circle of common popular music...This album irritates your soul and freedback your dreams..</review_text>
If you like early Priest, buy Genocide. It has both Rocka Rolla and Sad Wings of Destiny in their entirety(the only thing it does NOT have is the original album artwork). Not leaving out important tracks like The Ripper, for pete's sake!!! How could you leave out The Ripper? And what about Island of Domination? I feel sorry for anyone that bought this that is unfamiliar with Priest. They got jipped and didn't even know it. These are my favorite albums by Priest and I hate to see them butchered like this... And what about the order of the songs? Why would they mess with that too? Do youself a favor and buy either Genocide, or if you like to have the original artwork, buy Rocka Rolla and Sad wings of Destiny seperately</review_text>
I can't discard these songs completely, because they have such potential! Clever, fun lyrics, great beat, but BOY I wish this guy could hit his notes more often!I suppose this fellow requires the sort of "pitch doesn't matter" mindset that Grateful Dead listeners perfected years ago (or similar drugs). I'm just not that tolerant or substance affected</review_text>
He was at his best when he sang about the loneliness, perseverance and dreams of ordinary people.  In "Sandra" for instance it felt like he was singing about a neighbour.  The combination of his warm voice with his piano could be very moving and was definitely unique.  In the late eighties he started focusing on merely performing and doing cover versions.  He released a few inspired tracks now and then, his first Christmas album had a lot of charisma and warmth, and "Here at the Mayflower" was a sincere effort. He is an intelligent person who cares for music and doesn't let his superstardom go to his head.So, what has changed?  And why this late in his career?  Barry has reinvented himself as a Las Vegas entertainer, Liberace style.  And he's released an album with unchallenging versions of evergreens.  I have no doubt that he genuinely wants to make people happy, like Liberace did.  And I have deep respect for that.  But I personally regret that Clive Davis and Manilow have now decided to manufacture products for a larger audience - one that doesn't really have any demands.</review_text>
I won't dispute Emmylou's wonderful voice and Mark Knopfler's superb guitar playing but this album just didn't cut it for me. Pretty lame, about as likely as Hank and Phoebe Snow</review_text>
Greatest Hits collections of rap artists are usually a pretty bad idea. Most good rappers pack a visceral punch on first impact, but this wears thin with repeated listenings. This is especially true of gangsta rap. With what allegedly should represent the best work of B-T-H on one disk, this collection falls on its face trying to get around itself. Arranged back to back, the rapid-fire syncopated delivery that constitutes virtually every track on this collection wears thin. The raps blur together, and after two songs, the obscenity-laced machine-gun vocal play loses its novelty value, sounding more like a stylized novelty than any type of artistic vision. Once the raps lose their ability to hold your attention, all that remains are the rhythm tracks, which are serviceable at best. Their biggest hit, "Tha Crossroads", appears here in a version that is completely unrecognizable from its better-known form, further reducing the value of this collection. Worse, they include a warmed-over version of "F- Tha Police", an exercise in futility that only serves to dissipate the power of NWA's original.Spending money on this collection is like buying old newspaper articles. It might have had some value when it first hit the stands, but who wants yesterday's papers? 		C    Tom Rya</review_text>
my review is written here only for seekers of obscure nine inch nails songs. for a full review of the soundtrack in its entirety read elsewhere-there are many other reviews.i have all 19 halos, and exclusive and unreleased remixes and demos, and i love all of it, including the entirety of the fragile, fixed, perfect drug versions, still, further down the spiral v1 and v2, the deluxe edition of the downward spiral, on and on, everything....except deep.deep is truly the only nine inch nails song not worth having.painfully uninspired and recycled, musically, lyrically, and visually (the video was an embarassment- again, the only one in a catalogue of otherwise disturbing, beautiful brilliance), DEEP is a song and phase trent himself has admitted to wishing to forget entirely.my advice: take it as a mark that he is, after all, human, but leave it here on the tomb raider soundtrack, unpaid for, for it will never show up on an official halo as burn (originally for natural born killers), dead souls (joy division cover originally for the crow), and the perfect drug (originally for lost highway) all have in time (the former two on halo 8 DE and the latter on halos 11, 12, and 15 in extended form)</review_text>
It's sad that people can get a record deal for beinga good kareoke singer. Yeah, maybe my fish can get a record deal: They "sing" in tone, can breath, but refue to lip-synch(I know it sounds gay). This is just sad because bands that PLAY THEIR OWN INSTRUMENTS, WRITE THEIR OWN SONGS, and PERFORM THEIR OWN SONGS can pretty much get almost no attention. Let's take the band King's X: Doug Pinnick (vocals/bass) is an amazing metal singer who can sing in perfect pitch and writes good lyrics about God (King's X is a Christian band); Ty Tabor (guitar/vocals) has some of the bestguitar solos you probably don't know; and Jerry Gaskill (drums/vocals) has some pretty complicated rhythm patterns...yet only like a few dozen people (I know a lot more people than that like KX; I'm just exagerating) seem to like this band. It's sad. If you want good music, listen to the band I just menioned (King's X if you weren't paying attention).(If amazon doesn't post this I will SERIOUSLY get POed!</review_text>
This was one of the most dissappointing debut albums to come out of the Mid Nineties G-Funk heyday. Warren G. didn't even produce one song on this sorry attempt at making hard/soft gangsta rap except for the title track that was already used on his album a year before. The skits are ridiculous, the music is halfass, and the lyrics are amateur. There is absolutely nothing that keeps the listener's attention for a whole album. This is similar to other West Coast rap albums that play it too safe such as W.C. and the Madd Circle's debut and Coolio's "It Takes A Thief". One star for the hit single "Summertime in the L.B.C.".</review_text>
I remember this album well; you could hardly call it a 'barnstormer', as it was released well before "Under The Bridge" made them the bandwagon band of the year, but nothing could hide the fact that this was a band hellbent on proving the critics right--they never had a good album.For every song worth listening to ("Suck My Kiss", "Give It Away"), there were at least four more songs that should have been discarded.  This album was and remains a perfect example of why bands shouldn't feel obliged to slam 50 minutes of crap onto a slab of aluminum just because they can.On top of that, the vocals were pitched and pro-tooled beyond belief.  Some friends and I got a chance to see the band when they were supporting this album, and Kiedis was so off-key, it wasn't funny.  They drowned their sound in reverb so to try and drown out his lousy vocals, but the damage was done.  People were walking out in droves</review_text>
Even as a joke, this would be horrible; however, I think this band take it seriously - and it blows!  I picked up this CD because I heard A.R.E. were like a combination of suicide, front 242, and iron maiden: Interesting.  NO!!  A.R.E. are a bad imitation of front 242 and watered-down Liars at best.  The guitar riffs are awful and the lyrics are even worse.   Example: "Hey World" begins with how much it sucks to be 13.When I saw Pelican in concert, they were opening (?!?!?) for A.R.E., so I decided to give them a second chance.  The sound guy must not have liked what he heard, because the bar chatter was louder.  "Louder" I yelled, so that I might find something redeeming in their music.  "Yeah, SUCK louder!" Someone else yelled - I had to agree & give him a high-five.  Maybe I would have liked this when I was 12 and didn't know any better.  ZERO STARS</review_text>
I remember listening to this years ago, and I thought I would add this to my cd library, now I know why it has been years sense I've listened to it,, very sqeaky, dull, slow paced stuff, Bob Segar makes this stuff sound like tin foil..</review_text>
I bought this cd because I figured it would be a fresh take on some old favoirites. Well, I'd like to say I loved it, but I didnt. This cd just comes off as flat and lifeless. Where as the original songs, the Kyle Toucher on vocals versions, had a certain edge, the remakes make great material sound very mediocre. For those of you first discovering Dr. Know,l this may be the greatest cd in the world...the material is that good-but, if you really want to experience Dr. Know, buy their Best of CD that was released on Mystic Records. This is the best version of Dr. Know. Hope this helps</review_text>
I was disappointed when I received this CD.  Although it is original, the music is hard for me to listen for more than a minute or two.By your side, (my favorite) is good for about two minutes.  Then the beat gets off track, and starts to sound terrible.  If this was done on purpose, I cannot fathom why.I know this is "lo-fi", but a hint of bass wouldn't hurt at all.  As it stands, the CD sounds like an unfinished product, and is not nearly good enough to stand on its own.I think this CD would best be used for some sampling...especially in today's hip-hop.  If you are looking for beautiful, relaxing music...look elsewhere</review_text>
Not particularly musical; only 1 good track (Blues for Miles)..</review_text>
The "drummer" (more like "The Anti-Drummer") on this is Johnny Cresci.  He is maddeningly lacking in even basic garage band ability, and literally has no idea what a 6/8 blues meter is.  How he landed on the same stage with these legends may be the musical mystery of all time.  For me, Mr. "Clueless" Cresci makes it nearly impossible to enjoy the brilliant performances going on despite his anti-rhythmic upchucking.....kinda like driving an Aston Martin with a flat tire!  I have tried to get beyond Cresci's chops for over a year of listening now, and I simply can't do it.  If you're a musician, his playing will make you extremely agitated.  I'm gonna have to trade this in, and go on listening to Live Adventures like I have for the past 37 years.  This would have been much better with the drum tracks totally muted on the 6/8 numbers.Granted, this is an historically significant release, but I think it should have stayed in the vault, or released with Johnny Cresci having been digitally removed or replaced</review_text>
isn't wearing your ancestry on your sleeve so blatantly and in such a predictable fashion just a 21st century version of Al Jolson? the problem with so many new-traditionalist artists is that they lessen rather than deepen the understanding of the complexity and diversity of the celebrated cultural groups experience. hippies and white liberals love it, but where does that leave those that are living it? far better capturing the Latina experience are Julietta Venegas, south of the border, and east LA's Lysa Flores, north of the border</review_text>
A terrible, terrible waste of money. All this CD serves in doing is to illustrate what a knuckle-head Paul Godfrey is. Face it: no one gives a sh@t about Morcheeba anymore, we're not interested in who 'inspired' them, (poor Annette Peacock - has anyone told her?). The next time we see Paul Godfrey he'll probably be asking that age-old question: &quot;paper or plastic?&quot</review_text>
This is a pep rally on CD; an unsingable, emotionally charged pep rally.  It really upsets me that this is the face of today's Christian music.  The melodies are not easily singable at all, and the songs use all the same musical cliches.  This is worship manipulation at it's best.  If you read the words to learn something concrete about God, you will find nothing of substance.  They talk about actions to give God and our response to God, but no meat-and-potatoes of WHY we should be doing this.  God IS great, but WHY?  This is VERY disturbing, and completely unacceptable for congregational worship.</review_text>
I never really noticed the soundtrack when watching this show on television but I love the show so was a little surprised when purchasing the album that all the non sound bite tracks are American country music songs. Can't say I'm much of a fan of American country music so was just a bit disappointed. I think a great inclusion on this album though is the sound bites from all the leading housewife characters on this show and this alone is worth the price of the CD.Was also disappointed that Danny Elfman's Desperate Housewives Theme is not a separate track and ridiculously has some hidden track attached to it. The Desperate Housewives Theme goes for 0:44 seconds then you have a break of silence for a while but still on the same track before at 1:01 a terribly sung summary of the TV show mentioning Wisteria Lane over and over again follows for a minute and twenty seconds. What ligic was there in not making this a separate track? You would then be able to memory it out on your stereo. I like listening to TV themes and I find this just ruins that track because you need to be near your stereo to press skip after 0:44 seconds. This CD is worth purchasing for the sound bites alone but I guess if you're just buying it for the theme song you'll have to wait for some other new TV theme compilation album to get the theme song on its own.This album also comes with an excellent cover insert booklet with lots of great pictures of characters and scenes from the show.</review_text>
A friend of mine turned me on to Spoon, and at first I listened enthusicatically... but then I got bored. Although Spoon's songs may be catchy at times, they are empty and deviod of any alterations. The same simple drum beat mixed with the same simple guitar riff may be appealing for a minute or so, but in the end I don't think I've ever listened to an entire track. If this is 5 star music today, our culture is severely lacking depth</review_text>
Remember the days when we were punks and we'd gather 'round the phonograph and listen to some Puccini on the old Edison cylinders? They held up to 4 minutes of music! Count 'em, 4 minutes! Then that hippie opera singer Enrico Caruso came along and all the young punks would listen to him, including myself. He was quite the singer. When I was a young kid though, the only form of music we had were the concerts. I remember seeing Franz Liszt play the piano in concert, quite an amazing virtuoso, and Johann Strauss Jr. conducting his orchestra, those were the days.Then they came out with those things called grammophones, which were even more modern, if it was even possible. But it was, because then they came out with a new modified version of the phonograph that all the young punks would listen to, lazy kids. I mean, you didn't even have to crank a handle like you had to with grammophones. And what's this, 1 hour, a full 60 minutes of music, on 1 record? Pshaw! 4 minutes of music was all I needed, and I was still pooped out even after that. In my day, it was bed at 4 p.m., breakfast at 2 a.m., then off to the mines. We didn't have 60 minutes of free time.I have no idea what form of music they have now. Appearently, they came out with a couple other things after the phonograph. Now all I see these days are kids with their fancy eye-pods (?) and MP3, MP4 players, whatever they're called, listening to that "hip-hop" tomfoolery of theirs. You can't even call it music, it's just noise. Well, gotta get ready for bed now, it's almost 3:45</review_text>
i like how the people on here who turn to sarcasm when rating this cd think they're funny.  heh, so witty.  anywho i'm not a big fan of fall out boy, but there are a couple of good songs on this cd........notably grand theft autumn and saturday.  those are really the only two that hold up its rating for me tho...2 stars</review_text>
Great recording, but if you want to actually use it, like load it on your ipod it has sony's stupid DRM. Meaning you can't. DON'T BUY SONY PRODUCTS!!</review_text>
Apart from the great selection of soundtracks, what really makes this compilation top value is the quality of the sound processing. Executed with finesse, these tracks sound better than when first issued and many are unedited, fuller versions: like "Singing In The Rain", for example. Throw in the great price, and this double disc set is a "must have" for all lovers of classic movie music</review_text>
After reading her excellent Halloween book, I figured her Halloween CD would be worth owning. I always search for "different" Halloween CDs, but this was filled with the same old stuff.Chains, moans, and spooky laughs... then more chains, moans and spooky laughs. Very dissapointing</review_text>
I bought this album because I am so into Sigur Ros at the moment and it seems all the reviews I read say that "...if you like Sigur Ros you will like MBV.." Let me say this album is no where near a Sigur Ros experience. If  I could compare them to anyone it would be very early Cocteau Twins , though I must be clear I don't think the singer is anywhere close to the artistic sense and vocal talent of Elizabeth Fraser.It would be more palatable if the production value was higher....it sounds terrible. The sound quality is comparable to some old VHS tapes I have from the mid 80's that I recorded off the TV ( Then soaked in water for a few days!) .</review_text>
I can't believe some of the songs on this soundtrack...they are horrible pieces of S$#!?*&%#!#$!There are a couple good ones,but its not worth spending the money on for the c.d,not even at a used price.I can't believe they did'nt put "Low Rider" on the soundtrack,how cheap is that</review_text>
I forgot how bad this album was until I popped it into my CD player the other day.It seems like every song has one or two parts that are totally killer, followed by 3-4 minutes of boredom.  The song "Epic Problem" is good throughout, and Full Disclosure is EXCELLENT except for the horrible screamed verses.  Strangelight is awesome too, and not very typical of Fugazi.  The Kill is also good in the same way, it's very chilled out.  Past these few standout tracks(which wouldn't be standouts at all on any other album of theirs) there isn't much reason to listen to the album.  It's incredibly boring.I suggest picking up any other fugazi album first, maybe 13 songs, red medicine or in on the kill taker</review_text>
Simply put, Jay-Z is incredibly overrated.  I own a couple of his CDs but to be honest, I never really liked him.  His beats never grabbed me and his lyrics never stunned me so much that I just had to go back and listen to a specific song again.  He mostly raps about drugs, money and cars.  Nothing special, nothing new. I'm just being real about it, since everyone else is on his d!ck.  I think the reason he's so respected is because he blew up right after Biggie died and he was the closest thing to him at the time.Granted, Jay-Z does use some good metaphors, but for the most part his lyrics are shallow.Best tracks on this album:Can't Knock the HustleBrooklyn's Finest w/BiggieDead President</review_text>
"What's Up", the catchy song with the acousitc guitar out of tune (which, I always thought, would have been the perfect song  for Heart), is the only thing good here.  The rest of this album is a mess.  Linda Perry has, of course, gone on to better things</review_text>
I just sold this back through Amazon, I was so disapointed with it. It's an all cover record, and while Greg Duhli does add an interesting twist to the covers, all of the music feels too subdued, too flat.Duhli is lacking the usual passion he brought to the Whigs and the first Twilight Singers recording.</review_text>
As long as artists keep making albums with only one good song, people will keep getting them for free in internet.  Nestor keeps insisting in doing instrumental hip hop, pop, commercial, elevator music.  If you like that kind of music, buy this CD, otherwise buy Hubert Laws, or Dave Valentin among others.  If you want to listen to good Nestor music, buy "Morning Ride", "Dance Of The Phoenix", "Talk To Me", "Mi Alma Latina" or the charanga album " Mis Canciones Primeras".  Sorry Nestor, I am a big fan of your music but you are wasting your talent doing this kind of stuff.  When do you plan to make a good non commercial latin jazz album</review_text>
Yo Gotti in the past can spit some raw ish but on this one, I dunno what happpened.....The production seemed too generic, the rapping was pretty average and generic and not that impressive at all, and doesnt carry much replay value....To be honest, id pop in a Three 6  Mafia cd rather than this one....Album was slacking on so many levels, now theres some tracks that listenable, but the rest make it hard to enjoy this album, nothin special bout it at all...This album waz overhyped I believe and flopped horribly.......Gotti can do much better than this.....Wouldnt recommend anyone to chek it out.....2.5/</review_text>
This album was one of my biggest "mistakes" (bought it 3 years ago).It's childish songwriting and really not good enough for an alternative-rock-band.Better you buy instead: UP THE BRACKET (THE LIBERTINES) orsome STROKES-stuff..</review_text>
With 2 cds of endless repeated chords, they don't have much to say</review_text>
I can understand that Robin felt a need to include some of the biggest Bee Gees hits to appease the fans, but the ones that were sung by Barry are below wretched here.  Robin frequently disappears in the sound mix, becoming little more than one of a group singing harmony.  That's fine for a group concert, like the Bee Gees, but inexcusable for a solo effort.  His stiff between song talk sounds like a bad lounge act.  They should have kept this in the can.  It seems like it is meant as little more than a money grab for Robin. Don't do him the favor</review_text>
This is the perfect example of why black women and women in general are disrespected. Lil kim is teaching generations of women to be nasty as you can be and to disrespect yourself. Then to top all of this off she is still hanging on the coat tails of biggie, the ultra fantasy gangsta rapper. Queen latifah never had to talk like this to get her name out or to make good music. This is ridiculous! Kim would be better off in a porn movie than in the rap game. Please please please spare us and stop rapping</review_text>
I just wanted to let you know about a copyright situation. In this movie there is a part where they are sitting in a mexican food restuarant and there is a song playing in the back round. That song is not listed on the song track and I think it should be. The song is Atrevido by Orishas. I think this is wrong.</review_text>
what a terrible excuse for music from generally excellent musicians. It sounds like ESPN called them asked them to put a diddy together and 10 minutes later....presto ...instant mush</review_text>
A friend who knows my taste in music recommended VNV Nation to me, so I got Matter + Form based on the reviews.  In one sense I like it.  The production is excellent and I find every track to be creative and unique.  But I HATE the vocals and so I can't bear to listen to the CD.  This dude has the worst voice in music history.</review_text>
This has got to be the worst pile of trash I ever heard, right now I cant think of anything worse then this. The same ol trash bling and girls. And if you got JD and Bow wow on your album at the same time, its gonna be wack. And do these n***** even know what franchise mean? What does that word have to do with their name? I'll just start a click called ham & cheese and rap about flip flops and thongs for that matter</review_text>
I LOVE Destiny's Child...BUT this CD...big disappointment. The best songs on the entire CD were probably Lose My Breath,Cater 2 U and Girl...big disappointment...i just wasnt feeling the CD when i bought it..</review_text>
What they said was that Katy can't rock just yet because she's a raw talent and not yet coherent in theme.  I saw her live on the Chicks with Attitude tour with Liz Phair and the Cardigans and Charlotte Martin and Rose was the worst performer of the night.  The first problem is that her voice just isn't that strong, secondly, her lyrics never come out as if they're honest and as if they are always a pretension that people feel a cool girl growing up should say.  Throughout her set, there was only one song that stuck out as an interesting and unique thing (passingly honest as well) and that was "Snowflake."  It's fitting that the song was preceded by an ironic intro about how she's lived in California for a long time, but she hates warm weather, sounds impossible, but she must be truthful because it's the only song that breaks out of the leaden grunge guitar mix and hits the audience over the head with songcraft.  I'm sure she has potential for the future, but I think on her next album she should take a hint from Beth Orton who's known previous to her most recent album for being a popular artist in the realm of trip hop.  Stripping down your sound brings the utmost fundamentals of your idea and sound out, and I think that could be helpful for her to put on record</review_text>
John Mayer can grow his hair long and play his guitar slung low, but he is still a professionaly trained monkey, I mean musician. Mayer along with "artists" like Gavin DeGraw, Teddy Geiger, etc., are todays N'Sync and Backstreet Boys, nothing more.</review_text>
I can't say I liked this CD.  Jessica Simpson was good when she started, but as her popularity has grown, her talents have declined.  She commited murder the day she recorded Senatra's song for "The Dukes of Hazard" movie</review_text>
The songs just did not get me dancing.  I have to say I was disappointed.  But I love Kids Favorite Songs VOl 2 but was never able to buy it as it was not availabl</review_text>
Wow!  Tom Morello, Flea, Pete Yorn, Chris Cornell, Brad Wilk, Maynard James Keenan.  When I first heard of this superstar line-up, I was sure that this CD was going to be awesome.  I was duped like everyone else who bought this album.  Axis of Justice (or so cleverly put by a previous reviewer as "Axis of Jackasses") is really a bad album, even for a bunch of political liberal rockers.  Serj and Tom really dropped the ball with this one. What could've been a festoon of awesomeness turned out to crap-fest of whiny musicians with an equally crappy message.  Knowledge, The Night Watchmen, and Ahmed Ahmed are among the many reasons why this is so bad and incredibly difficult to listen to.  The song,"Jeffrey, Are You Listenng?" is up there with other crappy songs like John Mayer's "City Love" and Richard Harris' "MaCarthur Park."  On top of all that, the communist entertainer known as Michael Moore adds his little nugget of wisdom on the DVD, which I can say I've become dumber now that I've listened to it.  For the love of all good music, stay far away from this CD</review_text>
all i got to say about this is that dudes need to stop making this kinds of records cuz this is not hip hop, its not what LL, Rakim, KRS-one, Kool G Rap, Ice T, Ice Cube, NWA, and (rip) BIG AND PAC, started.  We as fan have the power to end this buy simply not buying the album.  PLEASE DO NOT BUY THIS, THIS FAKE RAP IS GOT TO STO</review_text>
This stuff is so boring. I can't believe people still listen to this stuff. Seriously come on people! I laugh every time I see some guy trying to play this stuff anywhere. Plus Busta has admitted to having "relationships" with men if you get what I mean. Makes you wonder about a lot of rappers....</review_text>
Wow, I can not believe that two of the best songs of the film were cut off. 1.- Rock and roll part II ( Gary Glitter) and 2.-Get it on (T. Rex).The rest has been said in the other costumers reviews.</review_text>
can it be that people are letting their personal beliefs block the receptors in the brain that signal bad music?  ive listened to many bob dylan albums, and every one is a gem.  freewheelin' is my favorite, but so what?  it doesn't matter which ones we love, because we all know what bob dylan's worst record was, and its saved.  im not one to question this man's beliefs or anything like that, bob dylan deserves all the respect in the universe, but could it be that bob dylan made a transfer to christian music to help us all see how bad it is?  could he have made the transfer to make a mockery of the christian faith?  almost certainly not.  but only a seriously bad album could have planted these seeds in my brain</review_text>
This is an endurance test. As in 'bitches brew''live evil''love at the Fillmore' latter day Miles consists of moments of brilliance combined with long stretches of absolute tedium. It makes 'jack johnson' a real non event and considering the quality of musicians on board it is a real surprise. Take 'yesternow' it takes for ever for Billy Cobham to find a beat. This is just self indulgence of the worse kind, a trait which unfortunately perpetrated a lot of the jazz fusion crossovers. Miles seems to want to create 'moods' and ends up with twenty minute plus of wallpaper music. This album is the complete nadir of his jazz crossover period. McGaughlin's guitar though breathtaking in the Mahavisuna orchestra here contents himself with silly little runs, totally without any structure and fire (this unfortunately was the same throughout his stay with Miles) Disjointed would be too kind a word. When you reliased that this was edited from long jams it makes you wonder how dull the unreleased parts were (i dread to even contemplate). Miles playing though usually inspired and lyrical here struggles to solo over the fast tempo's and is embarassingly weak. Maybe if i saw the film it was supposed to accompany i might view this differant, but without that it is just a meandering and unfocused mess</review_text>
This is the album when Ja officially became a b*tch. His first 2 albums was good, I enjoyed them both and those are highly recommended. I hated this s*it from start to finish. This is a waste of space in the cd case. How can you be a murderer and a singer at the same time? Now I don't mind too much about redoing a song about or with a dead rapper, BUT YOU SHOULD'VE AT LEAST KNEW HIM MUTHAF***ER! Another disembowelment to one of Pac's classics. I stopped listenin' to Ja because he made a big change. Not cause of 50. Unlike some turncoat fans.</review_text>
Mississippi and Sugar Baby are great songs, up there with the best Dylan has done. However, the rest of the album, while listenable, isn't all that memorable. Still, I suppose it's amazing that he can still produce a couple of great songs still, after over 40 years performing and recording. The same cannot be said for '60s peers like Paul McCartney or the Stones.Overall, Time Out of Mind was better, although that too was a little overrated, with only Not Dark Yet, Standing in the Doorway and Trying to Get to Heaven truly belonging to the canon of great Bob songs.</review_text>
I want this guy to succeed so badly, yet he just couldn't pull it off.His voice has a great sound to it, pleasant to the ears, yet his interpretation was just not there. His  phrasing was very lazy and boring most times. It seemed like he didn't know where to start the next word. And he also sounded out of breath. He sounded so out of breath that I started gasping for air...I had to stop listening.  To add to that, John's vibrato sounded washed out and faded in places where it needed to be stronger.I truly hope with age and experience he improves. There's no reason why he should not. He's not in the catagory of a Buble' or Connick Jr. yet.</review_text>
people this is easy listening at it's easiest. Every song is and will be a candidate for adult contemperary rotation in 2 years, that is if it isn't allready. I don't know anything about what they have done in the past, except for a song I remember being played on the radio a few years ago. Must have been on the album prior to this. But that song sounds just like two tracks on this one. Not only that but if there wasn't a pause in between these mini mediocre fests I couldn't really tell any of them apart. Horrible music with no feeling or soul, not even creative. don't waste your time with this.</review_text>
I never could understand why the Beatles are so popular? They are pretty boring too just like Pink Floyd. Each and every song on this album can put me to sleep in about 55 seconds. I just dont like it because it sucks! Dont listen to the moronic 5 star reviewers below. The Beatles only made one good album and that's the one which contains Ballad Of John And Yoko, Hey Jude.</review_text>
Not the type of music I had envisioned...much slower than I was hoping for.</review_text>
Although it KILLS me to write anything less than glowing about Edwin McCain (I think he's probably the most talented singer/songwriter we've seen in the last ten years), I just can NOT get into this album.Like others have said, I too have every Edwin album and have seen him in concert. I love everything he's ever done.... but this album just doesn't do it for me. And I know people will say... "Give the album a chance"..... or... "Let Edwin grow and move in new musical directions". BUT..... I've listened to this album at least 10 times all the way through and it's just not growing on me. It feels "flat" and just doesn't feel EDWIN-ISH (if that makes any sense). Even Grammercy Park Hotel, which I saw him debut live and which is on his live DVD doesn't feel the same on here.... just doesn't have the feeling or soul.I would pick up Austin Sessions over this album any day. THAT is Edwin doing what he does best. Maybe he feels the pressure to write some "hits" so that he doesn't have to spend two solid years on the road in the Black Pearl (his tour bus)..... and who could blame him??? But this feels like he's trying too hard.I SOOOOOO hope he comes back with a better album next time, so I can rave about it, because although I gave this album 2 stars.... Edwin, as a person/singer/performer/songwriter deserves 10!!!!!!</review_text>
This band is getting alot of critical acclaim right now, but I'm just not feeling it. The single "Wolf like me" is the only song that stands out to me on the whole album. It is a great song, but everything else is just blah. I think the band could use a different singer, the guy they got doesn't sing very well or very "soulful". The music is good, very original and the only reason I haven't sold the cd yet. I really think ppl need to hear this one for themselves before they buy. Don't be fooled by these 5 star reviews. Just listen to the cd before you buy it. That's my advice</review_text>
I found a supposedly "New remastered edition" of Sade's "Diamond Life" on sale for less than 10 bucks. OOPS! Great mistake! When I tried to return it, the CD store was already out of business, and the copy is one issued in the Netherlands which is marked INTO THE BOOKLET as "2000 Digital Remastered Version". The whole album HAS BEEN RE-RECORDED with new arrangements! The digital sound is quite good, but the new arrangements made for 'Smooth Operator' REALLY SUCKS!!</review_text>
You win some and you lose some. This purchase was a definite loss. What a dissapointment</review_text>
These are the same tracks from Totally Buble which was released without Buble's consent."Totally Buble" is not an album that I wanted to be released. They were songs I recorded for a film called "Totally Blonde" many years ago before I was signed to 143/Reprise Records. The decision to release it as an album was made by the film's producer, and I had no control over stopping him.It is important for everyone to know, that I only want to release quality music to my fans by offering my best work and I sincerely apologize if you purchased this album." - Michael Buble</review_text>
...when you're gearing up for suicide. This whole album sounds like the last thoughts and comments of a person who's going to just end it all. I found myself suffering nightmares, fatigue, misery and paranoia. My ears unclogged but I started getting headaches and a fuzzy feel in my head. This is not a good album for the stressed, because it will just make you feel worse. I find this album unlikable and mostly unenjoyable. When I first listened to it it sounded inaccessable, after listening to it more and more I started to get more "into" it, but I can't say I found it a good place to be in. It's a somewhat interesting album, but it mostly just dragged me down, made me nervous, numb and hurt my head.People say this is great music. Let them say what they want. Give me some old fashioned enjoyable music that doesn't make a pest of itself. Kid A is just ok to me, and hasn't been worth all the effort to "get into". This almost seems like a sadomasochistic album to spank the listeners. I don't know, maybe I'm missing something, but to hear some "weird" music like this that has miles more heart and is alot kinder to the ears, try "Passengers" by U2.And Thom York sings like a Muppet on this album.  By the way I've enjoyed Radiohead's first three albums quite a bit (including Pablo Honey -- why are people always busting its chops).</review_text>
I got this CD because I loved their radio hits "Bring Me To Life" and "My Immortal." While those songs are beautiful, they are not representative of the rest of the album. Although I tried and tried to get into this CD, the hard rock teen goth style just isn't my cup of tea, and the lyrics are too depressing. If you are a fan of bands such as Linkin Park or Seether, you might enjoy this. However, if you only like "My Immortal" and "Bring Me To Life" because of Amy's powerful vocals, you'd be better off listening to Tori Amos or Sarah McLachlan.</review_text>
I was babysitting, and the kid was listening to the CD, and asked why Billie Joe sounded so sick. X</review_text>
This CD is the worst "comedy" CD I have ever heard.  Yet the reviews on here mostly claim it was hilarious????Ok, I've come to the conclusion, the only people writing positive reviews on Amazon MUST be the people trying to sell the junk.I've seen this guy on some tv shows, and on comedy central, and he's a somewhat funny guy, but it is painful to listen to this CD.  You can feel the awkwardness of the crowd, not knowing if or when to laugh.  And it continues throughout the entire CD.  There don't seem to be any jokes on the CD at all.  It is all disconnected negative rants from a bitter angry human being.Don't believe me?  Then go ahead and waste your money on this horrible piece of junk, and see for yourself.Like my review title says, Do NOT read the positive reviews.  Just read the negative ones, and decide how credible they seem.  Then make your decision to buy or not buy</review_text>
I love Ray Charles when Ray's doing Ray.  This was terrible.  Ray was out of tune, out of touch and the song selection was ridiculous.  I'm sorry Ray, I love you.  It's a shame this had to be one of your last CD's</review_text>
It really doesn't appeal to me. But if you like them that is your opinion. I'm not going to say your stupid for liking them because your different from me. But I just feel that there is way to much cursing for my liking I mean the creativity here is not very high I just feel you could use better words. But I mean THE MEASURE OF A MAN IS NOT HOW MANY GIRLS YOU SLEPT WITH. I mean that is how you lose money on child support. Sex has never been the most important thing in life.Honestly though I mean you just can't see these guys rapping about these same things when they're 40 right cause that is wrong. I mean why be interested in a group of rappers that in 10 years probably wont be making music anymore let alone still be together</review_text>
Cheap Trick's second album is very disappointing to me afterthe good, but raw, "Live In The Studio", 1977-76 recordedCheap Trick. Almost all of the material here is so watereddown that it REALLY COMES OFF WAY BETTER on the later manyLive disks they did.After a good start w/ "Hello There", a concert favorite formany years, is the only thing here to write home about whenone considers how great all the tunes from this overproduced album sounded on the Budokan and other Live recordings later.Tom Werman and Rick Niesen were on a show in 1991 that I hadrecorded on a tape once and Werman, noce a friend of Tom Petersson's said, quote: "My three albums with Cheap Trickgot better and better...", to which the ever sarcastic RickNielsen said, "Selling, maybe." Not realizing that brotherRick was slamming him, Werman then continued, "Exactly"...Oh boy. We now see why producing Cheap Trick albums throughthe years has become like playing Russian Roulette. It's nothard to get better than this and five months later the solid,but somewhat oeverrated 'Heaven Tonight' came out...(And theguys EVEN bought Werman back for Dream Police. Things turnedout better when Pete Comita, then later Jon Brant joined theband. Yep - the best was yet to come - in the '80'</review_text>
DIS GY IS DA KYING OF DA SOUTH!!!Give me a f***ing break. When are we going to stop seeing crappy rapper after even crappier rappers that are so full of themselves that they feel the need to plasture their faces all over every one of their crappy unintelligent so called albums!! Nothing descent to say at all, just a bunch of mindless [...]. I bet you they don't even like music, they just want to be a "celebrity"  and be rich for 3 years(till their broke). If they really did geniunly like music, it wouldn't sound that sh**y!!!! GET OVER YOURSELVES!!!</review_text>
This is the only album I own of Joe Strummer minus The Clash. I can't say it's very good. I hate having to compare it with it with his work with The Clash but it's inevitable. His lyrics aren't as great, edgy or provocative. There isn't any fantastic music either. I am not really sure what to say since I haven't listened to the album in so long because it was so bad, I truly tried my hardest to like it. But I feel it is my duty to advise others to not make the same mistake. Believe me: I absolutely love everything about The Clash, the lyrics, Joe's voice, the music, the attitude and how cool they were, this is not Joe at his best, it's cool though cause now he's gone: go buy some Bob Marley albums instead, Joe would not have minded</review_text>
Boney used to be the man, but now he has 2 crappy releases behind him. Anyone who thinks this CD is good should listen to his older stuff like Seduction, Trust, or Backbone. You will quickly realize that he has not been living up to his full potential. Cmon'Boney lets get back to multi-dimentional stuff that you used to be the master of. Peace</review_text>
This collection is a must have if you like the Bee Gees and don't have any of their albums...or even if you do. It's one hit after another plus some I've never heard, which is nice for variety. I couldn't ask for a better collection - it's like I had burned this for myself.</review_text>
This album isn't not very good at all.  There are about four songs I like.  First off, the production on this CD is disgusting considering some of the producers make great beats.  Then, the guest artists do a sub-par job lyrically.  Then, there are no new verses from Biggie, on the album.  They should have stopped with Born Again, because album will be a forgotten one, not a great way to close out the legecy of Bigge Smalls</review_text>
For starters I love Bun B and Pimp C and UGK and all that but the thing that kills it is Lil Jon yelling "gansta grizzel" like 10 times in every track. I love lil Jon too, but they coulda done without it. also they just rappin over other peps beats, it just sounds like a mixed tape kinda deal. but heard rumor that bun b is bout to come out with an offical bun b record, not a mixed tape, or nothin like that, but only reason why i gave it two stars is just cuz they got tight flows on the tracks, but not their own beats, and lil jon coulda just shut the hell up on those tracks. just keepin it real. i wouldnt spend the money, id just wait for bun b to release his own offical cd, or till pimp c get out and ugk hooks it back up</review_text>
Remember the days when we were punks and we'd gather 'round the phonograph and listen to some Puccini on the old Edison cylinders? They held up to 4 minutes of music! Count 'em, 4 minutes! Then that hippie opera singer Enrico Caruso came along and all the young punks would listen to him, including myself. He was quite the singer. When I was a young kid though, the only form of music we had were the concerts. I remember seeing Franz Liszt play the piano in concert, quite an amazing virtuoso, and Johann Strauss Jr. conducting his orchestra, those were the days.Then they came out with those things called grammophones, which were even more modern, if it was even possible. But it was, because then they came out with a new modified version of the phonograph that all the young punks would listen to, lazy kids. I mean, you didn't even have to crank a handle like you had to with grammophones. And what's this, 1 hour, a full 60 minutes of music, on 1 record? Pshaw! 4 minutes of music was all I needed, and I was still pooped out even after that. In my day, it was bed at 4 p.m., breakfast at 2 a.m., then off to the mines. We didn't have 60 minutes of free time.I have no idea what form of music they have now. Appearently, they came out with a couple other things after the phonograph. Now all I see these days are kids with their fancy eye-pods (?) and MP3, MP4 players, whatever they're called, listening to that "hip-hop" tomfoolery of theirs. You can't even call it music, it's just noise. Well, gotta get ready for bed now, it's almost 3:45</review_text>
JJ, the name of the song you are looking for is "Like You Like An Arsonist" by Paris Texas</review_text>
I just finished seeing the movie and loved the song at the end and immediately started looking up amazon for this song.  Thanks to Melania for pointing out the song title at the end. I realize this CD is just a soundtrack, but typically most soundtracks also include the ending songs. It is just plain dumb not to include the best music in this CD.MY VOTE - DO NOT BUY THIS CD. The soundtrack is all pretty generic stuff.  BUT GET THE ENDING TITLE SONG IF YOU CAN - It's great.</review_text>
Bands from the 90s just sucked and Nirvana fits in with that. They had a couple of ok songs and Kurt Cobain was some what talented but this is nothing to get excited about. I can not for the life of me see the things people see that just go off about how great they were. I don't see it. This is another cd in a long line of cds from the 90s that are a disgrace to music.</review_text>
Etta never fails to deliver in the vocals. Gutteral bombast, sweet soul, gospel, blues, the lady is a living legend. But this album, like the last album "produced" by her son, is a nightmare. Chessy arrangments, tinkly bass, poor sound all around. She is a fierce mother and I'm sure she thinks her kids know best, but there is a reason why labels pair vocalists with the right producer. Should Etta get the chance to work with a fresh ear at the deck, she wouldn't need the novelty of some of the song choices.PS - 200lbs lighter and she remains the best live performer; blues, R/B, soul, whatever,  in the world.</review_text>
or in their entire career for that matter.  I have tried to like this band, but Greg Dulli just won't shut up.  Every song is his snide lyrical diatribing, on and on and on.  The guitarist keeps things mildly interesting, but on this album in particular, the drummer also won't shut up and play a straight beat for once.  It's like three guys in their own worlds, and they mash it together and call what they've done songs.  EXCEPT for the one decent song they did, the only rock song I can think of that is hard, psychedelic, passionate, powerful, and set to a waltz beat of all things.  "LEt me lie to you" is the best song they ever made, BECAUSE everyone in the band is given room to breathe by the song's framework and tempo.  Instead of piling in on top of each other till the end of the song like they usually seem to do, everyone agrees to hold back until the rushing choruses, and it's less muddled and better orchestrated for it.  IT's a shame they didn't do any other songs like this, at least none that I have heard.  I tried to like them, I really did.  I wanted to find the band that made that one song, and discover a whole treasure chest of dark, passionate, noisy music like that.  Too bad, no wonder they drifted apart</review_text>
All the cds this band has made suck. Not even the first one so never buy something this idiots have made. Blink-182, Sugarcult or Sum 41 are good punk-pop</review_text>
There are 2 good songs on this disc, Stinkfist and Aenema. The rest are pure crap. Half of the tracks aren't even songs, they're just a bunch of noise. No wonder Tool won't put any of thier music on itunes or napster. They want you to buy the whole cd so they can have your $14 for like four real songs and ten tracks of filler crap. If you gave this CD 5 stars there is something wrong with you and you should be beaten severely</review_text>
Reviewgium - Volume I, issue XVIIOver sixty and still going strong, Neil Young has released a new album, largely politcal and essentially a focused attack on U.S. President George W. Bush. As opposed to his last album which was a more bittersweet, country-tinged effort, Living With War is a pretty much straightforward rock album, mostly electric with a background choir featured on many tracks, as well as an unusually predominant trumpet player on several tracks. Musically, it's nothing spectacular, in fact every song more or less follows the same tired formula, and there are really no diversions from the grunge-like rhythm guitar chords. But the album is obviously intended to have a major focus on the vocals and lyrics. Of course, many people do not like Neil Young's vocals, but there are many well-developed choral passages throughout the album, including a soulful, a capella arrangement of "America the Beautiful," which closes the album. So basically, I feel the vocal performances compensate--though not totally--for the lack of musical diversity. Lyrically, the album is pretty blatant; it could almost be a 60's protest album. But underlying that, is a ray of hope and an urge to change our country for the better.There are a few decent tracks on the album, even if they are not exactly mind-blowing (not that Neil Young was ever a showboater). "After the Garden" is actually quite a good song as is "Shock and Awe." "Flags of Freedom" is a bit of an upper, so I can probably call that the album highlight, though I'm sure the more politically-minded citizen will enjoy "Let's Impeach the President," an almost humorous overview of Bush's faltering standpoints. The final three songs divert from the general theme of dismay and protest, and offer feelings of hope and introspection.If you are not a fan of Neil Young, you'll find nothing here that will convert you, so you may just want to leave this on the shelf. If you are "anti-Bush" you might get a buzz off of the lyrical aspect, but that's probably the only thrill you will get. I tend to avoid anything political, so music aside, this album's message does not really appeal to me. It's like, yeah, people hate the President, blah blah blah, we know...give it a rest. For fans of Neil, I wouldn't exactly say "you're not missing anything" by avoiding this album; there is some good stuff on there, but you might want to wait until you see it cheap in the "used" bin at your local CD shop. And for those interested, this is not a Crazy Horse album.</review_text>
In the past, I used to distance myself from certain rock genres because of a bad first experience. I'd be introduced to band, not like it, and claim the entire genre as being 'not for me'. The Forecast, however, has changed how I feel. I, personally, love a heartfelt emo record just as much as the next guy, but only because I was introduced to Jimmy Eat World and Spitalfield a couple of years back. Those bands allowed me to embrace the entire genre as a whole, and expand my emo knowledge. Imagine though, if you will, that I was new to emo. You, in theory, hand me a copy of "late night conversations" and tell me to listen. Of course, I hate it, and lose any interest I may have had in the genre. To make a long story short, the only good that came out of 'late night conversations' (an underproduced, generic, stale piece of s**t) was the revelation that came post-listen. Never judge an entire genre by the first or second band you're introduced to (from said entire genre). Not every metal band is Iron Maden. Not every punk-pop band is blink 182. Not every nu-metal band is linkin park. Not every 'emo' band is jimmy eat world. Every aspect of music has it's ups and downs, and the forecast is clearly one of the downs.Now that I've bored you with an entire rant about nothing, I'd like you to PASS on 'late night conversations'. With your help, the forecast won't sell another record, and, in turn, leave the scene forever. Not recommended, duh</review_text>
Beautiful voice, but so much anger in the lyrics ruins the cd.  I was offended just reading every name on this cd...It is really a shame, what  pretty "vulgar" voice.  If this cd sells millions will you be proud of the message of hate you just pushed into millions of ears.  You should be ashamed of yourself as an artist, as you have such power, but it is spent on prepetuating hate.  Nina Simone was a angry artist also, but not once did she offend me (caucasian male) with her lyrics and all of her hate for racism in america.  The first song I ever heard of hers "Mississippi Goddam" made me cry, so emotionally charged and commanding of a voice.  There will always be a "racist america" because people are selfish, but be responsible as a descent human being and as an artist.  I liked the cd until I heard the lyrics, one less sale adds up after awhile</review_text>
ashlee's recent face lift and apparent nose job is proof that's she's all plastic and no talent. she must of asked the Dr to make her look like her sister. very sad cause she's unrecognizable now. better looking, maybe, still can't sing or dance.</review_text>
The people who have mentioned Aphex Twin and Four Tet have clearly never listened to either of these artists. If you liked the Stone Roses you will like this. It's not an 'electronic' album at all. I've ordered Manitoba's earlier cd after listening to the samples (the reason for purchasing both these albums) and I certainly hope it sounds nothing like 'Up in Flames'. It's funny, I promised myself I would never buy an album again without listening to it and yet it seems that samples on the net can be misleading, either that or Dan Snaith has had a serious identity crisis in the last few years</review_text>
I love The Who, a big part of my youth, probably in my DNA, but let's not kid ourselves: This is professional rock and roll made by professional rock and rollers. Is there any lyric here that Pete hasn't written before? Still writing about getting your first hit single?! And sadly the music sounds like Face Dances and All the Best Cowboys..etc, but not The Who Sell Out or Empty Glass. The band itself sounds faceless, generic. The only redeeming features are the raspy passion in Roger's voice and Pete's right hand.I hope the complete album makes garbage of this review, but unless Pete has written truthfully and passionately about something or anything of what his life and the world has been like in the last twenty years I'm afraid, like Wire & Glass, it will only be a rehash of previous works, no matter how good it sounds. Here's hoping I'm wrong</review_text>
Some reviews have suggested that this is not the ideal first purchase for the un-inititiated.  I am writing to confirm that assertion.  I have read enough raving reviews about their subsequent releases to know that it really does get better from here, but what a disappointment this album was for me.  It sounds like what you would hear coming from the garage next door.  My advice to the kids would be to keep practing and please turn it down.Jack's appreciation of the blues is admirable, but only realised on the song "I Fought Piranhas".  Tellingly, this is the final song on the album.  Otherwise the songs are forgettable and even annoying at times.</review_text>
In answer to a music fan from Temple Hills, the song was called King Holiday by the King Dream Chorus &amp; Holiday Crew. It came out on Mercury in 1986 and featured the singers and rappers you mentioned. It made no.30 on the R&amp;B Charts but didn't crossover pop. The lyrics are on the net (try Google) but I don't know if the song still is</review_text>
of every band/group, there is always the weak link, Tony Yayo proves that he is the one with Thoughts Of A Predicate Felon.  Many of the songs are not produced by Dr. Dre (one of the few things that G-Unit has going for them) resulting in "greasy" and bad beats.  Tony Yayo cant seem to trun his mouth away from drug trafficing, being locked up in prison, hoes, ect.  He lyrics aren't all that great either, making him have the worst voice in G-unit as well.  He sounds almost as if he is my grandfather- maybe as a result of getting locked up.  The few pluses on the album are "Drama Setter" feat. Eminem and Obie Trice followed by Eminem's constant adreniline rushing sound and beats (even though he only is apart of the chorus-a big mistake) as well as "G-S**t".  My advice, download these two songs- this CD isn't worth $14.00</review_text>
Well, I like the song "I shall believe" and that's why I purchased this Album, but it would have been better to buy just the single</review_text>
I'm sure it was fun for Van to record a bunch of songs he likes, but overall this would have made for a disappointing bootleg.  Thanks for all the great music through The Healing Game.  All good times have to come to an end</review_text>
it sounds like someone somehow got the deftones to suck worse than they already do. this album isn't nearly as musically interesting as tear from the red. i don't mind the singers new approach to vocals, but it just sounded like they didn't try at all. all the songs sound the same, the tempo is too fast on almost all the songs for the screamo sound, and hearing random voices and sounds of them in the studio between recordings just makes the album drag. although they've goten much tighter as a band and aren't as sloppy as they used to be, (they fell out of sync a lot in the opposite of december) this album was definitely a backwards step in their progression as real musicians. save your money and buy tear from the red instead</review_text>
I gave 2 star for this CD not because of the musical quality...but because the last song "Goodnight My Love" is cut short on this CD.After watching the live performance on cable, I rushed out to buy this CD, labeled by Hybrid. Only to find out my favorite song "Goodnight My Love" was cut short. On the CD, it ends with  the sax doing a solo then fades away....which leaves the song dangling and unfinished!!!   On the video, this song ends with Art singing "bring you closer to me" and the music slowly ends beautifully, correctly.There's a version out which was released by Sony in 2003. I don't know if this version contains the full song.The Hybrid Label version is simply ridiculous!!!  How can you possibly end such a beautiful song short!! leaving it unfinished....and well....SHORT and listeners wanting more!!!If someone can verify if the Sony conatins the full "Goodnight My Love"...or tell me where I can get this verson,  would really appreciate it</review_text>
I've seen and heard Sheryl live when she's not surrounded by rock and roll dinosaurs.  She's great - she's hip, self-assured and kicks butt!  But here, she tells the audience in "Leaving Las Vegas":  "I'm playing Central Park tonight... but I have some friends coming up so can you be patient...Please? For lil' ol' me? Be very patient...." almost begging the audience not to walk out while she's singing solo.  It's almost as if she knows that the audience will have to suffer her solo attempts until the "friends" arrive.  The irony is that Sheryl solo is the best part of the album.   With the others on board, we can't see what Sheryl can do, and those familiar with her know that Sheryl is capable of a lot.   She's overwhelmed by Keith Richard, Stevie Nicks, Eric Clapton, Chrissie Hynde and by including so many rock gods she herself is diminished in importance and stature.  Her songs "It Don't Hurt" and "There Goes the Neighborhood" stand out on the album showing that Sheryl can rock harder and better than any of her "friends." Too bad she didn't include "Am I Getting Through" -- the Part 2 of that was a great rock moment.  Natalie Maines' grating voice (like fingernails on a chalkboard) completely ruin "Strong Enough."  Chrissie sounds like a zombie on "If It Makes You Happy", Sarah McLaughlin is so hopelessly unhip and white-bread in her Lilith-Fair mode that she adds nothing to "A Difficult Kind"...in fact, by the end of the song Sarah seems to disappear from the song as Sheryl belts it to the end.  That's Sheryl's song and should remain so,  Tombstone Blues stands out for its guitar work and the best part of "All I Wanna Do" is the New York audience.  Happy, White Room and Gold Dust Woman are three classic rock standards, so overplayed that anyone who grew up to 70's FM AOR radio has heard them ad nauseaum.  Problem here is that nothing new is added to them, they sound like karaoke versions.  Despite Sheryl's plea for patience, I was bored with the old-timers.They didn't bring Sheryl's career forward, only backwards</review_text>
The DVD says:Nelly - The Longest Yard, Boom, Fly Away and Errtime; No Doubt - Hella Good; Natasha Barr - Move; Nicole Kindle - Oh My, Oh My!; Lynard Skynard - Saturday Night Special; Murphy Lee - Stomp; Jet - Are You Gonna Be My Girl; The Hollies - Long Cool Woman (In A Black Dress); 216 - U Should Know; Public Enemy - Give It Up and Opus De Soul; D12 - My Ballz and Peter Gunn Theme; Michael Kamen & Buckethead - Jack & The Ripper; Mountain - Mississippi Queen; Methods of Mayhem - Narcotic; The Crystal Method - Roll It Up; Big Head Todd & The Monsters - Boom Boom; CCR - Have You Ever Seen The Rain and Bootleg; David Shire - Fall-Off Truck and Cats & Dogs; Thomas Newman - Creek House; Wayne Hancock - Railroad Blues; Norman Greenbaum - Spirit in the Sky; Union Turnpike - Oh; Ludacris Feat. LazyEye - Get Back (Clean Rock Mix); AC/DC - Thunderstruck and If You Want Blood (You've Got It); Red Hot Chili Peepers - Higher Ground; Kool Keith & Kutmasas Kurt - Break U Off; Univ of Southern California - USC Drum Cadence; Tracie Spencer - Still In My Heart;Yea that's different and prolly a double CD...off to iTunes :)</review_text>
I own this set, as does my roomate, and we both hate it. It highlights bands like 'red lorry, yellow lorry' that no one likes or listens to, and  uses great classic bands like Bauhaus' worst song as the first track. It is  the hollow, tin-y, embarrassingly hokey side of goth, and i am ashamed to  even have it in my house</review_text>
I love Patti, and her last cd was one of her most consistant to date. This one is not good at all. This a low point in Patti's career, and God knows she has had enough low points on vinyl and disk. Live performances have been consistantly awesome over the years from what I can see on tv. I really wanted to like this, but "ain't no way" this song should have been remade by Patti and Mary who has a pitch issue. If you cannot do a song justice, don't sing it!!!!! Patti still has more vocal range left than most of her peers, but singing high notes don't "make" a song, interpretation is what makes the listener feel the lyrics. Patti and Mary need to learn that as age will creep up and lower ones vocal register. Patti should have listened to the doctor and waited for this one. This cd came and went, period! I literally gave it away!!!!!</review_text>
I agree complete with Erik Cobbett. This is Covenant's most unnecessary and boring album ever. There are a couple of nice parts on it, but generally it's a big disappointment.</review_text>
Generally on Amazon.com, the average rating of an album does not accurately indicate its quality - that is, the albums are usually highly overrated. This is probably due to the voluntary nature of the reviews and the fact that the fans of an artist are far more likely to review their albums and give them high scores than a casual music listener giving them the score they deserve. As a result of this, generally, albums that have an average score of 4.5 - 5 stars are usually excellent albums. Ones with a score of 4 are generally good and 3.5 indicates a pretty average album. Average scores any lower than 3.5 stars generally indicate a pretty poor album. As I mentioned before, due to the high proportion of fans reviewing albums, the average score rarely falls below 3 stars. It takes a pretty horrendous album, like Limp Bizkit's Results May Vary, to get a score of even 2.5. In fact, I didn't even think that it was possible for an album to get less than 2.5 - that is, until I saw this pile of feces.Now to put this average score of 2 into context - this means that the proportion of "hataz" reviewing this album is even more than the proportion of fans reviewing it. Out of all the terrible albums I have viewed, I have never seen this happen before. Not even to bands as terrible as Limp Bizkit or even An*l C*nt. This obviously indicates a decline in fan numbers and, hopefully, the end of Chingy's 15 minutes of fame</review_text>
It's Loud.  You can't hear the lyrics nor the words.  Just a lot of loud noise.  Great if you want to damage your hearing</review_text>
There are only two artists' music that I will purchase not having heard one note of the CD. Those two artists are Barbra Streisand and Linda Eder. "Songs of Judy Garland" was a HUGE disappointment. I was surprised at the CD cover. I don't know what "look" Ms. Eder was shooting for but she missed the mark. Instead of coming off as 10 years younger, she has been transformed to the point of being unrecognizable. She looks both spooky and a little like a petulant child.  Ms. Eder has always been a very attractive woman and definitely did not need this kind of "makeover". And the music...I tried so many times to like it. But the more I listended the more I realized I was listening to "Liza Minnelli" singing her mother's music. I did not hear Linda Eder. I'm begging you Ms. Eder, go back to what works. I'm sorry...this doesn't</review_text>
I have to disagree with the majority of folks here who consider this cd the jazz end all. I find it grating, and darn near unlistenable. I have built a small but quality jazz library the last few months. Miles Davis, Dave Brubeck, Kenny Burrell, Grant Green, Cannonball Adderley, Stan Getz, Chet Baker, Wes Montgomery, Bill Evans and Thelonius Monk to name a few. This guy is by far my least favorite. His playing on Miles Davis cd's I have and with Monk is largely enjoyable and I know he's a giant. But this stuff?. The live recording on disc two was so grating I couldn't make it through. It sounded to me like a bunch of Geese being slaughtered. Give me the other guys anytime</review_text>
Okay, I will admit to liking Poor Tom, Bonzo's whatever (it sure beats Moby Dick!) and Wearing and Tearing, but other than that this is a collection of outtakes that should've stayed outtakes. Low points include We're Gonna Groove, the live I Can't Quit You Baby, Walter's Walk and Ozone Baby. It's a shame that Traveling Riverside Blues and Hey Hey, What Can I Do were left off this album, and included only in the boxed set reissue - it's the only place you can find Hey Hey, What Can I Do, one of my favorite Zeppelin songs, and with Riverside Blues, you have a choice: Shell out $100 to get it, or sit through the crappy BBC Sessions album. If you're obsessed with the band, I guess this would be good for you. But the best version of Coda is in the aforementioned $100 boxed set.</review_text>
I purchased this album because I am a fan of the Last Poets.  Upon listening to the samples provided by Amazon.com, I thought I was getting an album that would contain very similar content to the Last Poets: some great politically charged poetry, perhaps accompanied by some funky beats.  However, when I listened to the whole CD, I was disappointed to find out that the vast majority of the tracks sound the most like "Get Out of the Ghetto Blues."  If more of the tracks had the sound of the title track, this would be a five-star album, in my opinion.  True, Scott-Heron has a lot of great social commentary throughout the album, but not in the form I had hoped for.  I would take the Last Poets' album "This Is Madness" over this particular Scott-Heron album</review_text>
This was just to much country for this parrothead. I liked one song, Piece of Work and that was about it</review_text>
I gave this a good listen, but did not find it all that funny ... or memorable</review_text>
Nothing like EON. EON is the one. This was a hack sequel with no guts. Very dissapointing</review_text>
I went into this a pretty big Golden Smog fan eager for a new effort from the guys.  With Tweedy's songwriting having taken a great upward swing in recent years and with Louris' departure from the Jayhawks, I was hoping we'd see a few more Tweedy gems and some great tunes from the past few years since Louris' "Rainy Day Music" was released.Now, while there are some really good songs here, nothing really comes close to the "Red-Headed Stepchilds," "Radio Kings," or "Jennifer Save Mes."  The album lacks something but I can't put my finger on it.  It almost sounds like a band that has too MUCH focus.  Considering Golden Smog started as a buncha musician friends sitting around, drinking beer, and goofing off, this album feels wrong.  It doesn't have that sing-along feel (with the exception of possibly one or two songs) that the first couple albums (and even EP) had.Just a little lackluster and, considering the amount of Louris has his hand in on this one, almost comes off as an album of Jayhawks throw-aways</review_text>
I was unable to play in my car CD player, soonly choice I got is to listen at home using my home DVD player.</review_text>
This album is not very good. I am a big fan of Life in General, At the show, and Slowly Going the Way of the Buffalo but this sucks. I listened to it for about 2 weeks and then it cracked my backpack on a road trip. But I didn't care, becuase it sucked. It was boring, and it had no flavor. Not the Mxpx I used to know</review_text>
Let's get one thing straight - Radiohead may be the greatest thing to happen to music since the Beatles.  That said, this is not the album for that reason.  Do not let this album turn you off from Radiohead...beacause it is truly not what they are about.  There is one hint though in where Radiohead will go.  In the song "Creep", which is not a fantastic song, there is a brilliant "CHU-CHUNK" made by Johnny Greenwood.   SO PLEASE - IF YOU ARE TRYING TO GET INTO RADIOHEAD...GO SOMEWHERE ELSE.  For the "rockers" - get THE BENDS, for people trying to expand their musical mind - get OK COMPUTER, and if you like that you may become obsessed with KID A.  There are some unbelievable songs on AMNESIAC, but it is not their most cohesive album, and HAIL TO THE THEIF is very solid.  Thank you for your time</review_text>
Boo-Wop? haha ok, anyways I bought his through Middle-Piller distro. and it's got a couple of o.k. songs on it. The problem is the singing and the overall production. This is definetely a home-recording on computer deal. The vocals are waaaaay weak. What exactly is a "re-worked" debut album??? I thought once an album was out it was done, set in stone? Apparently not,so mister monster gets to pull a Blitzkid (who changed their first album cover years after it came out!) and take the cheezy way out. A definete step up from bands like Blitzkid,but still in the cellar of rock n roll. Do yourself a favor and buy some good old deathrock from the golden years</review_text>
I like Jennifer Lopez, but I am not a fan of J.LO...let me explain. Jennifer started her career in the mid 90s, did some promising work (Selena / Out of Sight / The Cell / Blood and Wine / etc.), and a very well done debut album for an actor (On the 6). Everything was genuinely promising. UNFORTUNATELY, once "J.LO" was born (circa 2001), her endeavours got weak, too commercial for the sake of money, too fixed only to hype her up, not all that original nor different than anyone else, to truly stand out. "Rebirth" is an example of that. When I heard Get Right for the first time, I loved it, I thought it was catchy. It harkened the days of On the 6..that sassy, groovy, R-n-B vibe she had. Then I caught Step into my world, the only real R-n-B track on the album and thought, I'm feelin' it, definitely a favorite to this day. The the rest came along (3-11) and I thought, Sony & J.LO made this for the sake of money, due to her films doing poorly, hence she had time off to commit to recording a new album. I thought it was a very obviously fake attempt to compensate. I think she is a great performer, a very talented person, but I honestly don't feel this album makes her an artist, merely a reworking of herself musically.I rank it 3rd in her album line...On the 6 (4 stars)J.LO (3 stars)Rebirth (2 stars)This is me...then (2 stars)</review_text>
perhaps it's a bit unfair because lucinda engenders such high expectations, but i was really disappointed with this recordthe songwriting is weak, the singing is weak, and the arrangements are dullsomething kicked all the life out of the music--the songs are not all the same, but for some reason they all sound the same--and embarrassingly, you can sing most of them after one listen, they are so simplistic and cliched</review_text>
Greatest Hits collections of rap artists are usually a pretty bad idea. Most good rappers pack a visceral punch on first impact, but this wears thin with repeated listenings. This is especially true of gangsta rap. With what allegedly should represent the best work of B-T-H on one disk, this collection falls on its face trying to get around itself. Arranged back to back, the rapid-fire syncopated delivery that constitutes virtually every track on this collection wears thin. The raps blur together, and after two songs, the obscenity-laced machine-gun vocal play loses its novelty value, sounding more like a stylized novelty than any type of artistic vision. Once the raps lose their ability to hold your attention, all that remains are the rhythm tracks, which are serviceable at best. Their biggest hit, "Tha Crossroads", appears here in a version that is completely unrecognizable from its better-known form, further reducing the value of this collection. Worse, they include a warmed-over version of "F- Tha Police", an exercise in futility that only serves to dissipate the power of NWA's original.Spending money on this collection is like buying old newspaper articles. It might have had some value when it first hit the stands, but who wants yesterday's papers? 		C    Tom Rya</review_text>
Their basically what would happen if you took P.O.D's lyrics, and then added boring 1 chord riffs repeated throughout the whole song followed by the singer screaming the top of his head off about God and self-loathing in a noise-bleed inducing pre-pubescent girl voice, so you have a band so bad it makes God himself want to commit suicide. The song titles are also annoyingly bad, obviously made so they sound artistically genius (but instead monotonous).And to everyone who thinks these guys are metal, they deserve to be buried alive. Metal is Fear Factory, Lamb of God, In Flames, and Arch Enemy. These guys are about as metal as Maroon 5.</review_text>
one word.  generic.  terrible.  boring. (well, they are all one word)  people must learn to have a better taste in music.  granted there is at least one good song.  a few others are decent, but only because there are no vocals.  if you have heard any new band for the last 3 years, you have heard pulse ultra.  my friend likes breaking binjaman (another uber generic rock band in my book) and he listened to 2 songs from pulse ultra and said "thats enough".  do yourself a favor and buy a GOOD cd.  when will people learn!</review_text>
JUST LIKE IN MY OTHER REVIEW I CAN'T FIGURE OUT  THE MADNESS OVER THESE GUYS. I WILL ASK IN THIS POST AS WELL FOR SOMEBODY TO ACTUALLY EXPLAIN TO ME WHY THEY SHOULD BE HEARD AND ARE RELEVANT IN A CREATIVE WAY. HONESTLY PEOPLE YOU CAN'T CALL THESE GUYS ARTISTS. AN ARTIST CREATES SOMETHING FROM A IDEA OR TWO THESE GUYS TAKE THOSE IDEAS AND JUST LUMP THEM TOGETHER. IT'S AS SIMPLE AS THAT. AND TO TOP IT OF THEY DON'T HAVE THE CHOPS AS MUSICIANS TO BE RELEVANT IN THAT FORM EITHER. A COMMENT LIKE "THEY ROCK" OR "THE LEAD SINGER IS SOOOO HOT" AREN'T EXAMPLES OF A GREAT ARTIST OR BAND. FROM THE DATES OF THE LAST POST MY WORDS MIGHT BE IN VAIN, KIND OF LIKE THE VALIDITY OF THIS RECORD. BECAUSE THERE HASN'T BEEN A POST ON HERE FOR TWO YEARS. IF A FAN OF BANKING BENJAMINS DOES STUMBLE UPON THIS POST I INVITE YOU TO CHECK OUT MY OTHER REVIEWS, AND CHECKOUT SOME RELEVANT AND GREAT MUSIC</review_text>
This is the 4th worse song to be put out in 2006. Seriously, this is awful. Very juvenile and materialistic. This guy and his rented chains need to disapear. What a waste</review_text>
...when you're gearing up for suicide. This whole album sounds like the last thoughts and comments of a person who's going to just end it all. I found myself suffering nightmares, fatigue, misery and paranoia. My ears unclogged but I started getting headaches and a fuzzy feel in my head. This is not a good album for the stressed, because it will just make you feel worse. I find this album unlikable and mostly unenjoyable. When I first listened to it it sounded inaccessable, after listening to it more and more I started to get more "into" it, but I can't say I found it a good place to be in. It's a somewhat interesting album, but it mostly just dragged me down, made me nervous, numb and hurt my head.People say this is great music. Let them say what they want. Give me some old fashioned enjoyable music that doesn't make a pest of itself. Kid A is just ok to me, and hasn't been worth all the effort to "get into". This almost seems like a sadomasochistic album to spank the listeners. I don't know, maybe I'm missing something, but to hear some "weird" music like this that has miles more heart and is alot kinder to the ears, try "Passengers" by U2.And Thom York sings like a Muppet on this album.  By the way I've enjoyed Radiohead's first three albums quite a bit (including Pablo Honey -- why are people always busting its chops).</review_text>
I won't go into a long diatribe. Suffice it to say that when I listened to this upon its release earlier this year, I was disappointed. I gave it a few more close listens and find that the musical quality is not great. This is more a photo of dylan as a free-spirit. There's a point where baez messes up a song. (i don't have anything against baez. that being said, i don't have much FOR her either.) There's joking and laughing, but really, I don't need a double-disk of acoustic material that seems to be performed by someone who sounds like he'd rather be in the audience than performing. You can almost sense WHY dylan went electric in this concert.The bootlegs prior to this are superior and I would suggest that if you aren't a die-hard dylan fan to stick with them. If you really like dylan's acoustic work and not his electric stuff, you should be pleased with this double-disc.I love dylan, but not enough to enjoy this over and over again. I'll go to disk one of the 4th bootleg for my acoustic fix</review_text>
Yep, this cd sucks. That Depeche Mode guy is really random, what makes you think anyone who is looking at the punk-o-rama review would be interested in Depeche Mode? REM sucks too, Michael Stipe is the most self absorbed old bald guy ever.</review_text>
Maan, ima venda spenda of dis shizzi hur but fur shur, iz hord cor poor. I meanz what I be sayin is I be buyin all the hip s*** but when i play dis on ma player my mind be hurtin, in da bad way. So fow sho, to all da playaz out thay stay clean of this bad crack, itll hurt yow mind and yow poket.Fur shur dis is da Flippa, keep it clean boyz (yea, you punks now what I be sayin</review_text>
HEY!NEVER LIKED JA FOOL!HE IS AND WILL ALWAYS BE OVER!WHERE IS HE???????LIKE I CARE!ANY WAY!!!!50 HAS SOLD 16 MILLION+ CD'SAND JA FOOL HAD THE NERVE TO SAY 50 DON'T SELL!!HA!!!!!!JA FOOL!!!GREATEST HITS!!!!!!!!!!NUFF SAID!OVER JA FOOL RULE!!</review_text>
There's nothing in this I'd say even remotely resembles jazz. It's repetitive, has a rock beat, and consists mostly of licks taken from other players. If you're looking for backrgound music to play in a waiting room, this might be a good choice</review_text>
Crikey!!!! What is this chunder? Wait a minute....art students from "Down Under" get together and make fun little songs while watching reruns of "The Wiggles", decide they can market these tunes to an adoring fan base! Yeah, this stuff could be the soundtrack to "Forrest Gump" alright. "Run, Forrest, run! Run as fast as you can from this crap!!!" And these guys are touring, too? Are they touring with Barney & Friends?There is not one thing of value to this other than that the CD itself makes a handy coaster for your Foster's..</review_text>
The most untalented producer in the business. Honestly the only tracks that shine is all the ones with Biggie and Black rob's only one hit. The rest of this is trash. Especially those chickenheads Total. And once again Puff tryin to eat off Biggie carcass. Dont give this bum anymore money, Just listen to Biggies two gems and "f" the rest</review_text>
LOL! Some people cant be serious these days. The lyrics on every track are straight garbage. So he failed BAD lyric wise. Production wise, some of the beats are pretty good, but a beat doesnt make a song good! Nor does it make horrible lyrics good!! So I think some tracks where he gets deep are worth the try J-Kwon, but the game aint for you. I think this album is garbage</review_text>
This album is one of the only live albums that I don't have. I have heard samples, and a few extra songs on other cds though. The first thing I hear from somebody that tell about this album is basically that Stevie couldn't have been more high. His performance was just imbarrassing for the other members in the group (specifically Reese Wynans). Most poeple don't know this but, on the old vinyl copy of this album, (I've never heard it but someone told me) there was originally a 14th track. It was the song that usually comes close to the end of Stevie's sets. The song was Life Without You. Since it was the very last song, I'm guessing Stevie was more pooped than ever beacause it was the last song and that he was extremely high and everything. Being high is one thing, but being high and playing your last song in a set is terrible. In the old vinyl disc, Stevie was on his last song and he was so terribly slow that Reese Wynans walked off stage embarrased and discusted. This track was taken off the album because of its discracefulness</review_text>
History has a way of making the radical seem conservative, and certainly within the context of Cecil Taylor's music, his debut album, "Jazz Advance" is rather conservative.  Taylor, known for his relentless, dense music, did not emerge fully formed (although even at this early date, his music is far removed from his hard bop contemporaries), but developed over time.  For those of us who enjoy Taylor's music, this record is a historical curiosity, for anyone else, its either going to sound as one permutation further from the early Ornette Coleman idiom (indeed, this music is far closer to Coleman's sound than anything Taylor would be doing in the '60s or later).  My understanding is that when this was first released, it raised quite a stir.  Its a bit difficult to see why.Taylor is largely melodic-- performing pieces with coherent themes-- his experimentations seem to be in the use of block chords, odd inversions, and in soloing underneath the primary voice at this point.  The record is four originals and four standards, and as one would suspect, Taylor largely breathes on his own compositions.  He is backed by nearly inaudible bassist Buell Neidlinger and drummer Dennis Charles, with soprano sax player Steve Lacy on two tracks.  Neidlinger and Charles are far closer in the hard bop idiom-- their performances swing, Charles in particular is playing way inside hard bop.  This puts them a bit at odds with Taylor, who, while he gives more space than he would on his later work, is still more of a neoclassical improvising pianist than a jazz pianist.  When Lacy plays, Taylor's form of comping doesn't seem fully formed, or Lacy doesn't seem quite prepared to play inside Taylor's environment, and as a result he sounds somewhat detached from the pianist.The sounds of the future can clearly be heard on several tracks, "Bemsha Swing" features many of Taylor's clustered chords and runs, solo piano take on "You'd Be So Nice to Come Home To" presents the theme in a barely recognizable fashion and is as close to his future organized chaos as he'd get, and while original "Rick Kick Shaw" is far away from where he'd end up, its the first sign of the short of aggression that Taylor would harness in the future.  The music is enjoyable enough, but Taylor would reach such heights that its hard to not listen to this without comparing it to his future works.  The other complaint is the sound-- this issue is from 1991 and is in desparate need of remastering.In the end, this is an album of historical value.  If you're looking for an introduction to Taylor's music and aren't ready to dive head first into his methods, try "Looking Ahead!", its a far superior album by which point Neidlinger and Charles (who reprise their roles) were far more closely integrated with Taylor's music</review_text>
Very disappointing - Nothing like Riverdance  Would not recommend and I am avid fa</review_text>
Bad news is that I wasted my time listening to this whinefest.Good news is that I bought it used.I give it two stars because there are two tolerable songs on the CD and she is a cutie.More good news. I re-sold it for my purchase price</review_text>
I heard stories about Michelle Branch before trying out her music. And i was electrified to find out that there is still a young, honest and rock-ish female artist out there working her way up.First off all, i'd like to say i wish to remain objective to all other listeners' opinion, so yup...criticism is welcomed.I'd like to let people know what kind of a viewer is writing this particular review too.Basically, my main influences are Bon Jovi, the Goo Goo Dolls and ELO. I'm a 17-year-old male.Hotel Paper is one big step for michelle. She evidentally maturedher music between "Spirit Room" and this.Michelle is pretty much at the state where she can't really make big steps on her own. And that's why i think her authorities are limiting her potentials by pushing her to mainstream. Like the fact that she wrote so many catchy, boring and good-to-sell singles that won't last and are only appealing to listerners on the shallow side.Although some of her songs made me perfectly convinced that she CAN write decent music.(Tuesday Morning, Drop in the Ocean, Hotel Paper)Some peeps are saying how Michelle isn't quite a super songwriter nor a guitarist. I agree.IMO, many of her riffs are boring and unoriginal. Even a noob guitarist like me could tell. But afterall, it's pop, so that's inevitable. But she could do MUCH MUCH better than that.Her lyrics are ok since she doesn't write no emo nor punk junk, but a lot of complaining and childish relationships. Most are ok though.What i'm saying is, she most definetly has her own style...but sadly, it's surpressed at an extent where it's irritating and  makes me feel like killing those studio dudes that are spending way too much time laying their hands on Michelle's music.Nevertheless, just because Michelle is young and writes her own songs and plays the "guitar", doesn't mean you gotta try her music out. But sadly, that's exactly how a lot of people out there got attracted. I believe it's more about how you like the music.I can't stress the fact that michelle is a musician with great potential and future. But to me, it seems like she's throwing those away for popularity. One good example is, as prolly you've already heard...the posing for a men's magazine named M----. Whatever she was thinking, it really crushed my impressions on michelle...the cute musical lady she used to be....And the terrible decision of forming a pseudo-country rock band with her friend.Michelle IS talented and hella good compared to the other you-know-who female artists, but let's get real here...she has a long way to go. She most certainly is capable of going far and i really do hope one day i'll be listening to her matured and true music. Afterall, IMO, it's only the matter of time before she surpasses Amanda Marshall on my list.I really hope michelle could get out of this situation and unchain from this game the studio peeps are playing on her and make every song and every note the way she always wants to."Tuesday Morning" 3.5/5"Hotel Paper" 4/5The rest are just mediocre</review_text>
Following 2002's self-produced and underrated Under Rug Swept, Morissette returns in 2004 with So-Called Chaos. With this release, Morissette has done a complete makeover of her look with a serious haircut and sporting a look of casual glamour like she's aspiring to take Hollywood by strom but isn't 100% sure. Maybe the new look and image might have worked if Morissette's makeover in sound was good enough to go with it-but it's not. This CD starts out good with the opening cut "Eight Easy Steps," a fast-paced rockin' tune with Alanis at the wheel of leadership but also ready to bust her own chops at the same moment. "Out is Through" follows and also stands out, but then So-Called Chaos begins to turn problematic by not having an edge. And Morissette should never have brought John Shanks or Tim Thorney(or both)on board for assistance because she was left with bland arrangements behind many of the tracks. "Doth I Protest Too Much" is without a doubt the worst song Alanis has ever recorded. The title song attempts for a gritty and gutsy feel but even that attempt becomes overshadowed by Morissette's lyrics(yes, not her best work)when she refers to heartburn, headaches, and breached contracts as primary results of a chaotic lifestyle. The tracks continue with "All of Me," and "This Grudge," both rather dull, while the closing track "Everything" was a weak choice for the first single. Morissette has always been a progressive artist, but So-Called Chaos doesn't measure up to any of its predecessors, and may leave many fans longing to see the girl with the jagged heart still spinning with her free-flowing locks firmly in place.</review_text>
Quality is poor. Some songs are not playing. Avoid buying @Amazon</review_text>
This is the cheesiest music ever. Phil Collins, Glenn Frey, Chaka Khan? Are you kidding me? These were the worst artists of the 80's. Where's U2, REM, the Pixies, X, the Pretenders, Tom Petty, Prince, Springsteen, the Replacements, Husker Du? Does anyone like Rock and Roll? Phil Collins writes songs for Disney and Pixar now! What did Glenn Frey know about 'Smugglers Blues'? Do you think he was writing from the experience or from the heart? These are the worst artists, songwriters and performers of the 80's.  Enjoy the nostalgia, but the art which is song is seriously missing on this CD.</review_text>
We all know how great the songs are on this CD -- 5-Star all the way.However, I guess there's an unlucky few oddballs among us who can't play the SACD hybrid CD format of this particular reissue on our PC.  Which also means that we can't add the CD to our iTunes or iPod music selections.  In this day and age, that's severely limiting, so I regret this purchase (I don't have some jalopy of a PC/processor either, as my computer is less than seven months old, with 2GB of RAM).I don't know who to blame for my "mistake" -- myself?  Amazon?  Sony?  Philips?  ABKCO?I'll blame myself and be more careful next time -- in part by avoiding "DSD-" or "SACD-" labeled items.I'll also give the CD 1 Star on the basis of its limited technological usefulness to me</review_text>
Just saw the video for this while flicking. The song talks about london bridge going down and everything but the bridge is fixed, it doesn't go up or down with the video showing tower bridge. So bit of a mix up there.Petty maybe but just thought it should be pointed out</review_text>
I was anxious to hear an astounding modern yet retro dance disc from one of my favorite girl groups of the 80s. Unfortunately, instead of picking up on the latest influence of 80s music in dance music, what we get here is predominantly disco flavored tracks that sound painfully dated, with some Latin tones now and then. The only semi retro/electro tracks on here (and my favorites) are Feel For You, Love Bite, Your Love is Like a Drug, and Marc Almond's remix of Venus. The two lead singles "Move in My Direction" and "Look on the Floor" are not even the strongest tracks! And the remixes on their singles don't make them much better.I appreciate the commercial direction the girls have taken, but you can still sound mainstream while being more sophisticated than this. Take a listen to the new Madonna or even the Kelly Osbourne(!) to hear some infectious melodies with an 80s flair that don't melt down into total cheese. Unfortunately, I just don't see US radio embracing any of the sounds on this disc.But of course, fans of Bananarama should still add this one to their collection. It's listenable, if not up to today's standards</review_text>
I hate saying this as a HUGE Good Charlotte fan but their new album is just a major waste of money. Their first album is one of my top five albums of all time, but this one sucks. The songs are all dance pop synthesized junk. No real guitars, no messages to any of the songs, no nothing. I dont know if Joel is just too busy running around town with Nicole Richie or what but they skipped out on this album. The only redeaming song is The River, on which they colaberated with M Shadows and Synester Gates of Avenged Sevenfold. I hate hate hate to say it but dont waste your money or time on this one, just listen to the first album and remember what a great band they used to be.</review_text>
This album is a real let down and it pains me to say so, since I really do like the KOL. The first 2 cds were catchy and they rocked. I didn't care if they were singing about groupie sex or street brawling. It didn't matter because the songs were great.But on this cd they've opted for an experimental sound that doesn't measure up. Innovative is one thing but that shrill screech in Charmer-what the heck is up with that? How often do you want to listen to it? Once was enough for me. I wasn't expecting the Pixies here. And then there's the reverb employed on song after song-why? It just degenerates into white noise. There are a couple of good tracks on the dics- Black Thumbnail, for one. But then there are throwaway tunes like Camaro, which is about as clique as you can get. That said, art is subjective, and there are obviously plenty of folks who feel compelled to give this cd glowing reviews. But I find most of it unlistenable.I can think of many cds that merit a 5 star rating; this is definitely not one of them</review_text>
I was so disappointed with this CD.  At least 6 of the songs were recorded from VERY OLD albums....scratches and all!  They were SO bad. I play two of the songs over and over...the only two I liked. When I read the other reviews and there was mention of leaving out some of the songs, I assumed that they meant doubles of the same song....I was wrong. I don't know WHY they had to add the scratchy music..a filler?  I would quickly skip to another song...only to have to "skip" many times!</review_text>
I bought this in a haze of holiday optimism, having heard Ms. Aguilera knock my socks off dueting with Tony Bennett on a television tribute show.  There is no denying that the girl can sing.  Unfortunately, what she sings here is banal at best, and downright irritating at worst--lots of gratuitous squealing.  It's a real shame to see a talent like hers drowned by the tide of pop mediocrity.  I reluctantly gave this two stars rather than one in recognition of my age.  Maybe I just don't get it.  Then again, maybe it's just not there for me to get</review_text>
Bill Charlap is undoubtedly one of the most talented, lyrcially-blessed jazz pianiasts around today.  He has a deft touch and a senisbility that far exceeds his age and life experiences.  That told, I find it very hard to give his latest effort, Stardust, more than two stars.  With very few exceptions, I found this CD to be fairly self-indulgent and Charlap rather morose in his intrepretations. It wasn't nearly a refeshing to the ear as Written in the Stars.  I would recommend this for a Charlap devotee but no one else.  He has made better albums</review_text>
she is not a singer, she is not able to write, play and read the scores/Music. She is an entertainer! The problem is: you can't stop the stupid kids for buying the celebrate pop crappy albums today. Who still recognize this maid in the next 10 years? it is the same case like britney spears and spice girls!PS: pls throw away the cd from your window or burn it to the hot ash volcanos!!!Thank god for america's future pop artists like this one!</review_text>
After Norah's first two CDs and the Little Willie's CD I was greatly looking forward to this release.  To say the least I am disappointed.  I was listening to it on my commute home and had to switch to something else to keep from falling asleep.  Where is the range of work?  All of the songs on this CD sound very much the same and nothing really stood out to me.  I'm giving it 2 stars just because of Norah's angelic voice, otherwise I'd have to give this one a 1 star rating</review_text>
This great underground master DJ deservedly gets a release on a major record label... but there are too many rappers, not enough personality in the production, and obvious restraint in the sampling (surely the result of copyright clearance issues.) Compared to Z-Trip's amazing and audacious Uneasy Listening with DJ-P and Live at the Future Primitive with Radar, this is just a bore... yawn...</review_text>
I hate it when rock stars form those g0d awful "supergroups".  Can't people see that putting a whole bunch of different people from different bands together in one band is just a marketing scam and nothing more?  There's no such thing as a good supergroup.  The Supergroup is the only kind of band that deliberately tries to $uck.When Damn Yankees released their 1990 debut, every song on it was so incredibly generic, there was no hope for this band.  The whole album seemed rushed and thrown together.  They had nothing meaningful to say with these songs, it just seemed like they were pumping out filler and hoping somebody would be stupid enough to fall for their "supergroup" scam.  The big, booming, arena rock choruses just ring hollow.  I guess they're trying to be catchy and have memorable hooks, but to me, it just sounds like a lot of filler.Supergroups will always suck, because they diliberately try to sound bad!  Thats right people!  Supergroup members know that since they're already popular, the album they're putting out is guaranteed to be a big seller----"Why bother trying to come up with good songs?  We're already popular, so people will buy it no matter how bad it is! Lets just put out filler."  Supergroups are a TOTAL farce, its just easy money for the people involved, and nothing more.  If you buy ANY album by ANY supergroup, than you my friend, are a sucker!If you want to hear Shaw or Blades at their best, just keep listening to any Styx or Night Ranger album, and avoid anything by Damn Yankees, or any other supergroup</review_text>
The title says it all. They could have put a better group of songs togather</review_text>
I bought this CD after having seen Ken Burns' special on PBS. The energy that came through on screen in the Benny Goodman segments doesn't really come through in this CD. Artie Shaw said that Benny Goodman was too much of a perfectionist to take risks and so his music languished in predictability. That shows in this collection. Afterall, where would Jazz be if Jazz musicians didn't take risks</review_text>
I heard that song recently &quot;Three Strange Days&quot;...and I recalled how much I detested it when it came out.  Overt pandering to tyros in altered states.  Now I can't get it out of my head, and may require a lobotomy.  There was a lot of interesting stuff that came out in '91; but this wasn't part of that canon.  Nice try School of Fish.  Have fun playing the CYO circuit</review_text>
I LOVED Shedaisy's first album The Whole Shebang.  And I also really enjoy their Christmas albumn.  They have beautiful voices and I love the three part harmonies they come up with.  I was very excited to get their newest album but I was sure dissapointed.  This is a very dark and depressing album.  Almost every song is about lost love.  Also, all the songs but 1 are slow.  Where is the upbeat Shedaisy I fell in love with???  I would suggest passing this one up and instead just listening to The Whole Shebang again.  Still, I look forward to what the future may bring from them.  These sisters have alot of talent</review_text>
Most of these songs were previously sold on other albums from Martina. What a waste of money to buy this album of Mostly "old" songs and only a few new ones! Martina is sucking money out of the pockets of hard-working individuals. Maybe she should try getting a REAL job instead of using the average working person to support her lavish & luxurious lifestyle. Many of us are living in trailer parks & working 80 hours a week while Martina sitting on her a** in her million dollar house making money like rain! You, the people who are buying her albums are making her rich...what the hell is wrong with you people? Don't buy her albums and let her get a freakin' job so she can feel what it's like to work every day and actually earn a damn dollar! Martina, quit using poor people to accommodate your ridiculously high lifestyle</review_text>
This was o.k. Nothing more nothing less. This album was hard to review, beacuse no songs really stick out. I mean the guy is a mediocre artist with mediocre rhymes, laced over just above mediocre beats. I have heard better Sesame Street singalongs for yappy kids in the back seat of a mini van.I mean what does the album have that sticks out? "Saturday To Saturday"? "Bloody Horseshoe"? Or the multi- faceted "Boo, We Ain't Forgot About You" None of the above, or none on the album.Sorry. And please, all angry people who think that this is a bad review, remember, it's a REVIEW. I can say what I want</review_text>
Though these are the songs that make the Mills Brothers famous, they are not the original recordings that made these songs famous, and not necessarily sung by the same men that sang the originals (certainly they are considerably older).  These are OK, but they lack the punch and familiarity (to a fan like myself) of the originals.  The title, though not actually misleading, leads one to believe you will be listening to the original songs--they are not.  I recommend only if you must have the complete set of mills Brothers records</review_text>
Me especially I cannot hate on Cam cuz I got his first albums and thats when he was serious lyrically. Either the money went to his head or he just ran outta s*** to say. And judgin that his subject matter stays the same I guesss its true. Dude spits some retarded a** lyrics. I give this CD a two cuz of the beats. But this dude is a certified beatwaster. These producers need to give these beats to rappers who can actually spit bars. This n***a sumtimes don't even rhyme</review_text>
Do not buy this CD.  He is definitely wack. His silly rhyme style and dull voice sounds lethargic over uninspired beats. As a member of "Children of the Corn" he was weak and he still is weak.  The other member of his Dip-Set Crew outshine him on his own CD...how lame is that.  Through away any Cam'ron cd's you own and immediately replace them with music by Jay-Z.</review_text>
When the preview aired, I was pushing the movie to all my friends, based on the hilarity of the preview. At that time, I skeptically said, "I hope these don't turn out to be the only funny parts." and that was exactly what happened. The rest of the movie was full over overdone gross jokes, crass humor that went way over the line and kept running. The pee joke was funny once, but even at that one time they overdid it, then overdid it again, and then again. The Harry Potter parts were hilarious! Jack Sparrow was awesome! But I wished I had not been forced to watch the rest of the crap just to see a few funny parts of the movie. It's another Scary Movie (1) deal, only worse! I love the newest Scary Movies, they are funny, but 1 really sucked. It was funny now and then, but a lot of it was stupid. So is Epic Movie, only worse. Don't waste your money buying it. Rent and fast forward.</review_text>
It has been nearly three months and I have yet to receive the subject Michael Henderson CD.  Amazon should not be offering this item for sale, if they do not have access to a supplier</review_text>
SO this is the winner of PLOP idol from the U.K then.  Well they don't come prettier than this from Scotland I guess, that's for sure.  As far as the music is concerned, AVOID!  It's nothing but a calchony of crap.  Perhaps Michelle should stick at something she is good at - eating chips and mars bars</review_text>
Don`t waste your time and money on this compilation.  What a cheap shot to take the consumers money.  Read the very fine print, it does have a disclaimer but you really have to look for it.  Shame on the distributor!</review_text>
Eric Reed is a monster pianist. Under the right circumstances, he could record a Christmas album that would become an instant classic. This, however, is an unfortunate example of what happens when an overconfident artist tries to do everything himself.Reed produced and arranged this album himself. Probably if he had hired an objective producer, that producer would have told him to hire an arranger. Reed's arrangements are second-rate. His version of "Santa Claus Is Coming To Town" has been downshifted into a parody that serves as the worst example of an annoying trend: Reed attempts to put a fresh twist on nearly every song. It's an admirable goal, but he doesn't have what it takes; and the result is like a restaurant that serves hamburgers with a knife and fork, and swordfish crumbled over salad. It just doesn't work.I hope this isn't the last Christmas album from Eric Reed. He's one of the truly original voices of his generation; and with his gospel background and feel for the blues, there's no doubt in my mind he could record an album that would rival "A Charlie Brown Christmas." But this isn't it. He needs to hand over the reins of his next project and focus on the piano</review_text>
First off that has to be the worst rhyme I've ever heard in my life...  Andre Nickatina (in the rapping world) is one of the worst i've ever heard, but if you're into dope beats and his style in flowing with them (reminds me of someone on the ocean just being carried by waves, paddling every which way to stay with them), and what i mean by that is he tries to keep up with the pace and the beat and says (what feels like) every single thing that pops into his head from coke to what he had for dinner that night.  But overall, "if you can't dig it like its shovelled man i guess you ain't able" summs this and the rest of the Nickatina c.d.s up</review_text>
When Mike & The Mechanics ushered in the `Madchester' scene with The Living Years it was only a matter of time before these jokers attempted to jump on the bandwagon. If you want to be adored you should write some decent songs lads!Verdict: don't waste your money.</review_text>
Carlos Mencia is one edgy comedian; I know this because he won't stop telling everyone about it. I've never been a huge fan of Carlos and after listening to this CD my opinion of him hasn't really changed. He claims to be an edgy comedian and that's his problem, if he was truly edgy he wouldn't have to constantly remind us in his CD/DVD titles, his show on Comedy Central, radio/TV interviews and most importantly during his own act. Sure he talks about very racial and socially taboo subjects but so does Chris Rock, George Lopez, David Cross, George Carlin, Dave Chappelle, Richard Pryor (RIP) and countless other comedians and they are much better at it. In fact they are so good at it Mr. Mencia often feels to need to use some of these comedian's jokes in his own act, a true sign of respect for those who came before them; at least that's what Carlos seems to think or maybe he's just plagiarizing because he's not funny enough to come up with descent material. Needless to say I was not laughing while listening to this CD and it wasn't because I find Carlos to mean spirited, or crass, or politically incorrect; it's because everything he talks about that's supposed to be so gosh darn edgy has already been said by other people who are much more funny then he is. There is so much good stand up comedy out there people don't waste your time and money on this joke stealing, self aggrandizing hack.</review_text>
I listened to this cd and unless you are into the whole barking dog sound of a band I didn't like this one, one bit, but than again it was also for my husband. I definitely would not recommend unless you have heard of the band and like that style of music</review_text>
I was really excited when I received Tone Poems III as a gift. Wow, Grisman and Brozman! Two amazing fret men playing some wonderful vintage instruments. I couldn't wait to hear some excellent acoustic bluesy slide and Reso music. Unfortunately, this recording comes across like sugar poured on the tongue. If you like sitting around in beach wear and listening to Hawaiian strumming-which is at least half of it-this is the recording for you. (In fairness, track 15, "Style O Blues," and track 20, "New Steal," are wonderful. They have some drive and get-up-and-go.)I also own Tone Poems I, which Grisman did with flatpicker extraodinaire Tony Rice. That recording is also mostly a lightweight.I play mandolin and fiddle, and recognize David Grisman as the world's master with the mando. I also appreciate what he's doing with his Acoustic Disc recording label. These days, however, he seems to be better off when other musicians are running the show. The recent recordings with Vasser Clements and Old and in the Gray are great. "Hold On, We're Stummin'," with Sam Bush,is the best new mandolin record I've heard. Buy it and go to acoustic heaven!For my hard-earned money, however, the Tone Poems CDs have turned out to be an expensive set of matching drink coasters. I just know that musicians of this caliber, playing instruments of this quality, could have given us a better selection of music.</review_text>
Of the dozen tracks featured here, chances are the typical listener will only recognize four: &quot;Signs,&quot; &quot;Sweet City Woman,&quot; &quot;One Fine Morning&quot; and &quot;Gimme Dat Ding&quot; - and the last-named is out of sequence, having come out more than a year before the others.  The star of this show is Lighthouse's &quot;One Fine Morning,&quot; and Rhino must be praised for offering up the full (LP) version rather than the 45-rpm edit, which was about two minutes shorter.  It's a shame, in a way, that this song had lyrics; had it been an instrumental, it would have found a perfect and permanent home - on &quot;Music From NFL Films&quot; - it had that quality about it.  As for the other eight offerings: If they wanted to pick some obscure stuff, why didn't they go all the way and throw in Dusk's &quot;Treat Me Like A Good Piece Of Candy?&quot</review_text>
This Is as Bad as The Film.in Fact Just Like The FIlm The Soundtrack is the same old Formula.Will&amp;His Movies&amp;Music Never change the same Old Beat.The Rest Of The Soundtrack is just as  bad.UNORIGINAL&amp;BORING.What A Waste of KOOL MOE DEE</review_text>
Disappointing to see a man of Garbarek's gifts drift inexorably towards artistic middle-age and the lure of MOR classical and soft world-beat markets. No one expects him to do a 'jazz' album nowadays but after a six-year recording hiatus we might have expected some innovation and sharpness in the settings he chooses. Sadly,the evidence on this release is of an artist who's content to mine the same musical territory for about 15 years now to the point of exhaustion; theres nothing here he hasn't said better on his previous three or four outings. All is not lost though, and there are moments of stark beauty here and there but they are mostly lost in a soft sticky morass of Garbarek cliches and the kind of uninspired composition better suited to a film soundtrack or TV documentary about some beautiful natural environment. Forget the misleading hype elsewhere and get hold of just about any of his albums from about 1972 through to 1987 and I guarantee you'll feel better for it</review_text>
this is no SAW 85-92 as some people compare it to. Oh, no. This is a largely unfulfilling listen. The tracks all sound too similar. I realize Richard's concept was to just utilize anlaog gear, but the drum programming and harmonic "development" is lackluster. Only track worth burping over is the last one... XMD something. Has he been taking piano lessons since Druqks? For those that want some new electronic music that packs a punch, check out Nick Forte's new release "young man's disease" which is better than anything else i've heard this year.</review_text>
In the classic and disturbing 1972 movie Deliverance, Lewis (Burt Reynolds) gives this ominous warning to Ed (Jon Voigt): "Machines are going to fail. Systems are going to fail. Then... survival."What, I wonder, will Richard D. James (a.k.a. Aphex Twin, a.k.a. AFX) do when the machines fail?It's been nearly five years since his underappreciated album drukqs, where we got a tantalizing possible answer to this question: the plaintive, lovely, Satie-esque acoustic keyboard nocturnes intermingled among the abstract, frantic electronic soundscapes throughout its sprawling duration. [Another intriguing solution was proposed on the album Acoustica: Alarm Will Sound performs Aphex Twin...]Chosen Lords, RDJ's first proper CD release since then, is actually a collection of various tracks from his "Analord series" of overpriced, elaborately packaged 12-inch vinyl singles that he's been cranking out over the last year or so. Those who were put off by the excesses and overt eccentricity of drukqs may hail these cryptically titled, drum-machine laden compositions as a "return to greatness." Indeed, AFX is certainly reviving a more compact, accessible (for him), and straightforward style here, with comparatively regular (though not quite danceable) rhythms and those comforting underlying simple synthesizer melodies.I have to say, though, that there's a disappointing and somewhat melancholy sense here of a great musical mind spinning its wheels. By returning to such familiar ground he seems to be setting up systems and letting them run their course in an almost cynical way, without any of the maniacal glee that was once part of his singular musical personality on unforgettable releases like Come To Daddy, Windowlicker, The Richard D. James Album, and, yes -- drukqs. Notably lacking are the voices that once regularly appeared in his productions -- true, they were usually rather unsettling, distorted, and manipulated voices, but at least they added some welcome humanity. Also missing are those rare but beautiful moments of repose (ballads?) such as "Flim," "Nannou" and the striking piano interludes on drukqs.In the end, Chosen Lords, while an undeniably interesting and expertly produced collection of electronic music, is nonetheless a sterile, static, joyless affair. If it inspires any emotion at all, it will probably be pity and sadness as you listen to a possible musical genius coasting along without exploring any new directions for the first time in his otherwise remarkable career.Yes, I'm afraid the machines have failed Richard D. James, and I sincerely hope he can survive in this cold and remote musical wilderness of his own creation..</review_text>
Nothing even close to "say no More" I'm sorry I spent the mone</review_text>
This a great priced cd, but the content is why it is so cheap. It's a true-amateur album. Beethoven Lover is over her/his head. This is the real world, not a fantasy-everyone-likes-every-type-of-music world. Deal with it and agree with me. It isn't so great</review_text>
Blatant sentimentality without any touch of irony or wit = Elefant's lyrics.  I personally like Interpol and the Strokes; I resent that they are being compared to these cheeseballs</review_text>
The restoration of a Vivaldi opera must be a commendable effort specially if filling in big voids and rebuilding major missing parts of the masterpiece. Motezuma is such an example where ample musical and artistic license was taken to bring it to life. Like restoring a canvas where not only the colors and forms had faded but also sizeable parts were ripped off and lost, reconstructing Motezuma presents the challenge for the restorer of thinking and dreaming, and becoming as inspired as Vivaldi. In listening to Motezuma, one can pick up the original Vivaldian compositions from the reconstructed material as clear as looking at a combination painting part Picasso part Michelangelo. As much as such painting can be taxing to the eye, portions of this opera can be as disappointing to the ear. Except for several arias and the two sinfonias, the music has a touch and taste of the 1800's, but not of the baroque settecento. The juxtaposition of the restorative style is also distractive, and just does not work. It makes at times the orchestration devoid of the Vivaldi unf , charm, and texture.Nonetheless, Motezuma's musical beauty can be found in great arias such as D'ira e Furor Armato, La Figlia Lo Sposo, Gl'otraggi della Sorte, D'ove La Figlia?, S'impugni La Spada, and performances by Vito Priante, Inga Kalna, and Marijana Mijanovic. Bravo for Vito Priante and his interpretation of GI'otraggi della Sorte, and D'ove la Figlia. He does a great ornamentation in the da capos, and turns up the volume in all the right notes. Just like "Terribile lo Sento", and "Orribile lo Scempio", "GI'otraggi" shares the same musicalization. Somehow, this version of the score is especially more dramatic and  subtlely more melodic.</review_text>
I agree fully with &quot;A music fan&quot; above ... this and David's self titled album are really poor in comparison to the rest of his solo work. I love most of Talking Heads music but don't rate Remain in Light highly like most fans do</review_text>
Who could like a band like The Rolling Stones? They are not the world's greatest rock band and they never made anything good but Start Me Up and Shattered. Their new album is the most horrible CD I have ever heard. Stay far away from that CD. Get anything from the Stones that contains Start Me Up or Shattered insted.</review_text>
Yes yes we all know the mega hit When I See You Smile. But it would be unfair to put this album into the one hit wonder basket and instead review it as a whole.The band hits gear pretty early with Best of What I Got but after that it's pretty bad. How Possession ever became a hit I've not idea. Well, where I come from it didn't, but in the US this mob had a string of soppy power ballad hits.The production is good but the fire goes out for most of the album. Neil Schon is a great guitarist but it was the late 80's and the guy obviously knew what he had to do for a decent paycheck. Besides, he probably wanted some revenge on Steve Perry so he really wanted to make some cash. Pity, listen to some of the guitar licks here and there is a decent hard rock album in the man. Rockin' Horse for example.An interesting additin to the AOR landscape, and some of the music is lively. But when the whole thing has as much heft as a lettuce leaf it just doesn't get my vote. Even my devoted AOR fan girlfriend of the time only liked the one track (we all know which one).But hey, if AOR is your bag you could do a lot worse</review_text>
let me first say this, Roots is basically Paul Simon's Graceland, except nu-metalized. these guys went to south america, cut a couple of terrible tracks with "natives"?, then filled the rest of it out with generic nu-metal crapola with that guy from Korn cut and pasted into the mix for good measure. this is a particularily bad example of the vile and thank-you-god-in-heaven-it's-dead Nu-metal genre-meaningless pissed off lyrics, excessive "guesting" of other crappy artist, bad guitar, bad sitar(!), and the inclusion of anything to do with Korn, all presumabely done with band members sporting loinclothes and Rambo style striped face paint. the biggest waste of time, money, and matter. Its a shame that these guys are living and breathing and taking up space and resources that someone else could be using. A real bummer.</review_text>
Before you all dismiss me as an obsessive, close-minded thrash fanatic; I thoroughly enjoyed "Chaos AD," which was a Sep' album with the perfect balance of experimentation and death metal.I like the idea of experimenting with tribal sounds, but with those sounds, Max decided to throw in downtuned guitars, not doing guitar solos, excessive profanity, lame "I hate this I hate that" lyrics, and guest musicians.  The only decent songs on here are "Roots Bloody Roots" and "Dictators***;" everything else is awful.  This isn't Sepultura, this is Soulfly.I'm glad Max left because if he stayed in the band, Sep' would have degenerated into a nu-metal band.For good Sepultura albums, get these instead (starting with the best):SchizophreniaMorbid Visions/Bestial DevastationBeneath the RemainsAriseChaos ADDante XXINationRoorbackPS, you Max fanatics need to cut Derik Green some slack, he's keeping Sep' alive while Max is making an arse of himself with Soulfly</review_text>
I ususally like Aguilera and I need a song to practice for dance so I bought this one for "No Other Man" figuring I would like the other songs as well.  I was so wrong. I hate the rest of them.</review_text>
This completely lacks the charm and subtlety of the original.  Overblown, overproduced Mackintosh garbage. If he could have found an excuse to land a helicopter on the stage, I'm sure he wouldn't have hesitated.  Mr. Banks has been turned into a one dimensional clown and his songs have all been changed for the worst. And the omission of "Sister Suffragettes" smacks of PC nonsense</review_text>
Unfortunately I was EXTREMELY unhappy after listening to the album. Unlike many other Altan fans, I view Maireads singing as the weakest part of the groups appeal despite their having chosen some excellent songs over the course of their recording career. The problem is that on this album they emphasize her singing to the almost total exclusion of their  instrumentals which was what attracted me to the group in the first place. And the few instrumentals they do play are played with no spirit almost like &quot;well I guess we have to put a few instrumentals on&quot; kind of effort. I'm sorry, but she has a thin voice and is frequently shrill and off-key on many of their songs. She is however an excellent fiddler and that with the superb abilities of the other members and  inspired arrangements made them for me the top Irish folk group. Alas they have decided to stress her poor-to-mediocre vocals instead of their great abilities in playing reels, jigs, etc. I miss Frankie Kennedy's flute too. Goodbye Altan, your best day's are over unless you revert to the format of the old days</review_text>
My DJ side:I actually had to stop the music, open the tray on the CD player then check whether I had the right CD1 down-tempo in, or some other CD that my wife played before as the music was so not what I was expecting, sounding more like Deep Forest than JVM. To my surprise, it was Jimmy's Balance 10. I decided to Keep an open mind and listen to it anyway. I went to sleep after the 4th track. The next day I decided to listen to the second CD (mid tempo). Again I stopped the music, opened the tray on the CD player then checked whether I had the (mid tempo CD) in instead of the down-tempo I was playing the night before. Sure enough, the (mid tempo) was what I had in the player, but did not sound much different than the lullabies I was listening to on CD1. When the mid-tempo was over, I thought to myself "well, this would be very nice for an upcoming relaxing dinner with friends". The next day I had high hopes for the up tempo CD, cause well, as the name implies, it should be where the beats and treats are. But No. Not really.The only reason I didn't freak out from listening to the 1st and 2nd CD of Jimmy Van M's Balance release is because for three days I kept telling myself that there is an up tempo CD. I didn't mind CD1&2 out of place pop tracks, I didn't mind the different types of music being played in sequence, or rather, out of sequence. I didn't mind hotel lobby music that reminded me of a hotel I stayed in two years ago in Vienna. All this will be forgivable when I hear the up-tempo, because I was so sure it's going to be awesome. Unfortunately, I was not quite right about my assumptions. Things did not start happening until track 5 (The Reducer 2), I don't really need some 4 tracks on the third CD to get me warmed up. Jimmy warmed me up for 37 tracks before that, in his down + mid-tempo crap. For the most part, this production of the Balance series - especially the first 41 tracks in sequence - churned out some of the most lethargic, way too slow and boring music that could be described, at best, as lullabies for grown ups. As for the last 9 tracks of the up-tempo, it is actually - dare I say - decent enough, but way too late, and even worse, ended prematurely. It should have been re-arranged with tracks in reverse order on every CD to be as follows: (CD3) up-tempo should have been (CD1) renamed (in the car from club to home), (CD2) mid-tempo should have been renamed (at home in the living room) and finally (CD1) down-tempo should have been (CD3) renamed (in your bedroom).  This just makes more sense.  The reason I say this is due to the disproportionate figures of dance tracks given to us (9) to the rest of the sleepy, mellow ones (41). For example, chill out house almost always start with a faster track or two then goes on to be slower gradually. I have never come across a chill CD that opened with 10 fast tracks and ended with 03 slow ones, that's not chill. JVM Balance did exactly that; took forever to ascend to a certain point, then crashed almost immediately. What gives?Half star for CD1Half star for CD23 stars for CD3My human side:Dance music is not the only type of beautiful music out there, Duh!Jimmy made that very clear in this release. If you want to listen to a wide range of (not bad!) music, then Balance 10 is for you. Dive in JVM selection of what he thinks makes us human; expressions of the soul that goes beyond our daily necessities to survive. As a matter of fact, we don't even need music (or any type of arts for that matter) to survive at all. Still we listen to it, we crave it and for many people their livelihood depends on it. Music can represent our feelings, desires and wishes, and with JVM Deep Forest like music here (as I mentioned before) I can't help but wonder if he is going through a certain period in his life where spirituality and oneness with the world is a priority. I think it shows.</review_text>
I bought this CD for the Avril Lavigne song Keep Holding On. I really like her song, and this is the only way I could find to buy get it. Was to buy the Eragon Sound track. I havent seen the movie. Besides that I wouldn't have bought it</review_text>
In general I'm a big fan of movie music, but to tell the truth I expected more from this one. This soundtrack is incomaparable to say Lord of the Rings or Star Wars movie music. It lacks depth and emotion and power. Unlike emotionally potent melodies present in LOTR soundtrack the Eragon is pretty dull and uninteresting. I get the impression that the entire album is in fact a variation of a single theme called Eragon. I get the feeling that entire album has only one very long and boring track. I hope they'll make better album for the next movie of the Inheritence Trilogy.</review_text>
It Might not be A good Album but it definitely shows Shania's potential</review_text>
I loved her first album but this one is the same old same old rehashed time and time again she has reached her limits i'm afriad</review_text>
Forget the fact that despite the grumbling about today's "music" too many people just swallow and digest the slop record companies throw at them, "Hollaback Girl" is the absolute DUMBEST "song" I've ever had the displeasure to hear.There are two main parts to this travesty: 1. Where she says "That's my sh**" no less than a million times, and 2. She demonstrates that she's hooked on phonics by being kind enough to spell bananas for the rest of us.If this is supposed to be rap, Stefani failed miserably.  If it's supposed to be dance, again, she failed miserably.  To be honest, I don't know what the hell this is supposed to be because it sure isn't music.The fact that it was Number One for so long proves that perhaps people don't have any requirements for their ears.  - Donna Di Giacom</review_text>
I know, I know - I never thought it possible either, that Gwen Stefani could produce something more awful than anything her (ex?) band No Doubt and reduced to house-husband Gavin Rosdale's band Bush ever could combined. Take No Doubt's attempts at reggae, their use of guitars and trumpets (together? Never good), take.. well, every Bush song ever recorded and "Hollaback Girl" is STILL a hundred times worse. Let's talk about WHY.First of all, that fake music thing I hate. If you've read any of my previous reviews (and if not, why not?) you'll know that if someone is singing something, even if they've written it or not, you've got to BELIEVE it. I mean, Aretha Franklin didn't write "Respect" (Otis Redding did), but when she sings it - you believe it.Not so with this, a laughable attempt at a football-chant soundalike.  Here, Gwen tells us that "uh-huh, this my s**t" and "this s**t is bananas".  And then helpfully spells out bananas, all under a "Hey Mickey" type repetitive drumbeat. Gwen attempts to sound a number of things..a) 17b) blackc) "street"d) like she had any idea what the hell a "hollaback girl" actually WAS until someone told her a week before the song was written.She fails on all accounts.  What she DOES come across as being is everything that, well, she is. A white, 35 year old rich married woman bringing in expensive young talent to help her sell albums.It's not only an unconvinving song, but a crass, ugly, tedious NOISE.  But it has the word "s**t" repeated loads and loads of times, so of course it sold by the bucketload. Sigh and double sigh.I shudder to think what she'll come up with next to top it. Gwen Gangsta Rap?The_Curmudgeon_Hates_You@yahoo.co.u</review_text>
I heard this song on the radio the first time many months ago (and then for months and months it's been played nonstop).  I instantly hated it from the horrendous beat to the fact that Gwen Stefani is a 35 year old dressed up as a cheerleader with pom-poms and about 95% of the song is spent on the chorus "I ain't no hollaback girl" or "This s*** is bananas" section.  Pharell is a master producer and I chuckled because I thought that even the Neptunes can produce an occasional flop.  To my horror this song became the number one single for multiple weeks and became the most successful single of the entire summer (maybe even the entire year).  I don't see what people like about this song but apparently there is something I'm missing.  Like I said you either hate it or love it</review_text>
I liked this when it first came out b/c I was 16. I was a rebel, wanted to be part of something different. This is their best work since the weirdness does get lame after a while.Favorite song is Mongoloid...totally strange but rocking song. "Uncontrollable Urge" rocks (in a weird way) and Come Back Johnny is almost a conventional song. Satisfaction is completely unique but its not a good song.  The group was obviously trying to do more than music and develop a KISS, multi media, making money kind of thing.I saw them live (they were horrible) during their hey day. The most interesting thing about them is while other odd bands were eventually accepted and integrated into the mainstream, DEVO is still as odd of a group as ever. Mark Motherbough does a lot of soundtrack work (Rugrats) and you can hear the DEVO in all of his work.Anybody that gives this novelty group 5 stars is cheapening what true excellent music is. DEVO came out as a Goof, not as serious musicians. They got big in the 70's b/c they were part of the new wave and kids (like me) were looking for alternative music that we can claim our own.</review_text>
long studio sessions.  If you want a truly incoherent album strung together in a twisted way, then this is it.  If you don't, get Near the Beginning or Rock & Roll.  Get some of their quality stuff.  This definitely isn't it</review_text>
Well, unless you are a hardcore collector like myself (had it originally on vinyl all those years ago), stay clear of this album. If you want to hear noise that you & your wife/girlfriend/boyfriend could do yourself, then forget this album & make your own noise. The best track on the album is the bonus track. That tells you that this album has nothing to do with Beatles music. I give it one star for being terrible & one star for the packaging ;-).    Search Judemac Forever" on msn</review_text>
Atleast they are trying this time around. Still no where near as good as the band was with Max.Pros: Faster and more back to their roots than the other releases without Max at the helm. Guitar playing is passable.Cons: Lack of solos. Derrick is still lacking as a vocalist. Just isn't as good as old Sepultura, songs lack hooks and are mostly forgetable.Bottom Line: This album falls short of expectations. The current Sepultura is nothing more than a very average metal band at best. If you like old Sepultura I suggest you not waste your money on this, but then again you might like it. Buyer beware</review_text>
I'm a HUGE fan of Christopher Lawrence's stuff, but I aboslutely refuse to buy this CD because of the copy protection.  I do not pirate music, and should be allowed to copy music I purchase onto my MP3 player of choice.  This is just sad</review_text>
For fans, I suppose this would be a rather big delight; for non-fans, it's nothing that will turn you on to the band from Jersey. They had some okay, cheesy hits in the '80s - but listening to some of their modern songs from this collection proves how completely out of touch they are nowadays</review_text>
I guess I was expecting more of a Ferrante and Teicher thing with more than one piano going at a time ... could be that it is but, if so, am missing depth ... great family but disappointing albu</review_text>
Unfortunately TTD went off the deep end on this album.  Consequently he put off many fans from buying the brilliant next album &quot;Symphony or Damn&quot; and the superb follow up &quot;Vibrator&quot;. If you loved the first album, give this one a miss and get the two I just mentioned.  Come on TTD hurry up and release a new album</review_text>
i bought this album after hearing about them from a fellow beach boys fan.  i'm a huge pet sounds fan, but i love all kinds of orchestrated rock from "the left banke" to "beulah."  this album is not that good, people.  it's not even "okay."  there are way better takes on the "brian wilson" (read: phil spector) sound.  whether it's "the ladybug transistor" or "the apples in stereo."  heck, check out a great vancouver band called "ashley park" as well. the production on this is so rooted in the eighties/nineties that it's almost unlistenable.  they may be good road musicians but it doesn't show on this album, especially since some of tracks use lamo drum loops "a la stone roses."  you would be better off going through the elephant 6 label's recordings or even merge stuff.  to be honest, i didn't even find the compositions that scintillating, regardless of the production.  chord and change-wise, they're interesting....but that doesn't make the songs good.</review_text>
I purchased this disk along with others to play in my Acura DVD-A system.  I found the overall audio quality to be a bit disappointing...and the mix to be a bit "over the top" with surround effects.  Major vocals coming from rear speakers, etc.I also found the overall sound to lack the brightness and crispness on this specific disk. In fact, the demo disk for my TL has the Marvin Gaye song "Let's Get It On" and it is remarkably brighter on that disk than on this collection.If you are looking for DVD-A disks with 5.1 surround...I'd pass on this one and maybe purchase the CD of this album.</review_text>
Bits of Beatles,Zappa, Queen, (Herman's Hermits ?), may be laudable  in intent but reveals the crucial difference between an original musical mind and a talented imitator. Elfman's themes are good but his songs have some of the same faults as your normal Musical pieces, they have fairly banal, repetitive lyrics and are cut and paste music. Has the creepy competence of a Dave Grusin album. If you like that you'll be OK here</review_text>
Ok I'll make it short but sweat great music, singing sucks...this guy is flat every song and he should go back to the honk tonk and get away from rock...if you think I'm lying listen close how can anyone listen to this voice, HE CAN'T HOLD A NOTE AND SOUNDS LIKE HE HAS A MOUTH FULL OF MUSH, he sucked atcountry and has no place in rock...home boy go back to Texas andget back to branded some cows cause you suck</review_text>
Yeah, I am a big fan of moby, and accidentally buying the CD that almost ended his career doesn't shake that, if you want some good Moby might I suggest 18 or Play, this has some quiet more ambient tracks which show some promise, but fail to build up to anything, everything else is Moby screaming in a traditional punk style, which were almost humorous, except, not [this much money] humorous, I am not a fan of this CD, I know he was starting out in a punk band, but his other stuff is much bette</review_text>
Do yourself a favor and only buy his albums.  They're much more solid.  One Love. Peace</review_text>
If you're looking for Billie in her prime, look elsewhere.  All the music on this CD was recorded between '45 and '47 after she had lost her voice.  Look for the classic recording of Strange Fruit from '39 on one of the other CDs available.</review_text>
This is the perfect CD for taking a nap to. It's mostly full of slow pop and rock. If you're a fan of this type of music, I recommend this CD, but if not, don't buy it. There are only a few good tracks. All Star, Bad Reputation, I'm A Believer, Stay Home. And I don't enjoy buying a CD that only 1/3 of it is good. So, I wouldn't buy it, if I were you.</review_text>
(...)This CD is sub-par.  Most of the beats are cool, but they're overlayed with too many cheesy lyrics</review_text>
I like Meav's voice, and this CD is OK, if you like this kind of stuff. Think slow and somewhat depressing. I think Irish music has moved on so much since Bill Whehlan of Riverdance brought it into the modern times, and came up with this vocal sound, I guess to hark back to earlier times, which worked well because Riverdance has so much contrast in it and the choir songs only appear as relief to the other music. This is all a bit samey and dull. I would say saved by this lady's fine voice though</review_text>
I tried to listen to samples of the songs and you have them all wrong. I click on one song and get another from on the list. What gives anyway</review_text>
well i'll explain that later. she uses her own vocals. she doesn't even have the balls to let the artists who rework the song use their own vocals.I love how the editoral review uses the term "unique vocal TALENT". Yoko has no vocal talents. I must also point out I am Courtney Love's number one fan, so this should give me even more cred.It just proves how narcissistic and disgusting yoko is that she won't let other artists do an album using their own vox. She loves the sound of her own too much!I already went through that stage where I made everyone listen her as a joke. I was about 14 then. My point here, this isn't even a good joke.Its just dumb.I listened to the song clips provided on amazon. even that was too much.if you must, just download this album for free. Do not buy it. Do not in any way support this woman.I wish there was a zero star rating.</review_text>
I ordered this cd based on the reviews. First, I have to say that I am not sure why it is called 'Paris Under a Groove'. I was thinking that it would be in French, at least. The beats are nice, I would not in any way compare it to Buddha Bar.. I just wasn't as thrilled as I thought that I would be. It sounded very cheap. No originality. My fiancee is from Paris, and this was very disappointing- not only to him- but I was embarrassed as offering it as a present....So far, it sits on the shelf..</review_text>
as far as drum and bass cds go this cd was terrible very boring and anything with clever on the cover im going to stay far away from nuff said</review_text>
This is a copy of the review on Amazon.com for Van Zant's Get Right With The Man which is another Sony corrupted title."This CD secretly installs DRM (digital rights management) software on your PC without your permission. Not only does it do this, but the software then hides itself by installing as a "root kit."As per WikiPedia,--Root kitFrom Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia.A root kit is a set of tools used by an intruder after cracking a computer system. These tools can help the attacker maintain his or her access to the system and use it for malicious purposes. Root kits are known to exist for a variety of operating systems such as Linux, Solaris and versions of Microsoft Windows.A rootkit typically hides logins, processes, files, and logs and may include software to intercept data from terminals, network connections, and the keyboard. In many sources, rootkits are counted as trojan horses.--In this instance, Sony installs DRM software to copy protect their CD, and prevent it from being copied to various devices, all the while not telling you, the user, or letting you uninstall it because it hides itself from the user and Windows. Manually trying to uninstall it like some people have done, results in their CD-Rom drives disappearing entirely from Windows, as Sony installs their own custom CD-Rom drivers onto the system.DO NOT SUPPORT THIS WRECKLESS KIND OF COPY PROTECTION. SHOW THE MUSIC BUSINESS THIS IS *YOUR* MUSIC. *YOU* PURCHASED IT, AND THEY SHOULD *NOT* BE ABLE TO DICTATE HOW YOU CAN USE IT.Do not buy this CD. "A list of affected titles can be found here:http://www.eff.org/deeplinks/archives/004144.phpAnd another part of an Amazon.com review for the Van Zant CD"Amazon rocks. They pulled they infected CD's from sale and allowed these reviews that tell of the problems. Shame on Sony they not only messed with the consumers but also the artists."Trey Anastasio, Shine (Columbia)Celine Dion, On ne Change Pas (Epic)Neil Diamond, 12 Songs (Columbia)Our Lady Peace, Healthy in Paranoid Times (Columbia)Chris Botti, To Love Again (Columbia)Van Zant, Get Right with the Man (Columbia)Switchfoot, Nothing is Sound (Columbia)The Coral, The Invisible Invasion (Columbia)Acceptance, Phantoms (Columbia)Susie Suh, Susie Suh (Epic)Amerie, Touch (Columbia)Life of Agony, Broken Valley (Epic)Horace Silver Quintet, Silver's Blue (Epic Legacy)Gerry Mulligan, Jeru (Columbia Legacy)Dexter Gordon, Manhattan Symphonie (Columbia Legacy)The Bad Plus, Suspicious Activity (Columbia)The Dead 60s, The Dead 60s (Epic)Dion, The Essential Dion (Columbia Legacy)Natasha Bedingfield, Unwritten (Epic)Ricky Martin, Life (Columbia) (labeled as XCP, but, oddly, our disc had no protection</review_text>
After a very disappointing viewing of Harry's Only You Concert DVD, I got smart and borrowed Only You CD from the library. I'd hoped that concert was just one off. How sad, this CD is no better than that wretched concert. Slooooooooooooooow from the start to finish. And what happened to Harry's voice and phrasing? God, unbearable. When Harry Met Sally, Come by Me, what happened to you, Harry</review_text>
Good music but a bad title!  Elvis has left the Planet but a new King has been born with the self proclaimed new King of Rock and Roll Ken Rondell at http://www.cdbaby.com/cd/bigra</review_text>
I was, overall, disappointed by this CD.  There are many good reviews here, but they generally overpraise.  Tracks 4 through 8 have too much synthesizer for my ears.  A major highlight is track 9, The Crab and the Egret, but interestingly, the flute is accompaniment to the wondrous Chinese percussion.  Disappointingly, the CD is only 40 minutes long and left me wanting more tunes without synthesizer accompaniment</review_text>
I don't see the comparison to Jeff Buckley AT ALL! That was a singer who had more talent in his little pinky than this band has on the entire album. All the songs are much too similar, the guy's voice gets boring to listen to after a while and, if you remember London Suede, has a very similar sound to them (though I will say that London Suede was MUCH better). No one has come close to the pipes of J. Buckley (or even Tim B., for that matter) in years and this doesn't count any where near that, either</review_text>
1. Let's Get It Started: D-. Why not start Now 17 with a bad song?2. Lean Back: F. Continuing until futher notice...3. Goodies: F.4. I Like That: F.5. Ch-Check It Out: C-. Beastie Boys aren't that good anymore.6. My Place: F. Starting to continue again...7. Sunshine: F.8. You & Me: F.9. Why?: F.10. Locked Up: F.11. Baby It's You: F.12. Angels: F.13. One Thing: D-.14. Dare You To Move: D-.15. Cold: A+. ALERT! ALERT! We have issued a good song!16. Pieces of Me: A+. Gotta love Ash.17. Take Me Out: A+. Awesome!18. 1985: B-. It's just ok.19. Here For The Party: F. Eww!20. Days Go By: F. Country sucks!Another Now futuring only 4 good songs, "Cold", "Take Me Out", "Pieces Of Me", and "1985". Skip this one</review_text>
is it really necessary to take minute-long solos in every song? Really? If you like your solos long-winded and lacking in destination, and your lyrics trite (Get a Job???), check these guys out. If you actually plan on listening to the music you buy, skip it</review_text>
AC/DC is no doubt one of the best rock bands of all time, but they are not growing as musicians. Sure, they can rock like they used too, but they seem to be out of ideas. The well is dry. Put out a anthology already!!! At least my favorite band Deep Purple keep coming up with good stuff, and with imagination! The fact that Purple's music continues to fascinate as well as puzzle after all this time is evidence we are dealing with art of the highest caliber.Anyway, better luck next time Angus & Co.Stiff Upper Lip~ AC/DC : 2 stars</review_text>
i feel that a lot of bands were good in the 90's. this band was one of them. while yes, they were a bit poppy and sellout-ish on americana and conspiracy, they still had enough bad@ss in them to put on a rad song.  i think they should have just did a "da hui" single with "the noose" and maybe "cant get my head around you" on it. this sucks really bad. it makes the average conspiracy of one look like a bad religion album!! if you must hear, download or borrow.please guys. quit or make good music. its pretty pathetic hearing "hit that" next to the godawful creed and nickelbland!!so we go from a punk-ish hard rock band that is inspired by TSOL and The Damned and plays punk shows with pennywise to this...a corporate radio rock album that is loved by teenybopper frat boys and the mtv mindless</review_text>
As much as I like most of the songs on this CD...it's just too short. Also the production is lousy.  The recording quality sounds awful in places. Hopefully, the updated compilations are better. This one is not worth the money!!!</review_text>
I bought this based on reviews of "Bass Queen in the Mix."  To me it sounds like the West Coast edition of Northern Exposure without the 4/4 house beat.  In other words, its very electronic sounding, almost completely non-vocal and not very funky at all.  I listened to "Eargasm" by Plump DJ's and Icey's "Funky Breaks" after this and it's definitely missing variety, skill in mixing and that "neck snapping" funky quality that make the Plumps and Icey so indispensible.  Not too bad but not that interesting either.  I prefer her "Mixtress" and still have not heard "Bass Queen..."  BTW, my speakers are flat down to below 30 hz and I didn't find the recording quality or the bass that impressive.  Listen to Crystal Method's "PHD" or "Block Rockin' Beats" by Chemical Brothers after this to see what I mean</review_text>
There's a reason Oar flopped when it was released back in 1969: it sucks.  Thirty eight years later, with Skip Spence safely in his grave, some now give this pitiful mess *five* stars.  Since you can't give more than five stars here, they're saying Oar is on a level with masterpieces like Sergeant Pepper... Dark Side of the Moon... Led Zeppelin 4....!  Just between you and me, I think the government is still secretly drugging people.With all due respect to Skip's venerable memory, Oar is a painful aural experience.  The first two tracks, Little Hands and Cripple Creek, are halfway good, and show some production values; but things quickly deteriorate from there.  One gets the impression the rest of Oar was cobbled together in the recording studio just prior to taping - then put in the can after only one or two takes.  Lastly, the bass playing and drumming are just awful.Yes, it's too bad that things ended up like they did for Skip. And it's hard not to sympathize with him - he flew high only to crash hard.  But let's keep a sense of perspective: His tragedy did not translate into good music.  One extra star in his memory.</review_text>
Every one is obbsessed with "Hips don't lie". Don't they relize that the songs horrible. Well, so is every other track on this album. Save your money to waste on something that is atleast some what decent</review_text>
...unless it is rock and roll played by ac/dc. i f***ing HATE them. they are overplayed so much on the radio, and that is the most annoying voice i have ever heard in my life. don't waste your money on this cd, just turn on the radio...then turn it off</review_text>
Ana Carolina is a good singer and Seu Jorge is a cult culture figure here in Brazil, but this CD is a mistake. Do not spend money on this</review_text>
As if metalcore wasnt a chainsaw to your head enough, its absolutely ridiculous when metalcore bands mix emo with there already inoriginal sound. This band sounds like a even more flaccid Killswitch Engage, a Hawthorne Heights/Silverstein with downtuned guitars. As if it wasnt an abomination already, they even sing about vampires. Yes, thats right, vampires.And you couldnt get any g*yer.</review_text>
I HATE THE BEATLES. THEY ARE AMONGST MY MUSIC GUIDE TOP 20 WORST BANDS EVER. THEY ONLY MADE A FEW DECENT SONGS IN HEY JUDE, LET IT BE, AND BALLAD OF JOHN AND YOKO. REST OF THEIR SONGS JUST STINK! EVEN A MARK KNOPFLER CD WITHOUT DIRE STRAITS IS BETTER THAN THIS! LIKE I SAID, ANYONE WHO LISTENS TO THE BEATLES OR ZEPPELIN DON'T KNOW WHAT GOOD MUSIC IS ABOUT, HUH!!! GOOD MUSIC IS REQUIRED DIRE STRAITS, GREEN DAY, FOREIGNER, GNR, METALLICA, AND NIRVANA. GET ANY ALBUM FROM THOSE BANDS INSTED.THE BEATLES SUCK!!!!</review_text>
The Dictators are incredible. Few bands can alternativly spoof and embrace the rock 'n' roll ideals as these guys have, and their Spinal-Tap-meets-Ramones-mees-Beach-Boys style almost always works - almost. "Manifest Destiny" is a dissapointing release from the 'Tators. I mean its not a bad album, but the guys can do much better than this. There are a few good songs. "Disease" is hilarious, particulary the spoken word act from Handsome Dick at the begining. "Science Gone Too Far" is one of the band's catchiest tunes, proving they were as good as any of the big names from the 60s. Their closing cover of the Stooges' "Search & Destroy" is an okay interperatation of the classic. However, that's about it. The rest are mostly humorless FM-style rockers, and while the Dictators weren't selling out, they were certainly trying to become more accesible. Download those three tunes, and pick up every other album by the band</review_text>
I have to admit, I expected a lot more from Mr Setzer. The first track was ok, then it proceeded to go down hill from there. Not much rockabilly happening, then it all comes clear with "Really Rockabilly" when he slags off all his traditional rockabilly fans...world wide. He even gives us Aussies a serv, even though I don't think he has ever set foot here. If Brian wants to turn his back on rockabilly and try swing, jazz, rock or whatever, then go ahead, but why slag your old fans?. It's the last time I buy one of his CDs without listening to it first</review_text>
After really enjoying the Amici Forever album, I went shopping for another Amici album and found this one.  There really is no comparison between the two.  I've tried listening to it several times to see if I'm missing something, but somehow the selections and arrangements seem more appropriate for the Lawrence Welk generation than anyone interested in a spicy little opera troupe. I was very disappointed</review_text>
Hammerfall is one of the bigger names out there in the power metal world, and this cd sounds pretty much like the previous 5 albums. The only dofference is that they have gotten worse. I write this review to the two groups of people out there: The exisiting Hammerfall fans, and those trying them out for the first time. For already existing Hammerfall fans such as myslef, I strongly urge that you do not buy this cd, unless it goes below 3-4 dollars on amazon. For those looking to try Hammerfall out and get into the power metal genre for the first time, go ahead and get this one, because Hammerfall are by no means bad musicians. They can all play very well, but this cd lacks refinement and creativity. Start here and work your way up to the better Hammerfall, which you will no doubt appreciate more. Hammerfall keeps putting out the same album over and over and over, if you know what I mean. All of their songs sound relatively similar, but this cd marks one of the lowerest points in their career</review_text>
Young Jeezy even proclaims not to be a rapper; yet, he is a motivational speaker.  So, in this case, he is trying to speak to the youth of hip-hop culture that selling drugs and carrying guns is the cool thing to do.  He should just consider himself a rapper; that way, when he's using grade-school rhyme patterns to get his message across, we can just call him a bad rapper instead of a bad role model.Anyways, with that diatribe aside, this album is nothing new from Jeezy.  We all saw it coming.  He picks out some great beats, but cannot provide the great lyrics to go along with them.  Therefore, an uneven album ensues.  "I Luv It" was the first single and is a prime example.  If this beat might have reached someone such as T.I. or maybe even a group like Clipse, this would've been a great song.  However, it's Jeezy, so it's gonna be a letdown.That's pretty much what this album is; a letdown.  After guest spots on "Grew Up a Screw Up" with Ludacris and the posse cut remix "Top Back" with T.I. & B.G., i was expecting alot from Jeezy this time around.  However, all i got were two tracks ("Go Getta" with R. Kelly & "3 A.M." with Timbaland) that are recommendable.  The rest of the album is plagued with horrible lyrics over average-to-above average production.  If you're looking for "inspiration," look away from this "trap-star.</review_text>
Who in the world called this ''Hard Rock''?!???????????!!? This is a bunch of self-pitying, mainstream jibberish..nothing interesting at all. I shall dub this as ''Alternative Whine''.</review_text>
this soundtrack does NOT have all the songs in it from the movie.  i was looking for two from the movie, and the soundtrack did not have them.  like, a song by michelle branch that is in the movie is not in there.  bo</review_text>
Is this the same Kool Keith that created Dr. Octagon, Dr. Dooom, and Black Elvis?  &quot;Spankmaster&quot; represents a regression of creative energy.  It sounds like Keith decided he wanted to make a record one morning and whimsically threw together some tracks.  It contains little of the genius of his earlier CDs.  With the exception of a couple songs (&quot;jewelry shine&quot; and &quot;Blackula&quot;), this album stinks</review_text>
This CD is boring and derivative to the point of being cynical.A better alternative would be to listen to either:a) the original artists who influenced this bandorb) someone at least trying to do something new with music.To enjoy this CD you'd have to really want to like this band, either because you liked Dig or because you're attracted to their super-cool reputation.If you're afraid you're missing out on something by not owning BJM's back catalogue don't worry, you're not.</review_text>
As others have noted, this turns out to be only a handful of lullabyes in Spanish sung by Maria Del Rey, plus nursery rhymes spoken by children and men (not very good for putting a baby to sleep), plus the whole thing repeated in English.  In addition, I had been looking for traditional Latin American pieces and apparently all of these are contemporary.  Don't waste your money...I'm planning on giving my copy away if I can figure out someone I know who could actually use it</review_text>
Don Caballero have always had members leave, but this is ridiculous.  Che is not Don Cab even if he is an amazing drummer and started the band.  Ian Williams for one is a huge reason for the Don Caballero sound that I always gravitated towards and without him the band is incomplete.  Why Che decided on naming this new group under the Don Caballero name rather than Speaking Canaries or something else baffles me.  More importantly, the music is BORING on this album.  It's like the new members only influences were Yes and ELP sans vocals.  In other words, no spontaneity, hardly and time changes or dynamics and weak predictible guitar/bass lines.  Avoid this album like the plague and pick up any of the Battles EPs or better yet get the real Don Cab works like Singles Breaking Up or What Burns.  There is a ton of other great instrumental bands old and new in this type of vein that blow this "new" Don Caballero to pieces</review_text>
Outside of 'Curious' sung by Tina Cousins, this album is a dud -- at least by 'Believe' standards. Most songs sound similar with the same beat. The album won't make your ears bleed, but the band should have quit calling itself '4 Strings' after the departure of Vanessa. It is a very different band now, and should not tease 'Believe' fans into thinking another 4 Strings album of simliar quality and vocals is being released. I would buy 'Curious' if it can be purchased separately, but would skip buying this album. If a future reviewer knows where Vanessa ended up, please let me know. The mixers of the group are talented, but Vanessa was the real star</review_text>
after reading glowing reviews of the DBTs I picked up three of their cds. While some of the lyrics are strong, the songs have no melodies whatsoever. Most of the arrangements consist of guitars blaring over a terrible singer. They're reputed to be carrying on the tradition of Skynyrd and the Allmans. But those bands weren't just loud guitars...they had memorable tunes and great singers. DBTs are a huge letdown</review_text>
I am a BR5-49 aficionado from the early days at Robert's when the band played for tips and usually played requests until 2am with little or no breaks.  Admittedly, I long for those days as much as I long for stirrups in Major League Baseball.  So I'm nostalgic, "IT'S A FREE COUNTRY."  It is also legal for a band to evolve and morph in any which way it feels.  Yet, whenever I read a review in some fishwrap publication that states that a band has "matured," I can do nothing but cringe.  Here's the flowchart:  Band starts out - Band plays hard - Band gets cult following - Band gets reputation - Band strikes out on road - Band gets contract - Band gets a little more pub. - Band gets contract with bigger label - Band gets new management supplied by label - Band gets "coached" in next recording - Band changes faces along the way - Band changes label again - Band gets new direction from new label - Band fights for identity - Band produces new "mature" album - Band gets lost as cult finds new local acts beginning this process.Gee, I sure hope this isn't how the end of BR5-49 comes about, but enough of the doom and gloom of impending implosion.  This record is OK.  Of course, I realize that any band can't just re-hash the same 'ol stuff on every album, but part of what got these guys so much early attention was the raw exhuberance they displayed both live and on the vinyl.  One part of this was their ability to do cover songs usually better than the originals, and a simple taste of this is what I sorely miss in the last few recordings.  This band live used to be a wild, jittery, moving organism on stage, and although they are still a solid live show (saw them on the last tour at Poor David's Pub in Dallas), something has settled down. Chuck is a great talent, but an early appeal of the band was the vocal volley of Chuck and Gary Bennett. Ok, I'll go cry me a river, but dammit, just go listen to the Big Backyard Beat Show one more time.  Mature?  I just don't want to grow up that bad</review_text>
I used to like Rob Zombie, up until Hellbilly Delux.  Everything after that is garbage.  This album is no exception.  Every song sounds the same and is very predictable.  The lyrics are nonsensical, Educated Horses?  He says that phrase in like 3 or 4 songs on this CD, I think he is running out of material and throwing crappy CD's together to scrap in some extra money.  He needs to quit before everyone forgets he used to be talented.  I don't recommend this CD to anyone except the die-hard stalker-type fans that will buy all of his CD's/merchandise regardless.  1 star, I went through this CD in less than 10 minutes, very disappointed, and will never put it back into a CD-player again</review_text>
Sounds like it should be in a Meg Ryan romantic comedy.Did they intentionally try to erase his personality? Sounds like it was produced in Nashville!  This should be a demo for another singer to record.It's just too schmaltzy for me.  I think Phil Ramone may be slipping too.  Billy is a much better singer than this.After listening to this song I instinctively lit a match.  I'm going to go listen to Glass Houses</review_text>
I'm a big fan of "The Boss", but for the life of me, can't fathom why he is unable to follow the lead of larger acts, and actually "unplug" for MTV Unplugged.  This CD offers no new material that can't be found elsewhere, and is basically nothing more than a "live in concert" CD that just so happened to be filmed by MTV.This concert took place in 1992, and you know it's pretty bad when you have bands ribbing you three years later about going on MTV UNPlugged, and then having to go and plug in.  It's not like Bruce doesn't know how to play acoustic guitar, because he does.  I'm a big acoustic guitar fan, and for someone of Bruce's talent level, to not be able to write songs that can be played acoustically only serves to bring down the level of respect I have for his talent.Not what I would consider an essential recording, and not recommended, unless you are such a die-hard "Boss" fan that you have to own every album he puts out.  Otherwise, save your money</review_text>
I have all 5 volumes and this is the only one I don't like.  The selection of music is just plain bad.  There are a few songs that are OK but most are just dull, dull, dull.  I recommend going with one of the first 4 volumes instead</review_text>
I don't know who these people are, but they will give praise for ANYTHING!  Ms. London is a wonderful singer, but the producers must have given her sleeping pills.  This is a boring CD!  Like Peggi Blu, who won Star Search, her record company "toned her down" for her debut album, with banal and boring songs with that stupid hip/hop "dum de dum" Mary J. Blige beat, which will send you to nowheresville.Aretha Franklin's boring SO DAMN HAPPY was so awful, it's no longer available.  She went "Mary J." and almost lost the crown off her head.  Because she's Aretha Franklin (Queen of Soul) she DID manage (somehow) to get a non-deserved Grammy for "Wonderful" from that CD.  The Grammys also presented The Queen with her 17th competitive Grammy for her "A House Is Not A Home" mess.  What MUST they be thinking?Well, LaToya London won't be considered for ANYTHING for this hip/hop mess.  She should get serious about some R & B (I mean the REAL r & b) and leave this light-weight fluff alone.  LaToya, you have a great voice -- use it.  Contact Sam Dees, Jo Armstead or Ashford & Simpson and BEG for some material! And, as Madame Rose would say, "Sing Out, Louise!!!</review_text>
As a contemporary of Joan Baez (age-wise), I loved her early music and the power of her incredible voice.  I even empathize with much of her politics, but unfortunately it's time she rested on her laurels.Her voice on this CD is quite far removed from what she was once capable of, and in fact I would have to say that there is no comparison between her vocal ability on Bowery Songs, and her earlier quality.Like some professional athletes, she seems to not know when to quit...</review_text>
Being a huge Blondie fan, I WANT to rate this one higher, but sadly I cannot. It's just a sad mishmash of bad songs, it feel very negligant too. I love the way Blondie contributed to rap and disco, but their calypso number on this one is so awful. They had lost it here.Check out thier truly great albums instead like paralel lines or eat to the beat..</review_text>
You'll find better works out there, particularly if you're a Miles fan.   The emphasis here is on Milt Jackson and his vibraphone, which gives the  album a light, airy feeling.  Missing is much of Miles' horn and sentiment.   You also get a bit shortchanged with a mere 30 minutes of music.  I would  call this a &quot;pleasant&quot; album, which in my jazz-world is not a  happy thing</review_text>
Actually Garth Hudson, the former organist of the Band does not play on this cd (nor 'every geriatric rockstar's'). The musician you might be referring to is Al Garth ex of Loggins/Messina</review_text>
I was misled and thought I was buying the entire cd and it contains one song</review_text>
This album is all about sex and infidelity, is this all way Usher's life is about. This album contains to substance worth listening to. This album is a total waste of money. I like 8701 100 percent better</review_text>
The quality of the samples is better than the quality of the recordings.</review_text>
John Coltrane was villified most of his creative life for playing at the edge of a world he was helping to redefine. Wynton and the LCJO are in effect the death of creative musicians like Coltrane, or most of the truly creative Jazz scene for that matter. Wynton is establishing himself as "the face of Jazz". A market oriented phenomenon which freezes some of the elements making Jazz without ever capturing the true essence of the music. By telling us (and make no mistake, these guys do...): "this is what Jazz is" and trying to re-appropriate themselves the music of Jazz giants such as John Coltrane who, if he were alive, would not be given the time of day by these folks, Wynton and his posses are raping what is true and beautiful in this music.The recording, since I must talk about it, features a set of crafty yet discomboluted arrangements merely mimicking what Coltrane was, mostly empty of content, setting in motions soloists who sound more like "Jazz puppets" than anything remotely close to what Coltrane was striving for (notable exception: Ted Nash !).You do NOT need this record. Wynton and the LCJO does NOT need your money; spend it on musicians who put their life and their art on the edge, the way Coltrane did</review_text>
This CD was a Big Seller upon it's release in 1992, boasting a Plethora of Big Hits, along with some New Songs.  Looking back through 2005 Eyelids, it's hard to hear why these songs were so Huge....The CD starts off well, with Hits from the Primitive Love Album, but as One keeps listening, He realizes that None of these songs have Passion or Depth, a few catchy Melodies and Pleasant, if Plain Vocals.  The Dance Numbers at least keep You awake, but the Years 1988-92 found Estefan leaning on Ballads, and One was barely distinguishable from another; on top of that, the 4 New Cuts feel like padding, to fill a CD's worth of material for a Christmastime Release...a Couple of Hits are missing, too(i.e., Bad Boys), so to summarize, Nothing truly Bad here, but precious little on Target...</review_text>
Most people seem to like the soundtrack from"Glory",but this fact does not necessarily make"Glory"a great,or even good soundtrack...Most people also like the food served atMacdonald's,but no intelligent person would argue in favor of thier menu as being good or great based on numbers...It is something to put in one's mouth whenever nothing better is available and one is hungry...The same might be said regarding"Glory"...If one's tastes run to choir music,almost any gregorian chant album is head and shoulders above the insipid choir music to be found here...As for the themes,they are commonplace variations,often bootlegged from other scores by the same composer,or new work that the composer later bootlegged into other scores,so,all in all,the effort plays rather like a buffet offering at a cheap,"homestyle"diner...The film,on the other hand,was well done,and,apparently,from reading many of the other reviews here,the unwarranted praise owes more to satisfaction with the film itself,rather than very much stand-alone praise for the score.Horner has written a lot of really,really beautiful and original scores,but perhaps because most of his best efforts have been for small or little-noticed movies these have not been recognised for thier greatness...So,in sum,we are left with a very popular film,provided with a very mundane score by an award winning composer</review_text>
While I like some of these songs, I cannot understand a single word he sings.  I even heard him interviewed and I didn't understand a word.  When he sings, he spends all the time looking down, so you can't even lip read.  I don't think he has stage presence and I think it will be hard to grow a fan base with a singer who can't form words.  He doesn't sing clearly and I just can't get into his music completely.  I think I'll stick to R&B</review_text>
After chancing upon Galactic's rather remarkable live show at a local bar, I jumped through numerous hoops to track down this disc. Wasn't worth the effort, I'm afraid. Velveeta on Wonder Bread-dull collection of acid jazz  duds. Not bad as background noise for your next dinner party, but captures  exactly none of the blood and soul that make Galactic such a great live  act. A pass for all but Galactic completeists, if such an animal exists</review_text>
Okay, here is the major problem with this release: it is not a TuffGong/Island release. The Marley family has struggled with this reality for a long time. Because Bob's music has become so widespread and lacks the legal protections that American and European recording artists have enjoyed for decades, his recordings have gone onto the cheap market (flea markets, push carts, gas stations, etc-and now Amazon). Buying One Love only serves to strengthen these sleazy record companies and hurts reggae artists and the Jamaican economy. Look closely at the albums before you buy them. Find out what label has produced them and try to stick with TuffGong when possible.</review_text>
I'm sure glad I did not purchase this cd.  Back in the 1980's I had very little knowledge about O'Bryan Burnnette, but now that I am 22 and appreciate old school music a whole lot more, I know they made several mistakes while releasing this compilation.  "Soul Trains A Comin" (although not a chart hit) was missing.  I would perfer the original version than the 12 inch version used for Soul Train from seasons 13-"Maria" (a lackluster lp track from his latest lp, Surrender) should have been replaced with the beautiful "Together Always" (from his proper sophmore lp, You & I).  The horrible and silly "Drivin' Force" (also from Surrender) should have been out!  "Lovelite", "You & I" and "I'm Freaky" lp versions should have been on there instead of the 45 versions because they stood out very well!!  "Is This For Real," Right From The Start," and "Love Has Found Its Way." were the other great ballads and jams that were non-singles but were gems as well.  The absense of "Soul Trains A Comin'(original)", "Together Always", and full versions of "You & I", "I'm Freaky", and "Lovelite" really knocked off 3 points from Best of O'Bryan cd and should be made into a redo!!  For those that wasted thier money on this, "go on and cry" because Right Stuff Records done ripped y'all off!!  This underated talented artist (good singer, writer, producer, and instrumentalist) was trying to be the next Prince and Michael Jackson but he was considered more like a 1980s version of Carl Thomas (too soulful for the mainstream).People must have bought this cd (if do not have original lps no more) because more than half of the tracks are not available on other cds.I admit I love all the songs from the cd (except for Maria and Driving Force), but I WILL create a new CD under my productions, SOUL TRAIN ALUMNI SERIES along with my own compilations of Shalamar, Jermaine Stewart, Pebbles, Jody Watley and other Soul Train almumnis.1. Soul Trains A Comin' (original although I love the remix; loved the keyboard fanfare on the intro)2. The Gigolo3. Still Waters4. Right From The Start (great track and catchy hooks!!)5. I'm Freaky (full lp verison, the keyboard solo was missing from the 45 single 4 minute version)6. You & I (full original lp version.  Loved the closing)7. Together Always (O showed his true feelings on this 1983 track)8. Lovelite (full original lp version - LOVELITE BABY!!)9. Breakin' Together (good effort and loved the video!!)10. Go On & Cry (good ballad)11. Lady I Love You (what ever happened to lovin' your woman and tellin' her how you feel.  This was his best ballad ever and this  should school young catz like Bobby Valentino and R Kelly on real love.)12. You're Always On My Mind (I'm glad they included this lp track from 1984's Be My Lover on the compilation and would be good for the redo.  Beautiful ballad that shows a woman on how you feel although she's seeing someone else).13. Tenderoni (45 single, I never actually heard of the full lp track before but it was a good pre-new jack single)14. Is This For Real (great!!!)15. You Have Got To Come To Me (beautiful new jack ballad that should have made the charts)This here is the real Best of O'Bryan plus more.  Wish I can add more like "I'm In Love Again", "Doin' Alright", "Surrender" "Love Had Found Its Way" and "Shake" but had to pick the best 16 that would fit!!-- Thank You!!</review_text>
I agree with the other negative review below- Uninspired, simply forgettable radio trash.  Cliched lyrics?  Check.  Muddy, simple riffs?  Check.  Boring drumming with a couple of poorly played double bass kicks?  Check.Thank god I got this in a box of cd's from a DJ buddy of mine for free awhile back.  If I actually paid for this crap I'd have to kill myself.Judging from all the "positive" reviews however, it seems some people at Lava records or possibly the band themselves (if they're still around.  I hope not.) have been trying to plug this  sorry excuse for music.</review_text>
When the Airplane kept it tight as in 'white rabbit' 'somebody to love' they were a force to be reckoned with, but when they got ideas above their station as in this live album there musical weakness really showed. Now i happen to think that Jack Cassidy just about saves the band with that bass, but even he can't stop the monotony of 'bear melt' and 'rock me baby' surely the worst version i've ever heard and this is all down to JOrma Kaukonen's nasal vocal and mediocre guitar soloing. The guy maybe a great acoustic picker but his lead work leaves a lot to be desired and this is from someone who had to endure his interminably uninspired lead work at a Hot Tuna gig. Anyone who saw the clip in Woodstock will know what i mean..No wonder Hendrix's set was so eagerly awaited!Occasionally the band get it together and Balin and Slick's vocals mesh together brilliant, but on the whole the set is an endurance test and the studio versions are far more immediate. Face it when it comes down to it very few West Coast bands could stretch out and reach the heights of say Cream or Ten years after. As i said Casady is per usual on form but the drumming is fairly pedestrian throughout lacking the kick that could push the jams into another gear. It's better than 'thirty seconds' but then again anything is. If you think that 'happy trails' and 'live dead' are musical highpoints than this will complete the set, but i just think its sleep inducing</review_text>
I just purchased my sacd player and picked up Boston and Billy Joel's the Stranger at the same time.  After listening to the Stranger, my mouth dropped.  Billy's voice coming from the center speaker and all the other instruments and melodies coming from every different direction.  Then I put in Boston and couldn't tell a difference from the cd version I already own.  I think it's one of the best albums, but if you already own it on cd, don't bother upgrading - there's nothing special about the SACD version</review_text>
Van Dyke Parks did the arrangements on Sam Phillips's debut 'The Indescribable Wow', an album I love so much I thought I'd give 'Song Cycle' a shot.What a feeerocious disappointment! I'd give it zero stars if I could, but amazon wouldn't let me!My god, that singing voice of his reminds me of David Bowie... "The Laughing Gnome" Bowie, that is... I've seen the word "coy" pop up in a lot of reviews to describe his singing, er, style, but I'll go them all one better... "smug". All I hear in it is "Ooh, I'm so smart. What a clever lad am I."The arrangements or orchestrations, or whatever you call them are all pointless. It gives me the feeling that Van's dad bought him an orchestra and said, "Here, son, have fun." So young Van did... without ever really learning how to use it properly. Randy Newman KNOWS how to use an orchestra; check out his best album 'Sail Away'. The arrangements are tasteful and, key word here, SPARE. He never clubs us over the head with them.The lyrics, if we can call them such, have no attachment whatsoever to the music.... but then again since I wrote that the arrangments are pointless I guess it's to be expected.So, what we have is a trifecta of awfulness: bad voice, bad lyrics, and bad music.HOWEVER, he did make 'Song Cycle' in 1968 and worked on 'The Indescribable Wow' in 1988... so he did learn a thing or two in 20 years, namely that arrangements are NOT songs; they're used to highlight a certain verse or chorus the singer really wants to put across to the listener... maybe Randy pulled him aside once to tell him that...</review_text>
i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this album i do not like this albu</review_text>
Camera Obscura is similar, in an inferior manner, to Nico, of the Velvet Underground & Nico.  The band makes pleasantly dull "chamber pop" in the vein of Belle & Sebastian and all those other similar bands to emerge over the last few years.  Even their name is ripped off of Nico's last studio album, Camera Obscura.  But, as I said before, Camera Obscura is much worse than Nico.  If you want to hear what music like this was meant to sound like, pick up "Chelsea Girl," Nico's first solo album</review_text>
Someone suggested I listen to this because I was, at the time, into what lame beret-wearing record-store dips would call "creatively aggresive" music.  Then it was death metal (which I prefer without cursing or filth, you understand.)  Since then I've found the ascension into gabber and then full-on unmitigated hardcore.Anyway, Mr. Bungle.... tepid.  Uninteresting.  Bland.  Stupid.  Gives the chin-strokers something to fascinate over.  Let them.  Someone's got the fuel the economy</review_text>
Whilst Leo Kottke plays guitar like a man with three hands and John Fahey like a man with at least 11 or 12 fingers, Robbie Basho plays like a man with about eight thumbs. That this kind of tuneless twanging should be mentioned in the same breath as anything by Kottke or Fahey (or Peter Lang) is puzzling to say the least. But, credit where credit's due: it's not easy to make an acoustic guitar sound this unpleasant</review_text>
This album is waaay too deep and self-indulgent for my taste.Being a huge Alan Parsons Fan, it pains me to have to say this, but this was almost a total waste of vinyl, energy and money</review_text>
It' curious how an interesting history can be not well told by a modern music. In some cases the music go to the hand with the story, but not in this CD, in which we say the music that it is not for the story. I didn't ejoyed with that C</review_text>
The 4 CD mini Gibson Amp 'box-set'leaves off genuine off vinyl 78, and Lp 'harder-to-get' Charlie Christian/Benny Goodman recordings.  Legacy states "MASTER TAKES", but absolutely fails to research deep into Charlie Christian's recording history.Columbia vinyl 2Lp 30779, (1972), and Columbia 78rpm C -102 along with the Columbia "Sextet" Cds leave legacy far behind.The Wang Wang Blues -78rpm isn't in the 4CD set, and there are far too many 'false-starts', which Benny Goodman discarded for a good reason.  Star Dust is only about 3 minutes, it's 8 minutes on vinyl.  There is even In-studio handclapping after some tunes.I have the 78s, many Col. Lps, and there is no "Studio-Live" takes.  This 4 CD box could have, and should have been much better in information, content and genuine Charlie Christian guitar stylings.  The 2 readily available BG Sextet Cds are a better purchase idea, but there are still those super hard-to-get vinyl Lp tracks, which ARE "The Master Takes", left Off the legacy/Sony box set.  Musicologist's suggestion, try to get the vinyl Lps.  Skip this misleading 4 CD set of various tracks, + handclapping = NOT "Good Enough To Keep", (AirMail Special).Try the 2 Benny Goodman/Charlie Christian Columbia CDs, Amazon has both, and most of the Benny Goodman Sextet 'takes' are Master Takes, and "Good Enough To Keep!</review_text>
It's always good to see an artist change and try new things. Back in 2003 when Jewel did, it was a big deal. Everyone accused her of selling out, which I think is unfair. This disc, while different, is just not what I would call Jewel at her best. I found "America" somewhat enjoyable and "Run 2 U" was also, but the rest of the CD did not sit well with me. I did give her a second chance and recently bought her 2006 CD, Goodbye, and I must say, it's Jewel slowly regaining her musicality. Also glad to here that she will be making a country CD next, it will fit her voice well.</review_text>
I think someone forgot to tell Molotov that Rap-Metal/Rock-Rap was Dead. Had potential, but the simple riffage and annoying rapping killed it for me</review_text>
Buyer beware. These new Journey releases are reissues of their 1996 remastered releases. They are NOT remastered in 2006. Rhino should be ashamed of itself for this (it's been 10 years - I would have gladly paid for a remastered version, but not for new packaging)</review_text>
First they started out as nu-metal, then they moved onto metalcore, and now psuedo-death metal. It should be no surprise to the fools who listen to this garbage that they are clearly following trends, and after each trend dies, they just move on to another one. If my calculations are correct, expect a psuedo-black metal release.But, what about the musicians? Sure, they have a fast drummer...who likes to trigger alot, then they have two guitarists...who like to steal Pantera riffs, and then they have the singer, who, well, sounds just like all the rest. Atleast they dont have the DJ anymore (oh wait, they do, nevermind.)Enough of my rambling, how does this untalented group of posers fair up? Well, image if Mushroomhead went metalcore. 'Nuff said.Avoid</review_text>
Garbage metal - music for the American mainstream to feed on.  I saw them open for Slayer about 4-5 years back, and they had about 5 guys on stage doing nothing except JUMPING UP AND DOWN.  How pathetic !Pick up some real metal.... like old Kreator.</review_text>
Most other reviewers listed here believe that this CD is good - I wonder if the fantastic and marvelous nature of the legendary Mannheim concerts and the joyous nature of earlier Mannheim CD's have made it difficult to critique a Mannheim offering!  I am a student of all sorts of music and have been my entire life - and this particular CD sounded to me like one long track of exactly the same music, just with different chords.  In fact, if I was not paying specific attention, I couldn't tell when one song ended and another started!  I enjoyed what I heard, but I was certainly expecting more from this CD - many of these Disney songs could have easily lent themselves to more spectacular stylings - at the very least, some variety seems to have been called for.  Disney has always included great music with their movies, running the gamut of musical styles such as classical, jazz, blues, and even hip-hop - so maybe my problem was that my expectations were too high.  I do, however, highly recommend Mannheim CD's in general - just not this one</review_text>
Having been a casual fan of Stax records for a few years; I decided earlier this year that I should go all out and splurge on this 9-CD box set. Big mistake.I have many, many complaints about this set; but what it basically boils down to is that this whole set is an absolute mess. It misses many key B-sides such as Otis Redding's "Hard To Handle" and Booker T & The MG's "Tic Tac Toe"; and doesn't even include every a-side the label released, despite the title of the compilation (where are the sides that Hoyt Johnson released for the label?). The linear notes by Steve Greenberg (the man who gave us that phony "Soul Queen" Joss Stone; and the headache-inducing Baha Men) are horrible, mostly focusing on his personal opions of the artists and/or songs rather than the stories behind them. And within the sections for each disc in the booklet; they entries aren't actually arranged in any particular order (least of all the order of the tracks on the CDs, that would make too much sense). And there should've been more photos, too.Add to this the set's main problem: the music. The fact is that most of the songs on here are really lame. Seriously. "Why did you buy it, then?" I hear you say. Well; the Stax songs I was familiar with (such as "Green Onions"; "B-A-B-Y"; "You Don't Miss Your Water"; "(Sittin' On) The Dock Of The Bay"; "Soul Man"; "Born Under A Bad Sign" etc) are all great songs. "Well, why don't you like this set then" you're thinking. Answer: because the 30-or-so great songs on here are sandwiched between over 200 filler songs over 9 discs.If you think I'm being harsh on these songs, I'm not; I can appreciate songs like Wendy Rene's "Bar-B-Q" and the Memphis Nomad's "Don't Pass Your Judgement"; but aside from a few good numbers and a few pleasent-but-dull numbers, most of the non-hits on here are pretty bad.Basically, if you really like a Stax artist then go and buy a best-of for that artist; if your looking for a sampler of Stax's best songs, then go and buy the 4-CD Stax Story; don't bother with this one</review_text>
After two albums of wholly instrumental music, Joe Satriani apparently decided it was time to start singing.  "Flying in a Blue Dream" is the only Satriani record with several (six) vocal cuts.So how are they?  Well, Satch's voice isn't superb, but he does an ok job.  The problem really is with the material-- it's clear he'd gotten used to writing pieces as guitar features.  The only real exception to this in my assessment is frantic electric blues "Big Bad Moon"-- the piece is blazing and explosive, the vocal is passable, and Satriani is on fire.  But pieces like "Ride", "The Phone Call" and "Strange" are all pretty much forgettable (well, "Ride" is actually a bit too irritating to be forgettable...).The remainder of the material is a mix between exploratory (and primarily acoustic) pieces ("The Feeling") which are nice but largley filler and "Surfing With the Alien" styled instrumentals ("One Big Rush", "Back to Shalla-Bal").  The exception is the chugging opener and title track, "Flying in a Blue Dream", which features Satriani at his most lyrical as a guitarist.Invariably, the album is a bit too weak for its own good-- it's probably also a bit too long (about 65 minutes) and probably would have benefited from being trimmed down a bit.  Start with "Surfing With the Alien", come back to this if you want more of the same</review_text>
http://www.strangeland.com/asp/show.asp?id=13635http://www3.strangeland.com/asp/show.asp?id=99</review_text>
My copy of "Reckless Nights..." (and yours, too, probably) has a sticker on front that reads: "One of the Most Influential Musicians of the 20th Century."  Well, I'm so glad that Columbia cleared that up.  Otherwise, I'd have had to make up my OWN mind, and apparently music labels don't allow that nowadays.  I hope similar stickers are included on Chopin, Mozart, and Bach CDs (with the century adjusted on a per-composer basis).Scott's gimmicky fare makes for pleasant listening, but not in such a large dose--monotony sets in after two or three titles, let alone 22. Halfway through this CD, I felt as if I were listening to the drone of a defrosting icebox.  For all the outrageous hyperbole thrown at Scott--no one else like him, no way to categorize his music, and so on, and so on--the reality is that composers and arrangers like Ferde Grofe, Duke Ellington, Glenn Miller, Alec Templeton, and Bill Challis covered the same ground far more skillfully--and, in most instances, earlier--than Scott.  Concert jazz, symphonic jazz, or whatever you wish to call it, was NOT the invention of any one man, and certainly not Scott.  Check out Grofe's scores for Whiteman--in particular, his writing for woodwinds and his constant, Scott-esque use of muted trumpet.  Listen to Duke Ellington's "extended" compositions circa 1929.  For that matter, listen to Ellington's 1933 "Daybreak Express"--virtually the template for Scott's galloping miniatures.  Experience Bill Challis and Glenn Miller's pioneering big band charts.  Or... believe as you're told to believe, i.e. that Scott, and Scott alone, performed this kind of music.  I mean, who needs history when we've got hype?  It's up to YOU, dear listener</review_text>
The CD came as promised and in the condition promised.  I'm very satisfied</review_text>
I do not understand why people are so waxing poetic about this album.  There is nothing new or 'fresh' or 'original' or at all thought-brovoking about this music, unless you happen to be easily pleased by any simple pseudo-pop sound.  I have only recently discovered the world of no-wave music, but I was introduced to it through artists like Arab on Radar and Scissor Girls.  So when I tried out my first Sonic Youth album, I was way more than dissapointed.  I don't know how this can be classified as no-wave anymore.  Sure they show some trait in a few wailing off key guitars and an occasioinal shouted spoken word, but they are all only half-assed and are muddled up in cliche indie pop love tunes that have only been done in every other band.  The most notable anything is the catchy medlody of Becuz.  It is really catchy, yet it managaes to be unique enough to rise above the typical "catchy tunes" ethos.  Xiu Xiu's "Knife Play" would probably be considered more of a pop/no-wave sound that does not sacrifice the aggressive anti-music drive of no-wave... AND still retain the emotional pop sinsibility.  I don't know.. All I know is that Wasing Machine is a letdown.  It does not reach me artistically by a long shot.  Emotionally, I can think of am million other artists (Mars Volta, Emerson Lake & Palmer, cLOUDDEAD, Ulver, Edvard Greig!) who can put me on a much higher cloud and help me get in touch with the human condition.  This however is far to cheezy, and I don't know, but I think it reeks of that shallow indie fashion clique..</review_text>
Here's a line from the song Vato on this album: "I wouldn't be the n_____ that I am if I didn't pop n____z in the mouth."Isn't that poetic? Snoop Dogg manages to pull off an amazing feat. He makes sex, drugs and violence seem so ... boring. I feel like I am supposed to be offended. But it's too boring to be offensive. We have songs about every kind of gang violence, every kind of drug, and every kind of cheap sex. And what are we left with?He gets two stars because his approach to the city of Los Angeles is fresh and loving. Hip Hop should be local, and he does a good job with that. Otherwise it'd be a one-star</review_text>
This recording is not great company.  I'm really confused: is it a Broadway recording or a very poor amatuer recording?  And if so, did this rubbish actually make it to the Broadway stage?  I feel for the people that saw it, and were expecting the rich full melodies that Sondheim produced for this show.  The Musical Director for this abomination should be called a Mutilation Director, because that is precisely what he did to the music of this show.  So the only advice I give to future Musical Directors that want to revive and revamp a show: If it's not broke, please, please, please don't try and fix it!  Some things are just perfect the way they are.  Don't buy this CD.  I did and it is now a coaster where it gets better use</review_text>
I played several samples of this CD on my computer while visiting the Amazon website and my male cat started meowing along.  This CD is good for calming a cat and lining his box.Face it, Yoko can't sing (unless you have a cat's ears.)</review_text>
wots happened to memphis hiphop it goin out the window or its already gone out the window there pushin any old sh'' out for bucks anyone who is in2 real memphis years 94 to 98 2000 max when rappers were hungry no,s wot im talkin about old underground tapes the only guy doin stuff to that form now is evil pimp and thats a bit over the top but come on guys we want them simple murder beets back with them sik lyrics instead of that shoutin crunk sh,t 36 is now pushin,,,, get back to your roots alot of people are now reachin out for the old siccness from back in the day tommy wright playa fly kinda sh,t even koopstas devil playground piss,s on this wack sort your stall out koopsta</review_text>
Certainly not deserving of the Grammy (for cast recording).  Each of the other nominated productions is MUCH BETTER than this poor excuse of a revival.</review_text>
DE LA PROLIFERACION DE BANDAS ANGLOPARLANTES DE LOS '70,NO ENCUENTRO MOTIVOS PARA DESTACAR ESTA PLACA....UNA MAS Y NADA MAS UE ESO..DESPUES DE TODO, ES MI HUMILDE OPINION....HUMM..HUMBLE PIE, DESCANSA TRANQUILO....</review_text>
Wow guys... How many of you are on crack?Ive given this album 2 whole listens an it still sucks ass. Besides if I should have to listen to something more than a few times to know its hot then its wack. Cause if you listen to ANYTHING enough you will like it. It's human nature...Keith, ummm... Excuse me " Dr. Octagon " is a retard, mentalcase, and has no lyrical ability. Half of you people like this just cause its so different. What he says makes no sence, and has no meaning. That which he does say that does make sence is nasty, and weak. His flow is awefull. His delivery is AWEFULLL. Automator does a good job on the boards making nice beats, but Keiths lame ass f***s up good beats...Feel free to click that you dont agree with this Kool Keith d***riders. :</review_text>
First Bill has never nor will he ever be a jazz musician. It seems that those who branch out and play multiple styles are often lauded for expanding the vocabulary. Here's what chaps my hide the most. Bill has somehow captured the attention of hordes of budding guitarist with their effect pedals all strung out as if they were getting ready for a space shuttle launch. It burns me too no end when a person calls himself a &quot;jazz&quot; guitarist, but doesn't really have any chops. I know Bill has been called anti-technique, but what does that really mean? Would you want a heart transplant performed by a surgeon that means well, but really isn't very good at what he/she does? This guy is getting built up as something new and it seems every time I turn around someone that knows absolutely nothing about jazz guitar is throwing this guy in my face. I've been a professional jazz guitarist for 12 years and teaching for 8 years. When I have guys that actually debate me that Bill is somehow doing more interesting things than say Pat Martino, or that Bill could somehow hang in a jam session with someone like Pat Martino, I have to shake my head in disbelief in how twisted and mixed up this world has become when charlatans are giving more credit than someone like Pat who has been on the road for years and paid dues that Frisell couldn't imagine. Is Bill Frisell a Jazz musician, No! Maybe if the guy could woodshed for a dozen years he'd come up with something. For me I'll stick with the guys that really know how to play......Johnny Smith, Peter Leitch, Jim Hall, Pat Martino, Kenny Burrell, Billy Bauer, Tal Farlow, Lenny Breau, Jimmy Bruno, Jimmy Raney, Wes Montgomery and so on</review_text>
I would call this the musical equivalent of the worst of abstract art.  There are those that "appreciate" unintelligable works for fear of being thought stupid if they don't . . . just as the emporer's subjects "Ooh"ed and "Ah"ed in admiration of his clothing as he paraded naked in front of them</review_text>
If this had been the first album in the "Hip-Hop Hits" series, it would not be a promising start. There are a few decent tunes on here, but as someone who admired the quality of the earlier Source albums, I must express an intense dislike for "Hip Hop Hits Vol.8". There used to be a time when The Source gathered the biggest AND best tracks from the rap indusrty for their compilations, now Benzino has turned the series into a shameless promotion for his own favorites (How else do you explain Ja Rule being here?). Here is a song-by-song analysis of this disaster:(1) YoungBloodz feat. Lil Jon  "Damn" C-. This song is perfect example of why people are getting bored with "Sothern Crunk". It's lame and boring, as it shows Lil Jon becoming a one-trick pony. Not a good song to open an album with.(2) Wyclef "The Industry" B. Wyclef is very talented,but this song was never a hit. It should be heard for its quality though, even if it only touchs topics breifly. It is clear that Wyclef is above most of his peers in everyway; sorta like 2Pac.(3) Chingy "Right Thurr" B+. Not my favorite rap song,its better than average though, it kinda grows on you. He reminds me of Juvenile. It's content is not original, but Chingy makes it his own with a relaxed flow and style.(4) Young Gunz "Can't Stop, Won't Stop" C. If this standard work is what Roca-A-Fella has in it's post-Jay-Z future,the label is going to be in real trouble. They're good, but they have to be better than good to stand on their own.(5) Westside Connection feat. Nate Dogg "Gangsta Nation" B+. It was nice to see Westside together again. The style and talent cover up for the somewhat standard material. At the bare minimum, the song is stylistic and very enjoyable.(6) Ja-Rule "Clap Back" D. This anti-Eminem dis is just border line pathetic and lame. Any Eminem song is a bigger hit and better than Ja Rule's weak new stuff. If Ja Rule wants to return to his position "Pain Is Love" brought him to, he must work much harder.(7) Kanye West "Through The Wire" C. Kanye West has enjoyed chart success through alot of hype, but I find this song to be very pedestrian for rap. The lyrics don't define Kanye as an original rapper, and the use Chaka Kahn's "Through The Fire" doesn't make a very appealing beat.(8) Gang Starr "Skills" C. The group isn't that good to begin with, and this song has none of the fun that "Militia" had. Gang Starr has a decent, hardcore sound that needs to be refined in order to define themselves.(9) J-Kwon "Tipsy" B-.This song is fun to listen to, but that still does not make it any better than average. It's not really about anything and gets kinda tiresome towards the end; you may be looking at your watch. He's too overpraised.(10) E-40 feat. Clipse "Quarterbackin" C+. The track is enjoyable but was never that popular and is pretty forgetable. E-40 and Clipse just aren't that talented. It almost feels as if it was made strictly for the "Madden Football" video games".(11) Fabolous feat. Tamia "Into You" A. Just great, hip hop with style and substance. It's so nice to hear a gentler, more positive hip-hop songs; one that doesn't hammer the listener, but brings out emotions lightly. He is one of the best rappers of 2003; with both his album and it's singles.(12) T.I. "Be Easy" C-. He has been compared to Jay-Z and Nelly; despite the difference that he lacks the talent those artists have. Plain, boring, generic rap from an artist who ofers nothing new to the game; no more needs to be said. One must also wonder why this was chosen over his bigger (not exactly better though) hits "Rubber Band Man" and "Let's Get Away".(13) Cassidy feat. R. Kelly "Hotel" B-. A sorta fun track, R. Kelly does as much as possible, but he even he can't make Cassidy sound original. To be honest, this was a huge Top 10 hit though; so it kinda does belong here.(14) Ying Yang Twins feat. Lil' Jon & the East Side Boyz "Salt Shaker" B+. Surprisingly, the beat and production make this song rather entertaining. It's much more fun than it has the right to be; given the non-spectacular artists involved.(15) Scarface "Recognize" C-. Scarface used to be an exceptional rapper, but now he's trying to regain glory that is no longer his. Why listen to this, when you could just buy his older albums?(16) The Untouchables featuring Benzino "Relationship With Me & My Gun" C-.Just a standard Benzino track tacked on for shameless self-promotion. I wouldn't mind so much if the songt had actually been worth listening to. Atleast "Bang Ta Dis" on "Vol.5" was a good song.Bottom Line: *1/2. Benzino has ruined the once great Source series in the blink of an eye. If you want to hear a great Source album, buy "Hip Hop Hits Vol.4"; a Source album with the BIGGEST AND BEST raps of 2000. A few good tracks are not enough to balance out all the mediocre ones. To put it in short terms: with so many good compilations out there, why spend money on a bad one? I would not buy this album with a gift card.</review_text>
There's nothing outrageous about the title song - it's a lame, mind-numbing piece of crap compared to many other songs found on the "In the Zone" album: Imagine "Breathe on Me", "Touch of My Hand" or "Shadow" on constant radio play or running on MTV. And no, we're not apparently going to have that because Britney's precious time was wasted in incorporating this bore of a song into a single and even attempting a video out of it, like we know ended up in Britney's injury. For nothing.Fortunately for this single, it's got the already legendary "Toxic" and a marvelous vocal mix version of "Everytime" - another star for that.</review_text>
Released by Atlantic five years after it appeared in Australia, presumably to meet high demand for AC/DC's music, this international version of "DIRTY DEEDS DONE DIRT CHEAP" is a farce. Once again, somebody had the rather strange ideas of altering the song sequence, and replacing both "R.I.P. (rock in peace)" and "Jailbreak", two of the strongest numbers in the album's Aussie version, with T.N.T.'s "Rocker" and "Love at first feel", an OK, if not spectacular song. Ah, and "Problem child", already featured in Atlantic's version of "Let there be rock", is also included in here. The same song in two different "official albums". Marvelous!. Oh yeah, and somebody hired HIPGNOSIS in order to re-design the front and back covers. That was a cute detail, but the Aussie version's covers (classic mid 70's cartoonish artwork) are far more appealing.Who's to blame for this rip off?. Somebody at Atlantic Records?. Some members of AC/DC?. Maybe both?. Who cares anyway?. Once again, now that I've got used to the Aussie album, listening back to this "product" feels worse than a hangover from consuming adulterated, low quality spirits.Every enthusiastic record collector knows that both Warner Music and Sony Music are serious labels that took, and still take risks, by signing up cutting edge artists and by respecting their will. So, it seems that, with their approval of this re-issue, the surviving members of AC/DC are the ones to blame for this farce to go on, and on, and on ... If this is so ... well ... guys, we, the fans made you filthy rich. We deserve the "real deal", available worldwide, at a "reasonable price". I only give this "product" a 2 star rating, just because "Love at first feel" remains unreleased in Australia. How unusual!.A final word about this re-issue: I don't own it. In the words of Pete Townshend, I "won't get fooled again". In order to get bonus material, you must go through an irritatingly cumbersome Internet gimmick.If Bon Scott (undisputedly the band's most uncompromising member ever), was still alive, I believe things would be different. By the way, if you are interested in the real stuff, please be so kind as to read my review of "DIRTY DEEDS DONE DIRT CHEAP" (Import).OTHER ITEMS TO BE AVOIDED: The skimpy "retrospective" EP "'74 JAIBREAK", and "BONFIRE", a rather steep box set in which at least 6 songs are repeated twice, in different versions. None of these titles include all the songs left out by the adulteration of AC/DC's first four Aussie albums</review_text>
I have *NOT* listened to this album in full. I am, however, completely turned off by the fidelity of all the samples I have just listened to. There's NO excuse for an album sounding that bad in '69. Ghad, there was Zeppelin, Hendrix, Clapton, Miles - who recorded this thing?All musicians on this CD are superlative examples of their mastery of their instruments, but the above reviewers in general are correct. Holdsworth MADE Lifetime along with Tony William's kick-ass drumming, and most probably insisted - perfectionist that he was, and still is - that it *sounded* like something other than a bootleg.Personally, I'd regard this as something a collector should have - it's for a devotee, not for someone trying to access the genre for the first time because the fidelity is just darn terrible - and one of the above reviewers is so correct. It's like Dylan looking for his "Girl From The North Country", or "Knocking on Heaven's Door". At least they let Tony Williams in so he wouldn't sing any more!All gags aside, a dissapointing effort. Overpriced, but one to have if you are a collector. You have to strain to hear the seed of what was to become Holdsworth's version of Lifetime, which I have not forgotten for 30 plus years. A quantum difference in fidelity, and quality of music. I'd rather buy Tony William's Lifetime Collection if I had to make the choice. I'd be tempted to pick this one up on peer to peer if I was desperate... Very UNimpressed</review_text>
First, here are some general positives about Jaci Velasquez:- She is a very gifted singer. Her vocal range is top-notch - definitely on par with Mariah Carey and Christina Aguilera.- She is beautiful. And unlike a previous reviewer, I do not consider the recognition of this attribute to be a sign of shallowness but rather a display of appreciation for feminine beauty. I like beautiful singing voices. I like beautiful women. There's no difference.- She has great spiritual depth. Her music reflects key spiritual themes such as love, faith and joy.Now, here's a critique of the CD:I listened to all the music samples (as you can do as well) and only one song caught my attention - "Lay It Down". The other tracks have too much of a hard rock sound and were too experimental for my taste. But the song "Lay It Down" was different. It sounded more acoustic, more in the style of folk rock - a genre that reflects my personal preference in pop music.I found the sound clip of "Lay It Down" to be intriguing because it reminded me of a hit song in the 1970's - Eric Carmen's "All By Myself", later covered by Celine Dion in 1996. "All By Myself" is a ballad having a soft, understated introductory verse with an explosive chorus. The sample clip of "Lay It Down" appears to be in the same mold. It has a soft, understated introductory verse; however, it seems to lack an explosive chorus.Listen to the sample and hear it for yourself. The introductory verse is closing with the following lyrics:"All of my hopes and my dreams and my best laid plansAre slowly slipping through my folded hands"So far, so good. There's only a piano and a violin accompanying Jaci's soft vocals. Next, the song appears to be moving from the verse to the chorus and you hear the following lyrics:"So I'm gonna lay it downI'm gonna learn to trust You now"Now here's a problem. I am expecting to hear the beginning of an emotional outburst - an opportunity for a singer with the pipes of Jaci Velasquez to showcase her voice. But it is not forthcoming. Why?This intrigued me and I wanted to hear the whole song but I did not want to purchase a CD for only one song. Luckily, I discovered that a compilation CD of Jaci Velasquez's best songs was released recently and it contained "Lay It Down". Great! I bought the CD - "On My Knees: The Best of Jaci Velasquez".This is what I discovered after listening to "Lay It Down".- The first time through the verse and the chorus, the song is definitely understated. We simply have the accompaninment of a piano and a violin with Jaci's soft vocals.- The second time through the verse and the chorus, a drum beat is introduced and Jaci begins to let some emotion out beginning in the middle of the verse and when the song moves into the chorus a complete emotional outburst occurs. But somewhat to my dismay, this is not the same voice that I am expecting from Jaci Velasquez. Her voice was more raspy and raw (actually, it was sounding more like Demi Moore or Tara Reid, not that that is necessarily bad). Furthermore, she appeared to be struggling.Is this the same voice that was soaring effortlessly through the stratosphere on songs such as "On My Knees", "Speak For Me", and "Adore"? Is Jaci Velasquez losing her voice?I don't know but I find it very difficult to imagine that a young woman in her mid-20's is losing her voice. She is entering her prime. Barring a health issue, this just doesn't happen."Lay It Down" is actually a pretty good song. In fact, I am almost of the opinion that it may be her best. I certainly find myself listening to this song more than any of her others."Lay It Down" has the same message as the Beatles' classic "Let It Be". The words are different but both songs share the same sentiment. Actually, now that I think of it...they do share a couple of words in common...the words "let it be". Here are the closing lyrics:"I'm gonna let it be, I'm gonna let it goI'm gonna lay it down"The essential lesson being conveyed is learning to "let go and let God" - a profound spiritual insight. Something that each of us here is learning.This song is heartfelt and gut-wrenching. And though her voice is struggling through it, the song, nevertheless, works out its magic.I gave this CD 2 stars because I think Jaci Velasquez is attempting to redefine her music style and has not succeeded. Interestingly enough, her best sound was her first CD - Un Lugar Celestial (A Heavenly Place). Bring back the spanish/flamenco guitar and develop a more acoustic sound. In my opinion, the acoustic sound is more spiritual. Keep the piano and electric bass guitar but dispense with the hard rock electric guitar and synthesized sound effects. Develop a Latin folk rock sound with an element of jazz. Hire a good saxophonist or a trumpet player. Emphasize ballads. That should do the trick</review_text>
I read several different on-line reviews for this CD before I purchased it. Each seemed to imply that this CD was a new direction for Jaci, that her lyrics were bolder and the overall sound was much more independent in nature. Strange. I must have purchsed the Prozac copy of this CD because there is nothing new here from her. Like my title line to this review states, it's the exact same music she has always sang, just in a different package. Now the CD just collects dust. What a shame</review_text>
Don't think Dale can play a song the same way twice. Didn't like the selection of songs nor  the  way they produced.</review_text>
Unlike most other items I've bought from Amazon, I failed to read the reviews for this particular CD before purchasing.  Being a fan of the Final Fantasy series, I think I fell into a bit of the "fanboy" (well in my case, "fangirl" I guess) syndrome.  Also I didn't do my homework at all and thought this was an orchestrated recording, which it most certainly is not.I own most of the Final Fantasy OST's (and heartily endorse them for fans of the games) and this particular CD does nothing new or compelling to the music.  Tracks 1-7 are pretty much carbon copies of their OST counterparts.  Track 8, the opening theme of FFVIII (Liberi Fatali) has a very odd synth-solo vocal mix covering what is in the original a very moving choral section.  Tracks 9-11 again are basically copies of the OST.  Track 12, "Alexandria (Vivi's Theme)" is the only somewhat-original track, as it seems to put together several pieces from the FFIX soundtrack in a medley of sorts.Unless you are a rabid fan who must have everything FF, I recommend saving up and purchasing the real OST's instead of this disc.  While I don't see non-fans flocking to purchase this disc, it might be worthwile if you're only slightly interested in the series and want a taste.  Even in that event I'd be worried this disc would turn those people off from the series entirely.Pros:Cheap (I paid $6, new)Track 12 is worth a listenCons:Tracks 1-7, 9-11 offer nothing much new or differentTrack 8 has creepy (in a bad way) synth/voice mixe</review_text>
Ok......AVOID THIS AT ALL COSTS NOT WORTH YOUR MONEY!!!! As luck would have it I found it a a garage sale.  The only track whorth listening to is track 12 which is ViVi's Theme from FF9.  The others well....They could have done better.  Most of the songs are to put it nicely......SUCK (At least the way they where done).  The only reason I rated 2 (1 1/2 to be accualy) is because of ViVi's Theme at the end.  This is not whorth your time.  Get the imported CD's they have much better music on them</review_text>
I bought 4 of their cd's from amazon after hearing the song "bad days" in a batman movie. This cd is the worst of the 4 i bought. Not one good song. Totally lame. I'm not even going to stick someone else with it. I'm just going to throw it out</review_text>
These guys were the nirvana of r&b,motown, soul, black music in the 90s. As nirvanawas the band that ended good white music.boyz to men was the band that ended good black music.I am kinda pissed because nobody seems to noticeit like i do. These guys especially the lead singer wouldalways sing, oh wah oh wah oh oh ohhh oh after every sentence.I mean compare these guys to kool and the gang or the commodores or rick james.i could name tons and im not really a fan of soul type music.barry white, whitney houston, bobby brown, the temptationsIsaac hayes luther vandross.i mean in the 90s i think almost every r&b group wasbetter than boyz to girls. i dont understand whythese guys are so popular.I guess its just like seinfeld it sucks badbut people like it. its like all these idiotswere born yesterday forgetting about qualitymusic and sitcoms from the past that were better.</review_text>
Gerry Marsden and his Pacemakers are great.  I just want to point out that the double-CD 'Best of' Import has 15 extra tracks and sells for about the same price.  There is just no reason to buy this compilation instead of the import</review_text>
The problem with America was that started out great.  The first album was fresh and different from everything.  Three young boys and accoustic quitars was a song all it own.  "Horse with no name" and "SandMan", was what pave the way for them.  The problem was that each album after that they got farther away from their roots and into the middle of mainstream pop. They should of left "Muskrat Love." to the Captain and Tennille.This album does a fine job of showing their career from beginning to end.  The problem was that there was their first two albums, ( America and Venture Highway) and there was their others.My recommandation would be to pick up the first 2 and leave this for the die hard fans</review_text>
I bought this CD only yesterday.The recording level is too low and I could not listen to the performance even with the volume cranked fully up.Rather than going in for another high wattage amplifier I decided to return the CD!!</review_text>
Well, the labels did it again. First, when they released the album "Dream" on cd. Their biggest hit from that album "You never done it like that" turned out to be a re-recorded version on the cd release.They did it again with this "Ultimate Collection." That being said, I love some of their other hits, especially "The way that I want to touch you." Luckily, the rest of the tracks are the originals. If you're looking for the original version of "You never done it like that", you would have to get the 20th Century Masters collection of theirs</review_text>
It's not as good as his other albums.  He tries too hard and he praises himself way too much.  Poor guy; no wonder it had a fake case</review_text>
I'm sorry to vent on the Stylistics, certainly others are guilty of this, but $33 to get all the Stylistics hits is WAY too expensive.  Sorry, love the Stylistics, and the Spinners too (whose double CD anthology is around $30 too).  Why is something like Lionel Richie and the Commodores 2CD Gold $13.99?  Oh well... I'll wait</review_text>
With the greatest respect to the incredible Bob Beldon, Joe Zawinul, and Wayne Shorter, this Box Set should contain a warning.The warning is simple: If you already own most of the stuff in this collection, don't bother. If you're completely new to Weather Report, buy it.Coming from someone that's seen the band perform every year since 1972 and own all their official and quite a few "other" releases, I was really disappointed with this project (except for the booklet).Here are a few things that are puzzling:1) A Weather Report Box Set includes three songs (two composed by Zawinul and one by Shorter) that were never released by Weather Report:a. In a Silent Way. released by Miles Davisb. Super Nova, released by Wayne Shorterc. Experience in E (Excerpt), released by Cannonball Adderly(I agree with the liner notes that point to these songs as pre-cursors, but mentioning them would have been enough - they are all in print)2) An incredible typo stating that Alphonse Mouzon was the drummer on "Unknown Soldier"3) Including a barely improved version of Nubian Sundance that has been in circulation for many years from "other" sources.4) Including another "better than, but not by much" version of the "other" sources for the 1978 Rockpalast concert on DVD.5) Not remastering any of the original recordings. The tape hiss from the Live in Tokyo (I Sing the Body Electric) songs is still clearly heard and not upgrading those old recordings is just plain unacceptable in this day and age.6) Finally, the cover itself - I have no words, except to admit "I don't get it".Having said all that negative stuff - Weather Report remains the dominant "creative machine" of the Jazz Rock Fusion era and those that missed it should buy this without hesitating. If you're a long time Weather Report fan - there's absolutely nothing to get excited about here. The DVD was especially disappointing to me. I have had that concert on VHS tape for many years and now on DVD (all from "other" sources) and was shocked to see such incredible video noise on the official version. Zawinul's black and white keys look like polka-dots in many places. (I played the DVD in 5 different players; two TV's and my computer monitor to make sure it wasn't my equipment).  I should have paid attention to the PR person at Sony that told me the concert was taken from a re-broadcast of the show and NOT from the master tapes. It's my own fault for having unrealistic expectations. I should probably clarify that while the DVD is in fact clearly better than the "un-offical" version, IT STILL LOOKS LIKE A BOOTLEG! Sad...It is of some significance that this "review" is the first time I've chosen to speak out about something in Fusion that was less than flattering. It should also be noted that my disappointment is aimed directly at CBS/Sony/BMG and not the musicians/producers.I'm still amazed that this record company can see fit to release this and hold back the already remastered Mahavishnu Orchestra Live in Cleveland Cd that was supposed to be released in 2004.Lastly, let me make it perfectly clear that Zawinul, Shorter, and Beldon are musicians and people I personally hold in the highest esteem with Zawinul and Shorter being musical divinities as far as I'm concerned. While my review is an obvious personal venting, and I realize that Zawinul and Shorter gave this project their stamp of approval, I think that shouldn't be mistaken for a personal attack. My remarks are simply observations with some attitude directed at CBS/Sony/BMG.By Rick CalicJazz Rock World</review_text>
As a peripheral BNL fan, I have always admired the off beat sense of humor these guys dish out.  With previous releases, I have been able to discover new things in repeated listenings.  This cd got stale fast.  Seems to be geared to the tween crowd.  I am hopeful newer releases will stay true to the BNL I have enjoyed in years past</review_text>
This CD and the one entitled" Night Ranger's Greatest Hits are almost identical, but are different in this way:"Best" contains "I Did It For Love". "Greatest" contains, instead, "Rumours In The Air" and "Restless Kind". The other 10 tracks on each CD are the same. So, which one to buy? My choice is the one with the extra track. Also, in my opinion, both tracks on "Greatest" are better than the one on "Best".In addition, here's hoping that the band or record label decides to release a true "Greatest Hits" or "Best Of" album that will contain about 15 or 16 songs. Or maybe a multi-disc compilation that will include some rare tracks.Night Ranger fans would surely delight to see something like that</review_text>
I thought it would have nice, soft songs. But, it is riddled with annoying sound effects and strange instrumentation</review_text>
Hey folks, this is brilliant and all, like the articles say, but what they don't mention is that it's impossible to listen to. There are no verses, choruses, or even beats to speak of. There are no songs. It's just a sound collage or something, from start to finish. The booklet prints lyrics but I couldn't find 'em. This music is too brilliant for its own good. And you can forget about using it as party or background music. JDub's other offerings are much better</review_text>
I RECEIVED A CD, THE TANGO CD( THE BEST TANGO ALBUM IN THE WORLD EVER) WAS DEFECTUOUS, SINCE IT PLAYS ALRIGHT  UNTIL THE 12TH SONG, BUT THEN THE SONGS STARTS GIVING WEIRD TONES. AND THE 2ND CD ACTS THE SAME WAY, SINCE MY TANGO ALBUM IS A DOUBLE CD.THE PROBLEM IS NOT FROM THE RADIO, SINCE MY OTHER PURCHASE FROM AMAZON IS IN GOOD SHAPE, AS AL MY OTHER CDS.THE MUSIC ALWAYS STOPS PLAYING RIGHT AT THE SAME TIME OF THE CD, THE 12 TH SONG, SO ITS PRETTY MUCH A CD PROBLEM.I DUNNO WHATS THE REFUND POLICY, OR CUSTOMER SERVICE NUMBER, ITS SO BAD , COS THIS TANGO CD IS GREAT. I ENJOYED IT MUCH , UNTIL.........TH</review_text>
I love this show!  That said, I do not care for this version of it.  The inclusion of the word "concept" in the title means it is just that.  This was, thankfully, not the final version of the show that would later spawn the hit song, "One Night In Bangkok".With most Broadway musicals, the musical numbers tell the basic story of the show.  If you listen to the recordings of Phantom, Mama Mia, Beauty and the Beast, you can discern the basic storyline of the show.  Listening to this particular recording of Chess, though, will leave you wondering "What was that?"  The Broadway arrival of Chess saw a much needed reworking of the storyline and arrangement of the musical numbers.  This recording seems too much like a mish-mash of songs that don't really relate to each other.For musical fanatics (like myself), I say "yes, you should have this recording in your collection", if only to understand how much work went into the show before it opened on Broadway.If you are only buying the album because of "One Night In Bangkok", purchase the Broadway recording instead; you'll be much happier with the performance by Phillip Casnoff rather than Murray Head</review_text>
My 8 year old daughter was very dissappointed after receiving this CD for Christmas.  It is advertised as the Cheetah Girls 2 - however these vocals are not sung by the original Cheetah Girls who are in the movie.  The songs just don't sound the same.  It's very dissappointing that Disney doesn't tell you this on the CD</review_text>
I bought this disc hoping for pristine remastered sound and what I got was shrill noise with all the hiss sucked out. The guy who typed a review in all caps is a moron! It's better than an MFSL disc because the artist approved it? Yeah right! Get real! I might need a new hi-fi if I don't like the sound? Please! You idiots know nothing about what good sound quality is and either does Peter Mew or Rob Caiger. Thanks for nothing!Sony should be sued by people who bought this horrible disc for deceptive practices...saying that the full-length version of "Roll Over Beethoven" was used! What a crock! And so what if they used the original master tapes? Using a master tape doesn't mean anything if you're going to smother it in noise processing and master it poorly!Don't buy this disc! Hang onto the old US versions, or even better, the Japanese issue. Don't give Sony your money for this shambles of a product</review_text>
Hey, BRRRRRUUUUUCCCE!What's the deal? Just about every major Top 40 artist has had their catalogs sonically updated EXCEPT YOURS.Why can we buy the "Tracks" editions, and get glorious HDCD-encoded sound, but "Town" sounds like it's coming out an AM radio?OK, you did your best, but Dubya's back in the White House for the next four years, and Kerry's home in his underwear watching the Weather Channel. You should have plenty of time on your hands now... GET BUSY!Let's see some remastering!</review_text>
Just be sure to read up on this closely... it's not the orchestra you hear in the movie, and you may be especially disappointed when you hear the vocal tracts - gone are great talents Enya and Annie Lennox, replaced by no-name voices.  This is not BAD music, but don't think you're a genius for capturing the music of the movies on one inexpensive 2-CD set</review_text>
Something that someone who claims to be COUNTRY should NOT do. Even though these girls are already pop, remixing it to make it even more pop was a HUGE mistake! Then again, they have to do something to sell more cd's! LOL!!</review_text>
The best scene in the movie is the Italian restaurant scene with Janeane Garofalo, using a wry Randy Quaid as her foil when she's not ignoring him.  It's the only scene that made me laugh.The scene with the playboy dad having three women in his home, and the one preceding it when his girlfriend's excessive dinner fails to impress the little kids, are both weak.  Playboy dad is not interesting, and that character really shouldn't have been one of the three musketeers of this movie.The other dad, Reiser, is uncomfortable to watch.  His dinner scene with his daughter is good in the sense that it shows how estranged a father can be with his teenage daughter, but that too is uncomfortable to watch.  The later scene, up in the treehouse when his daughter suddenly loves him, is completely unbelievable.  The fact is, that particular girl would not say those things to her dad.  She doesn't love him.  She doesn't need him at all.  She's done with him.The stupid bit about Randy Quaid being a talk show star after busting into Rob Reiner's talk show is just dumb.  That doesn't happen.  If you want to write a cartoon, get Warner Brothers to draw it for you.  Have the Road Runner in it, or Bugs Bunny.The film gives us comfort food at the end, with the trite and meaningless advice to love your kids.  The fact is that your kids need love from their father when they are young, but once they hit a certain age, in double digits, you are done.  Daddy just becomes the source of cash from then on.  Kids in their teens and twenties don't want or need anything but money from dad.  Fittingly, I saw this film on Father's Day.To sum the whole movie up, Janeane Garofalo is funny, Randy Quaid is kind of comfortable to watch although the script gets a little stupid at the tail end, and the other two male leads are just mildly annoying.  The script doesn't say anything worthwhile about the subject it took on.  But it takes a subject on, so at least that's something.  It gives exposure and food for thought on the subject of how a father fits into his family</review_text>
This is a saccharine and banal take on Irish music, with all the emotional intesity of a Hummel figuraine.  Upon first listen, I remarked to my wife that they sounded more like Peter, Paul, and Mary than the Dubliners. She correctly pointed out that Peter, Paul, and Mary were actually much better than this pablum, and that the Irish Rovers more closely resemble the fictional Main Street Singers from a Mighty Wind.Truly, absolutely, unlistenably passionless, cloying and bland</review_text>
this album is dull and without any emotion.the only reason this guy is even known is because of his backgroud</review_text>
I love running to the Marine Corps Cadence CDs.  Volumes 1 and 2 are very good.  Volume 3 sounds studio produced and more choral.  When running vols 1 & 2 are better synched for continuous running.  The transitions on vol 3 feel out of synch to me.  Others don't seem to agree and I still run to this CD;  I'd buy 1 and 2 first if you don't have them</review_text>
I like these guys alot.I own a bunch of there stuff and love to see them live. I played this Cd a few times liked it at first, but it didn't grow on me at all liked I'd hoped.To cute for me,not spontaneous enough.I feel this cd will be just another dust collector in a short period of time.Just let it rip guys,that's what you do best.Thank god my brother bought this instead of me.I bought live at cow palace (The Dead) great Cd</review_text>
I first heard the song on the radio en route to work. I enjoyed it immensely and wanted to know who did the remake.  No Doubt's redo of the 80's hit brought back good memories of the new wave era. But, of course, it does not compare to the original Talk Talk version</review_text>
THIS IS JUNK NOT MUSIC.NEON MOON IS THE WORST SONG EVER!IT IS SO BORING AND DULL.AND A COOL DRINK OF WATER IS A HORRIBLY WRITTEN AND SUNG SONG!THIS MUSIC BORES ME!LEAVE IT ALONE AND STICK TO RAP,ROCK,OR METAL.COUNTRY SUCKS</review_text>
Paul Brown is a tremendously talented artist and producer with a wonderful engineering background that allows him to set the standard in smooth jazz for clean production and versatile music. However, content on his latest project, "White Sand" isn't musically expressive as the content heard on his first two solo albums. The artist collaborations on "White Sand" make it tempting to purchase, but you quickly realize Brown's musical wittiness and versatility (Smooth, Latin or R&B) are lacking. Overall it is still a CD worth paying for</review_text>
Get off the drugs, guys. Your reviews made me purchase this awful load of tripe. While proficient enough on the instruments and vocals, The Moon falls woefully short just about everywhere else. The songs sound very similar to one another and are all pretty much void of any decent melodies or even a good hook or two. Right when it seems they might be getting somewhere, they break the rhythm and make a feeble attempt to psych it up or out with a sitar, swirling strings or the ever constant and really abused minor key chord changes. There is also a curious lack of any decent choruses, here. I have to believe that that was a conscious effort on the part of The Moon. Bad idea, guys. And while the music is pretty lame, the lyrics are absolutely wretched. Can anyone out there, after listening to this, remember more than ten words from any song on this washed out CD? If you can, it's because they're so lame and uninspiring. The lyrics from The Temptations' "Psychadelic Shack" captures the feeling of the sixties better than anything these blotterheads came up with.Here's a big hint about the musical contents of this CD. It actually says on the front cover, "Featuring David Marks of The Beach Boys." Huh??? Is that supposed to be a ringing endorsement?Comparing these guys to Left Banke, The Zombies or The Beatles is pure blasphemy! For those of you fortunate enough to NOT have heard The Moon before, count your lucky stars. If you feel yourself slipping to the dark side (the boneheads giving this 4 or 5 stars) and feel like spending some extra cash, there are other sixties groups more worthy of your money, like the aforementioned bands.I'm probably going to piss some people off with this review, but that's exactly how I felt after giving this CD a listen. Honestly, I immediately thought of George Harrison's less than stellar second rate efforts while listening to this. I love ya George, but you put out more than one clinker of a northern song. If bad Harrison's your thing......well, then stop reading and buy this CD now! For the rest of you, there's a lot of music from somewhat obscure sixties bands coming out on CD right now. Garage or psych, a lot of it is great, but the mine is also getting stipped pretty bare. The Moon is proof positive. It's also pretty easy to see why their recording company called it quits after two albums - and the second album is far superior to the first in both sound and content! In closing, while this album has overwhelming intracasies layered into the music and vocals, the end product is very bland. I read these guys admitted to cutting these songs while under the influence of LSD. It shows!I rated this "aural adventure" two stars, instead of one, for two reasons. First, I kept rooting for these guys to come up with a decent song to salvage the album (actually two). They never did, but at least they performed all original songs. It's also worth an added star to see a rerelease from a sixties band that doesn't have a cover of "Hey Joe" on it. If you're still with me (and also a lover of good music or even mediocre fare), avoid this CD like the plague! I'd also like to thank Amazon for putting this clinker on my recommendation lists. You done me wrong</review_text>
I was first introduced to the symphonic power metallers formerly known as Rhapsody (name changed due to copyright issues) on their 2006 live album Live in Canada. I have to say that I am just not that impressed or entertained by their latest studio effort. The group tends to rely more or the theatrical elements rather than focusing on their metal music. The vocals tend to be oversung, or drowned out by the chaos in the background. Rather than enhancing your metal experience with musical theatrical elements, Rhapsody of Fire puts you to sleep with them. The group does stay true to their fantasy themes however</review_text>
never shipped. I ordered this before Christmas. They said it was in stock. WHERE IS IT</review_text>
I do not like Parker's style at all.  I can't really say anything else.  It is all in the way you format a song, and I just don't like parker</review_text>
Another unspeakable album from the most unspeakably overwrought, over-produced and over-rated rock band of all time.  Did I mention over the top? Let's face it, Queen was a group of crypto-fascists, working hard to put a human face on Thatcherism.  Ghastly stuff.K.</review_text>
Imagine buying this CD after seeing "The Mirror has Two Faces" fully expecting the SOUNDTRACK music to the movie, and reading overall great reviews on Amazon.  Imagine the shock of receiving the CD and the surprise of hearing 20 brief cuts of plain instrumental music out of the 24 cuts - The remaining 4 cuts contained very short lines of verse. Perhaps Barbara, with her tremendous unlimited wealth, felt she would be giving away a "free album" to the masses if the soundtrack contained the vocals in the film. Shameless misrepresentation</review_text>
It seems that other than a song or two, Fall Out Boy forgot their guitar's.  Very disappointing and slow paced</review_text>
I remember buying a record by DNA when it first came out...and I was really surprised later when arto lindsay and the ambitious lovers were able to turn this mess into great music. This is very unprofessiona</review_text>
&quot;Modern&quot; usually sounds like some outdated mid-80s new wave album by the Cars, Flock of Seagulls, or somesuch.  It is not a punk record, mostly midtempo pop.  The three songs Diggle wrote and sings on are  basically awful; Shelley's are considerably better - the usual wry lyrics  and great hooks.  I would say about 3 or 4 of the tunes are topnotch  Buzzcocks stuff; newbies should buy &quot;Operator's Manual&quot; or  &quot;Going Steady.&quot;  Or dig up the amazing &quot;Different Kind of  Tension&quot; from a used record store somewhere!  Also, see them live if  you have a chance</review_text>
I think they should place a disclaimer at the top advising would be buyers that Rosemary Clooney does not perform on this CD. It lacks the romance and magic without her. I wish I had read the reviews of this CD before purchasing it, but I was so excited to see the White Christmas Soundtrack on CD that I just one-clicked it</review_text>
As a 21 year old, I felt a little out of place buying this soundtrack.  But, I was so excited that I had finally found a soundtrack to these two wonderful movies.  Imagine my disappointment when I could aurally pick out that Rosemary Clooney's parts were not sung by Rosemary Clooney!  I DO NOT recommend buying this album.  Enjoy the music when you watch the movies, instead.  Trust me, it's better that way</review_text>
Think twice before purchase:1. Most of the good tracks are available on the non-copy protected "All-Time Top 100 TV Themes", along with the best themes from other networks.2. This disc has CDS-100 copy protection, so you probably can't upload to Windows Media and definitely not to iTunes.I could not upload from my internal CD drive, only from an external multi-format CD/DVD burner. It still only uploaded to Windows Media, not iTunes.To get into iTunes, I had to add the WMA files and then convert them to MP3.This probably caused some quality loss as I'm converting one compressed format to another compressed format!A time-consuming and tedious process which could have been avoided altogether if music companies would get over this fixation on "controlling" everything.Hello record execs: If nobody can add your discs to their libraries, guess what happens? They DON'T PLAY YOUR MUSIC!!!You might think you're protecting your valuable investment, but you're shooting yourself in the foot instead. Here's how it goes:1. Nobody can upload your music.2. Nobody plays your music.3. Nobody hears your music.4. Nobody recommends your music.5. Nobody buys your music.Remember, this only loaded from a particular kind of drive, so it may or may not work on yours.As Bela Lugosi would say: Bevare</review_text>
this is a great album and a great artist with albert king theres no going wrong when you buy one of his albums. he is the king of electric-blues. you can hear all these songs in great format. just awsome playing awsome singing. its sure no wonder srv. and hendrix really loved albert king</review_text>
It just amazes me what a joke the music industry has become. Nowadays anyone can become a singer take for instance: Ashlee Simpson, Lindsay Lohan, and now Paris Hilton? LMAO! No seriously though, I'm still totally not sure how Paris Hilton became so famous. Yes, I know she's the Hilton Hotel Heiress, but I'm not sure why the media gives her so much attention. All she did was live off her family fortune, but now thanks to that fortune, she was able to get the right contacts, to make her own record label called "heiress records" which is a sub-label of Warner Bros. After a reality show series, modeling career, A sex tape, and a couple of roles in a few movies, what did she think to herself? I think I want to be a singer now? Apparently. And thats how this flaming pile of garbage came about. "Stars are Blind" is her first single off her debut album "Paris" and let me tell you it's nothing new or original. The song has kind of a ska beat, which I really don't think much of. Her voice sounds like when you inhale helium from a balloon, and the lyrics are mediocre. Sorry Paris , but you failed miserably as a musician. Leave this profession for the people that really have the talent</review_text>
I bought Usher's 8701 on tape long ago, and I remember liking it. Then a couple of years ago, I bought it again on cd, listened to it, and wondered why I wasted my money.Maybe it's the fact that I've grown, but this album sounds so un-soulful now. It is just lacking any spirit, sort of like an over-produced record: all studio magic, but no magic from the singer. Even the songs that are SUPPOSED to sound heartfelt, don't. The album sounds dated, not transcendent of time and era like all the albums that become classics. The songs are very forgettable, and I don't see any of them being seen as classics twenty years from now.Usher has yet to make a masterpiece.Addendum: I was a little unfair in my rating. The album deserves 3 stars, not 2. Unfortunately, I can't change it.</review_text>
Bread8, that's one of the stupidest comments I've ever read.  You don't know s*** about metal.  You can't handle the intensity of real metal because you're a fat virgin who'd cry to your mommy if you heard godly metal songs like "Immortal Rites" and "Pleasure to Kill."  Leave the metal to the metalheads you mallcore f@ggot.Anyway, "Dysfunction is better than Staind's other stuff, but only by a microscopic margin.  Aaron Lewis is a weak, talentless crybaby whose bandmates couldn't make a good song to save their lives.  Every song on here is full of bogus "pain" and "depression" coupled with abyssmal musicianship just like every other nu-metal band.If you want heavy music that's accessible for the masses, go for Rage Against the Machine (except for "Evil Empire"), Faith No More, Helmet, Living Colour, and Quicksand.</review_text>
Britain, circa 1997.  Tony Blair is elected P.M.  Princess Di perishes.  And the Spice Girls are unleashed to an unsuspecting public.  This effort is an attempt to cash in on the phenomenon before a fickle populace turns their attention to the next best thing.  To be fair, the girls are not to blame for what a tedious flick this is.  Rather, they are appealing and prove to be the film's lone redeeming factor.  The fault lies in the script that tries to do for the Spice Girls what "A Hard Days' Night" did for the Beatles.  Whereas the Fab Four's film was full of wit and cogent commentary on Beatlemania this flick is unfunny and basically incoherent about what it's trying to say about the Spice craze.  I was reminded more of the Monkees' "Head" than I was of "A Hard Days' Night".  Lots of celeb cameos (Roger Moore, Elton John, et al) that amount to naught.  Oh, well.  On to "From Justin to Kelly"</review_text>
I am  a cellist of 15 years on the breakthrough of becoming a renowed cellist. This cellist tone is so powerfull and clear.she tells a story this is so clear to understand because the music speaks. alisa should watch the slurs from the f to b and be more gracefull. The apres un reve was ok i guess. she really should of tooken more time. like floating on a dream cloud. when i play this piece i take the music from the begining as a fuzzy dream and play the pitch so the music tells a story and becomes more clear every measure. The elgar is somenthing she might not want to touch because no one plays it better than du pre</review_text>
She does sound like a goat bleating. Yodeling. It's a shame, really.</review_text>
I was literally horrified when I first put this album in my cd player.  This cd is absolutly terrible, every song sounds like its been composed for some middle school band to play.  Furthermore the songs hardly sound like the songs they represent, they'll go through like one riff from the origional then just do their own thing. Do not, i repeat, do not purchase this album. I was expecting some cool, fun, funky lounge music but this cd is just obnoxious. The only thing that makes this cd remotley worth purchasing is the cool album art and free coaster</review_text>
Pls tell me tat tis BoxSet is a JOKE!!!! Classic Rock - REO, Romantics ... BANGLES??? its more like Classic New Wave. Only thing good would be the price. Pls ... who ever the A&amp;R people are ... pls ... pls ... design something bette</review_text>
Whomever decided on putting this box set together must have been smoking crack.  Since when did 8675309/jenny become a classic rock hit?  Are you kidding me....come on!  No Hendrix,Floyd,Zeppelin.  Classic rock my arse</review_text>
This is What you want (1983) was a terrible album from John Lydon and Martin Atkins.  After an rift between Keith Levene and John Lydon occured during the recording of the demo tracks, Atkins and Lydon ran Keith off and he quit the band.  Instead of keeping him on the finished tracks, Atkins and Lydon removed Levene and Pete Jones (the band's studio bassist) from the audio tracks and re-recorded themwith members from their Holiday Inn band (Lydon hired members from a covers band who performed at a New Jersey Holiday Inn).The new tracks and horrible.  All of the guitar riffs and rhythmsection that were originally recorded for the future album were erased.  Noise and other unwelcomed sounds were added to the tracks.  The original tracks were far superior (even in their basic state) to what was released.  To hear them you'll have to find the Commercial Zone LP.  The failure of this disc and the bickering between Atkins and Lydon would cause the band to become a solo project for the former anarchy king.Not recommended</review_text>
read the the second reveiw from the bottom that says a music fan from the east coast. the olny good song on this cd is fly</review_text>
Made another bull**** album. Honestly I didn't hear this whole album. About 5 years ago I was ridin wit one of my boys and he played this cd. Oh my god for the first time in my life I wished I was deaf. I see the reason why her albums sell though. Cause its her looks and nothin else. She's not ugly at all to me. She just can't sing. But she can livin up a crowd. I'm just waitin to see her and 50 cent doin a song together, two of the worst people in music, millionaires. Go figure</review_text>
This album lacks a lot of the controversy (not all of it) of the original,  uncensored &quot;Cop Killer&quot; (new censored version now titled Body  Count). Go to eBay and find someone auctioning off the real version of the  92 album. You will like it a hell of a lot better</review_text>
THIS WAS FOR A FRIEND AND I HAVE NO FEEDBAC</review_text>
Vote this one off the island: 19 overproduced prog-tropical instrumentals consisting entirely of primitive thumping, chanting and grunting - sort of a new age tribal orgy with pygmy porn music composed by Phil Collins. It's all supposed to convey the drama, intrigue and relevance of a TV show (Survivor Yell, Mud Bath, Chase Race, Tally the Vote, I Can See It, Buzzed) with no drama, intrigue and relevance. A desperate last ditch dig for one of the most unimportant moments in television</review_text>
The only reason I picked up this album was the name Norah Jones.  I was expecting to hear her at the forefront, and I didn't really.  To be honest, I was hoping to hear more of what she sounded like in Come Away With Me and Feels Like Home.  If you're looking for Norah Jones, this isn't really the album you're looking for</review_text>
this guy sounds worse than brian johnson does now. why can't people my age stop copying the past? be original. that's it. this style is well worn out.</review_text>
If you are buying this because you love Rob, be aware this is the Rob wearing his Goblin Cock hat.  If you aren't familiar with this incarnation...let's just say it ain't the Rob of Pinback or Heavy Vegetable fame.  Same guy, different sensitivity.I fell in love with Rob because he seemed to make sense out of all the nonsense out there.  On this outing, Rob has met the enemy and it is himself.  He's entitled to do as he pleases and you and I are entitled to not care for it.  This CD is not an acquired taste, it is a forced-feeding</review_text>
This lifts your heart to God as you listen.  Beautifully done</review_text>
ALL OF THE SONGS ARE BORING. I HATE THEM. THEY ARE SLOW AND BORING AND THEY MAKE YOU WANT TO FALL ASLEEP</review_text>
Don't waste your money.  This album is cheesy, sounds like a million other pop rock songs, and is nothing compared to their earlier work.  With Donnie Van Zant and Max Carl on vocals, all I have to say is:  they need the old  lead singer back!  The guitar work is ok, but the classic .38 Special sound  has definitely been lost</review_text>
This album sounds to much like Pop music than hardcore Reggaeton. They even have that RBD boyband in this piece. A few years ago LT saved Reggaeton with their producing skills now it looks like they set out to kill the monster they created with this embarrasing album transforming a music of the streets into the music even Grandmas like and that is scary. The only reason for the two star is because the zion and the arcangel & de la ghetto songs. If you wanna hear some real Reggaeton look for producers like DJ Memo, Meka, Mambo Kings, DJ Wassie & DJ Fat this dudes are doin it right and keepin Reggaeton Calle my friend</review_text>
Like so many new-age artists, Ryan Farish has a great ear for melodies. Unlike most new-age artists, Ryan Farish has rhythmic problems. He likes to use the delay effect on his piano, but either it is not sycronized with the tempo of the song or he is simply being too sloppy with his playing (sometimes it's one problem and sometimes it's both). I don't know how he let those takes make it on to the final album. Also, the massively loud reverse cymbal sounds are way overused and make the entire album very abrasive very quickly</review_text>
2nd time.</review_text>
This tribute was announced almost ten years ago, and it seems to have undergone a transformation since then.  To be fair, there are some interesting additions such as the Sufjan Stevens and Brad Mehldau tracks.  And Emmylou Harris is brilliant.  But Sarah McLachlan's "Blue" has been heard before as has Prince's "A Case of You."  Earlier reports indicated contributions from heaviweights like Steely Dan and Lindsey Buckingham.  I sure would like to have heard what they would have done.  Even more disappointing is that Joni's Hejira-Mingus era albums are mostly ignored - and that was her best music, in my opinion.  As a final indignity, it sounds to me that too much compression was added in the mastering phase, and hence the overall sound quality of the CD is lacking in dynamics.</review_text>
This album is very weak compared to his earlier efforts.  The music is simple and straightforward, and the rapping is poor</review_text>
Being an Osmond fan can be very frustrating at times...  This CD has nothing new to offer.  There have been several Osmond compilation CDs in the past 10 years.  What's so different about this one besides the photograph on the cover?  Nothing.  I agree with the reviewer who wishes the Osmonds would put some of their old albums on CD instead of putting out hit compilation CDs all the time.  Been there.  Done that.  Bored to tears</review_text>
The quality of this CD recording sounds like someone tapped it in their garage and burned it to CD with thier personal PC. Very bad recording. It's too bad because Lathleen Madigan is very witty and funny.</review_text>
Somehow not up to her earlier work. The instrumental accompaniment is good, but tends to dominate at the expense of Cesaria's voice and the songs don't strike me as particularly memorable. One reviewer said this was perhaps the best thing she's done. If so, I just don't see it. I was disiappointed and found myself wondering if maybe her best days are behind her. I hope not</review_text>
As a huge Counting Crows fan, I thought it was kinda cool when I came across a tribute album to them...right up until the time that I listened to the cd. It is nearly impossible to get through. The best way I can try to explain it is to call it bad karaoke. I rated it one star because there's no "0 star" option. If you have any intentions of buying this cd, find a website where you can preview it first, and thank me later</review_text>
If you don't have the blues,this record will give them to you.Musically speaking ,it's tripe</review_text>
I SAW THIS MOVIE 'CAUSE I WAS INTERESTED TO SEE CATHY RIGBY, "WHO WAS BORN TO PLAY PETER PAN". I HATED IT A LOT. SO, NOW I AM IN A HIGH SCHOOL PRODUCTION OF PETER PAN, AND I HAPPEND TO SEE THE MARY MARTIN VERSION, AND THE MARY MARTAIN CD. I LOVED IT! THEN I REALIZED THAT 'PETER PAN' IS NOT A BAD MUSICAL AT ALL. CATHY RIGBY AND THE "CREW" WERE MAKING IT BAD. I HAVE NO IDEA WHY THEY THINK CATHY RIGBY IS THE GREATEST THING SINCE SLICED BREAD. DON'T BELIEVE THEM. SHE ISN'T. SHE SOUNDED LIKE SHE WAS A STUIPED LITTLE BRAT THAT JUST WANTED TO ROT THE REST OF HIS [HER] TIME JUST SITTING IN A DARK CORNER CARVING FORKS WHILE ON THE OTHER HAND, MARY MARTAIN SOUNDS ALL CHEERFUL, FUN, AND REAL. I RECCOMEND MARY MARTAIN'S VIDEO AND CD. I SAY NO MORE</review_text>
I am a hater, to the core. I hate Puffy and thats all it is to it. Now there, you don't have to say it.So on to the review.First off every lyrical line Puffy spit in this album was outdone by everybody. Every track he had the weakest flow and the worst rhymes. And thats the truth. I don't know how true this is, but I heard Loon was behind most of Puffy's lines on this album. So that should explain the utter wackness in his lyrics. The truth is I don't care who writes his lines. It could be Tupac and Nas doin it, since its not them spittin it, then it actually takes away from the rhymes itself. Almost this entire album is filler. The best tracks is Real N**** and journey through my life. I really didn't feel that beat a whole lot but Nas and Beanie's verses was off the hook. However that is not enough for me to give this album more than one star. Now I love MC Lyte and Public Enemy, but they should get smacked in the back of they heads with crowbars for lettin him mutilate their classics. Thats not musical artistry, thats butcher work. Fake Thug dedication really gets under my skin. The title alone. No disrespect to Biggie as an artist cause I do like him still. But they put a diss on Tupac on Life after Death after he died, then denied it for years. So perhaps the fake thug dedication should be to him, cause thats some sucker s***. I didn't hear his latest album, I'm not going to review it, I didn't even visit that section. If you a fan of this guy, then you gon cop this and his new one regardless. If you like me and hate just about everything he puts out, you won't be caught within a mile of that s***</review_text>
I bought this soundtrack in 1984 when the movie adaptation of George Orwell's book came out, simply because it was attached to the movie.  I'll try not to use any non-family words here, but this soundtrack sucks.  Muldowney's original score is available on CD, and simply imagining it used as intended adds a whole new dimension to the movie.  As far as this soundtrack goes, though; skip it</review_text>
This disc is BAD!!! Right at the 2" mark the sound of the "rock water" is join by what sounds like a slow draining bathtub. This sound is more or less present throughout the entire hour. Other discs of this type that I've heard don't do this</review_text>
I opend the CD filled with joy till it started; at the beginning I thought there should be some kind of mistake but no, there were no letters. Not even one word, we couldn't sing at all; we just had the letters printed in very tiny letters but no guide to sing</review_text>
I do not see how reviewers can rate this guy 5 stars.   His voice is so mediocre that I am suprised he manages to sell many cd's at all.   I wouldn't waste my hard earned cash on this guy.  Stick with Sinatra and get the best.  If not, and you want someone who can sing Sinatra style, then I would recommend you listen to the young Canadian, Michael Buble. In my opinion Michael Buble is a much better singer that Tyrell.  He can swing and do justice to that genre of music</review_text>
I am wondering WHEN this plague will be over....and WHEN we'll be set free to listen to real music...We all are so tired of her</review_text>
E40 is the worst MC i have ever heard i would rather listen to someone drag their nails down a blackboard. How on earth can  someone like him get a record contract and sell records. Anytime he comes on another rappers album no matter how good the beats are I always skip the track</review_text>
A tenor very quickly on the rise, this is Villazon's second recital disc, one devoted to arias by Gounod and Massenet, all in sets of three, three for Massenet, and two for Gounod.  While still showing great promise, some concerns that were mildly serious with the first disc are even more so, in the French repertoire, in part because diction comes up so short here."O souverain" from Le Cid continues to show Villazon's command of line and squeezed but adequately forceful upper register, so that the volume boosts from the control room are really unnecessary.  Diction here is already an issue, as many `u' vowels get dipthonged, especially when Villazon's sound is placed back for added weight and volume.   `La reve' from Massenet's Manon is comfortably floated, with support from Natalie Dessay as Manon enhancing the intimacy of feeling to this number. Would Villazon been able to sing the short aria by Alain (who appears to the heroine at first to perhaps be little more than an apparition - shades of Frau ohne schatten perhaps? - in almost a chamber opera), from Massenet's Griselidis (track 8), at least as softly and lightly, as both the music and dramatic situation require, this could have also been very successful.  He instead turns the ABA shape of this mere chanson inside out and makes a wreck of it.The less often excerpted "Lorsque enfant" from Werther closes out the first Massenet set, as does "Pourquoi me reveiller" the second.  Villazon's identification with the distraught main character of this opera is abundantly clear in both.  He capitalizes well on the quixotic emotions and dreamy tendencies of the distraught main character especially well in the first selection, and he is also less intruded upon by the producers or sound engineers there as well.It is quite curious how the control room follows the tenor up a crescendo on a line that closes out the first section of the excerpt here from Massenet's Roi de Lahore, featuring a hero (from Hindu myth) that bound to certain stipulations, has literally returned from the dead.   Not quite as ostentatious as Massenet's near remake of Lohengrin, Esclarmonde (but with female protagonist instead), it is one of Massenet's most colorful scores. It has only been recorded complete once commercially, with Joan Sutherland, Luis Lima, and appearing only ten minutes apart, James Morris, and for the part of General unfortunately eliminated from this scene here, John Tomlinson, along with one other cut to Villazon's part.  It would've been more valuable to have all this complete instead of one or two other arias.  He captures the incipiently worried tone of Alim well, but his coloring up the vowel sounds makes it seem that he has come from a place as remote from French culture as where the opera takes place.Most successful of the Gounod selections are two of the three rarities.  The first is Source delicieuse from Polyeucte, based on the Corneille play.  It opens very well with a minute of orchestral cortege.  It perhaps has only been recorded once before and well, by Roberto Alagna ten years ago; Villazon conveys the heroism of the piece somewhat well, if not as securely as Alagna.  Anges du paradis from Mireille (which Mirella Freni championed and recorded complete for EMI), is third, perhaps a study for Ah leve toi, soleil (Romeo), several years down the road.  The second Gounod rarity on this disc is "Inspirez-moi, race divine," said to be a Caruso favorite, from Reine de Saba.  Its text indicates King Solomon's prize hired builder, Adoniram, to be a very confident, if mildly haughty chap.  Villazon's interpretation seems to portray a hero that constantly has to look behind his back, with all the incipiently yet controllably vibrato ridden throb and backphrasing Villazon engages in here.  The high C at the end, however, is convincing.  Such device as in the above, also accents and colors most phrasing in the tomb scene from Romeo et Juliette."Ah! leve toi soleil" opens the first Gounod set, and is sung with the right ardor, conventionally marked by tiny captured scoops, coming off phrases.  Villazon's entrance and two later lines catch for having placed so far back in the throat, and intonation gets momentarily derailed.  "Salut, demeure" from Gounod's Faust quickly becomes expressively leaden and monochrome.Recitative and the beginning of the aria, "Ah! fuyez" from Manon begin well nuanced enough, and for the aria, truly softly as a change from so much else on this disc, but all-purpose bench pressing and volume boosts intrude before long. That leaves two truly atmospheric selections from two Massenet rarities, to close this recital - first, an aria from Roma, Massenet's swan song for the lyric theater and "Ah! parais" from Le Mage, opera with plot line similar to that of Verdi's Aida, following.  The melody, introduced by the cellos at the outset for the latter, somewhat takes after "Pays merveilleux" from Meyerbeer's Africaine, but in more voluptuous color, such as in Thais, and Villazon and Pido both capitalize well on its opulence.  Pido's work, on numerous other numbers on this disc, seems heavy, lumbering, cloying, or just simply out of his idiom, so to speak.Word has it that Villazon, while not having a big voice, is dramatically exciting on stage and probably more immediately engaged with the content of what he is singing.  How this picked up a major award from Gramophone, for the specific problems this disc has, and over two more qualified nominations (Ciofi/Di Donato Handel Duets and a Florez album) is mystifying. So much digression here is over the very specific demands that French opera makes on singers. There's much reason for hope for this tenor, but this disc, for two-thirds of it, does little to help fulfill it</review_text>
This disk is truly as bad as Nitin's previous disks were wonderful. Take any previous Nitin disk, throw in some Alpha, a bit of Craig Armstrong, some predictable eco-freindly american diatribe, mix until extremely smooth and you have a prophesy. As with most prophesies there no good news about it. My prophesy is that anyone who buys this won't ever buy another Nitin dis</review_text>
I said I was going to be honest in all reviews, and yes, I kinda clunkered on this one.  I hate this CD.  Simply put.  They can't sing, and the songs are boring.I'm sorry I bought this CD, and other people might not like me saying that, but it's my opinion.  I listen to power metal extensively and there is MUCH better stuff out there like Symphony X, Nightwish or Sonata Artica.Don't buy this, though, you might like it.  I'd definitely listen to it first</review_text>
Listening to this cd took me back to my growing-up years.  I remembered all their songs I loved back then.  It's a great homecoming</review_text>
This is nothing compared to their EP, which was great by the way. Songs lack of inventive, arrangements and feeling... maybe a couple of songs are to be rescued, but no more</review_text>
NOTHING NEW HERE.I like reading the ridiculous reviews of these cds where people gush all over the screens over how much they love Patton.  This cd is dull.  Suffering from Patton overexposure.  Maybe he should actually spend some time and make an awesome album (Like Secret Chiefs 3 - Book of Horizons)  rather than dozens of merely adequate ones</review_text>
Reba is not country anymore period!!  This CD will prove that.  Just listen to the first track which I think is horrible.  As a matter of fact I think the whole CD is horrible.  Not deserving of Reba's talent.</review_text>
Look, as music goes, variations on a theme is part of any genre. This album, however, yells out &quot;leave well enough alone.&quot; A remix of Sgt.Peppers LHCB might thrill a person born in 1986, but when you hear the real thing, you ask why change it? This album is a total waste of a truly great disc. Like Gipeto said to Pinocchio, &quot;stay wood!&quot</review_text>
There was only one good song on the disk dont waste your mone</review_text>
sucks. If you like this album you are a poser. That means you think cradle of filth is black metal and slipknot is death metal. One guy I know that listens to norma jean, as i lay dying, and unearth, called me emo for listening to acid bath. How stupid can you be? You posers need to wise up and listen to real metal, such as Morbid Angel, Darkthrone, Amon Amarth, OLD Sepultura, and Dissection</review_text>
David Bowie always walked a thin line between commercially acceptable and just plain commercial.  This is the first time he fell off and became just plain commercial.  A disco-esque record, it's remembered more fondly than it was received by Bowie fans at the time.  It has some good moments, but overall the production is just too slick and there's a dearth of imagination on it - China Girl is an old Iggy Pop song, Cat People is just a newer version of a previous single and Criminal World is a cover of a song by Metro, meaning there's a grand total of five new songs on it.China Girl proves a perfect foil for Bowie's melodramatic vocals, Cat People is still great even when smothered in too much production and Modern Love proves that you're (nearly) always gonna get at least one classic on a Bowie album.Ironically, while it made him a global megastar, this record also marked the start of Bowie's alarmingly swift fall from grace.  If he'd stuck to the highly original work he'd churned out before this, he'd probably have had his moment in the sun anyway... and nobody could have accused him of selling out.  Now, what's that they say about hindsight</review_text>
If you want to get into Blind Melon very quick, buy this....If you really like Blind Melon and wnat to hear something new...don't buy this...</review_text>
I sorta of agree with the person below, This album sucks....plain and simple, however I think he is still doing a great job in Rhapsody.  I gave it one star not so much because it is garbage, but becuase I was looking forward to this album since "Prophets of the Last Eclipse"  Which was great, but trully...I don't know went wrong.  I don't have a problem with female vocalists, but in this album...it is retched.  I don't think I will ever listen to this album ever again.  Sorry!  But its true...do not buy this album, pretend you never knew he had a new album...OH!  and do NOT buy Luca Turilli's Dreamquest either!  Another bomb</review_text>
Save your money on this one. It's SOOOOOOO bland- with no jams!What a disappointment. Can I get a refund</review_text>
Tony Kushner's liner notes are a chilling foretaste of his Jew-hatred-soaked script for the film "Munich."  A paragon of self-regard, he sneers at the historicity and compelling morality of the Jewish people's attachment through the millenia to its eternal homeland.  Rather, Kushner makes a point of elevating the moral stature of the Islamofascists who have unhesitatingly and unceasingly for a century prosecuted a campaign of genocidal slaughter against any and all Jews who sought to reclaim their stolen patrimony (through aboveboard land-purchase and settlement, prior to wars of justifiable self-defense).  Like his evil Arab idols, Kushner cannot abide the concept of a restored Jewish commonwealth, secured on a foundation of existential legitimacy, political independence, and territorial sovereignty.  Zionism, and its morally necessary outcome the State of Israel, enabled and is continuing to enable the very effloresence of Jewish culture in the US in the post-1948 and certainly post-1967 vineyards where the Klezmatics have been frolicking and where Kushner has gained his fame and fortune.  But Kushner hates the very thought of being liberated, and seeks to sow that hatred throughout world Jewry.  The Klezmatics should feel ashamed for linking themselves to this cruel purveyor of assisted suicide.</review_text>
Just another cd of the awful, awful techno-crud that has infested goth/industrial clubs, while REAL artists like Cinema Strange and Knifeladder get the shaft. Worthless on every level</review_text>
these covers are pretty bad. some good ones have been done, cameron mcgill @ the uncommon ground tribute, big sir's everybody here wants you is good, but this is bad, no matter what entertainment weekly's review might say. avoid, buy a REAL jeff or tim album</review_text>
I respect everyone's opinion in here, and I've tried so hard to love this album because I love Pink Floyd and I see how everyone calls it a classic. But I just do not get it. I highly overrated album IMO. Very childlike and underdeveloped, but maybe that is its charm? I see 2 very different Pink Floyds and I have to say I never got into Syd's style. Matilda this, Lucifer that. The Gnome? come on. Astromony Domine was a classic but the rest of the album is a tough listen I'm sorry to say. I'm sure you'll say a true Floyd fan would love this album, well maybe that's true. But for me, when Waters and Gilmour were together, that is the true Floyd IMO. And their reign started with Meddle and ended with the Wall. A brilliant 6 album run (Meddle, OBC, DSOTM, WYWH, Animals, The Wall). For serious collectors, this is a must have and I'll give it 2 stars, but stay away if you expect another 'Wish you were here' purchase, pre-Gilmour can be a tough listen.</review_text>
When I played the first composition on this CD, I started thinking that  perhaps I had purchased a really stellar CD because the first song was  really jumping. But after that, this CD is disapointing to me. There are  maybe three pretty good compositions with the rest being totally  unmemorable. With the three good cuts from this disc and a few from her  first CD, Joyce Cooling could have made one good CD. But, in my opinion,  there aren't enough good songs here to warrant a release of this CD. Joyce  certainly has potential, but she needs to work on her creativity. She sound  here like an artist still maturing in style</review_text>
This is definitely not a bad collection, but there are so many better ones out there, that this should not be your first choice. The song Sweet Emotion has been completely destroyed on this album. the entire bass intro has been cut out, and the song starts about an entire minute into it. There really is no reason to do this, as even on the radio, they play the entire thing, as it runs about 4 and a half minutes long. The song starts at a terrible place too. It sounds like it would if you turned on your radio to the middle of the song, then just stuck it on the cd that way. Again, not a terrible compilation, but definitely not a good first choice</review_text>
The Cat Carol is the most depressing Christmas song I have ever heard. Not to ruin the ending for you but THE CAT DIES! Didn't exactly put me in the holiday spirit</review_text>
I think Ms Hewitt misses the mark, yes for an actress turned singer she's ok and its more her acting clout that has landed her this record deal and not her talent as a singer... Would someone off the street with the same looks and musical level get a record deal? I think not... Same goes for the other Latin Jennifer..</review_text>
I could not wait to get this album.  I usually love to hear the new the Hypnotize Minds albums.  However after so many years groups do make mistakes.  This is a major one.  Chrome could suck his name off of a trailer hitch.  I own the original copies of every Prophet/Hypnotize relese since Mystic Styles, and this is by far the worst to emerge.  They never release a Lord Infamous solo album in 12 years (not to mention he is DJ Paul's brother...wait I just did) and now this???  What's next, a Crunchy Black album lol??  THIS IS A PERSONAL NOTE TO DJ PAUL AND JUICY J...PLEASE SWALLOW YOUR PRIDE AND RE-HIRE (at least) T-ROCK, GANGSTA BOO, MC MACK, AND BRIBE SOME JUDGES TO GET LORD INFAMOUS OUT OF JAIL!!!P.S.-  This only gets 2 stars for the production value.</review_text>
Based on the reviews for this CD I decided to buy it without having sampled it. Big mistake. I love, among others, Marshall Crenshaw, Don Dixon and Peter Holsapple, but what happened here? This was so not fabulous</review_text>
on the liner notes to one of the two blues albums (i think it is shaker) it is said that the original idea was just to perform some of these songs in a one night concert. that should have been as far as it went.  to foist these songs on an unsuspecting public at 19 bucks a crack is highway robbery.  if these are blues songs, then i am robert johnson's illegitimate son. "death letter" is good, maybe even great, but cannot compare to the original or to any of the covers i have previously heard.  the rest is a waste of time.  the cover art is excellent but hardly the reason you would be expected to buy the cd.  these are my first 2 reviews by the way, but all these 5-star reviews for both cd's finally got me motivated.  go buy a muddy waters or lightning hopkins cd and save 10 bucks in the bargain</review_text>
This album is so boring in most places.  I don't know where Keith Sweat's head was at.  It doesn't keep your attention on the second half.  Keep it Comin' was okay, but the other songs Keith produced as well as Joe Public were lousy. He was smart to include There You Go from New Jack City, but the songs before and after it are so bland, It seemed like the formula that worked for Keith Sweat's first two albums didn't work here. I fell to sleep while hearing the album's second half--how can anyone create such dull songs on here?  Sweat's trademark whining just does not blend with these songs.  If he had wanted to, he would have given these songs to Usher instead of singing them himself--they'd be better under him(Usher).  But I warn you, don't get this album--it's going to let you down</review_text>
While The Title cut with Joe Public was Bumping most of this Disc is So-So&amp;Formula Driven.without Teddy Riley The Grooves&amp;Vibe aren't as Strong</review_text>
...but this album should never have been released as the "final" Queen-album. A couple of these songs should instead have been added as bonus tracks to one of those many Best of Queen-releases. "A Winters' Tale" for example. Do I know much about the background for "Made in Heaven", well perhaps not. But I know that this is known to be the last studio release. Sadly it has the sound of elevator-music all over, not that the melodies are bad, it just sounds... almost cheap actually -and most importantly to my ears (at least) this doesn't sound like my Queen. One of the most important bands in the history of music saying good-bye with "Made in heaven"? Was this really Freddie Mercurys' wish? It doesn't make much sence after the fantastic "Innuendo" released in short time before his tragic death containing the haunting ballad "These are the days of our lives". The words and the music... wow! And the music video to this song, have you seen it? To me that was the real good-bye with Freddie, and with Queen. And it has the sound of how I will remember them.But is "Made in Heaven" really that bad? Yes, and no. "Heaven for everyone" by Roger Taylor made it sound promising, and don't forget; I was exited when I heard about "a final material"-release. But it turned out, as you might have guessed, far from what I had expected. Old songs from B-sides and solo-albums are mainly fillers for this album... I mean honestly? "Too much love..." then quite a resent hit from Brian Mays' solo-album "Back to the light", I remember thinking "What's the point?" And it actually sounds better from his solo-album without the synth dominating the song here. Don't get me wrong now, Freddies' vocal is as good as you'd expect, it's what they've made out it that surprises me. And what makes me wish they hadn't. At least not for an entire album."A winters' tale" is a positive surprise though. Perhaps not Freddies' best song, and not better than "These are the days...". But it's a celebration of the beauty in life. At least it sounds like that to me. Freddie captures a moment of harmony and peace. And beauty. And it sounds like a classic Queen-song! "A beautiful day (intro and reprise)" functions well too. But what tracks 12 and 13 are about I have absolutely no idea..? I wish they would have ended the album with Freddies' last "Yeah!" on the song. I wish...So all in all; "Innuendo" remains the explosive good-bye with the "real" Queen. At least it does to me.(Let me add that the cover of "Made in Heaven" is perfect for the title, and somehow amazingly "seals" in its' simplicity the fate of the band with Freddie in the lead. The three band members left (Brian, Roger, John) facing the sunset, and a statue capturing Freddie in a remembarable style on stage. Reminding me of him at Wembley 86. To me this actually expresses something beyond words, and it's impossible not to get a bit of an empty feeling watching it while listening to "Heaven for everyone" or "A winters' tale".)</review_text>
Triple H(as Fed Up): I love Britney, she is so pretty and nice and so on. Shawn Michaels(as Hellraiser): Anyone who hates her are just jealous! Triple H: Well, we got some news, Britney is nothing but an ugly redneck piece of trailer trash. Shawn Michaels: This no-talent hack is a washed up skank whose career sank. Triple H: This chick is a skank, unlike my wife Stephanie McMahon who looked good whilst carrying my first child(I just had a daughter). Shawn Michaels: Britard on the other hand is one ugly airbrushed, lying hypocrite. D-Generation X says if you are not down with DX and you choose to be down with Britney and her blind sheep fans, WE GOT TWO WORDS FOR YA(crowd yells S*CK IT)</review_text>
Inspiring? No! Pleasant? No! Entertaining? No! Worthwhile? No!What are you folks sniffing out there anyway? Whatever it is, please consider passing it along, because other than the single authentic and melodic track by Patsy Cline (i.e., Back In Baby's Arms, which is available on a zillion other collections including some of her own), this CD doesn't have an ounce of redeeming musical, lyrical or social value in my view. Nada! Zip!Even the Dylan track is junk! The entire CD is essentially drivel, put to the dull, homicide-provoking sound of endless, droning noise, with an overall signal-to-noise ratio of about one (1.0)!!! What a WASTE of an A-to-D converter</review_text>
Ok, I've listened to Fat Boy Slim.  That guy's stuff isn't bad, by no means main stream, but worth while.  But ... this Norman Cook - he's horrible.  It's no wonder Cook developed an alter ego.  With the exception of a few easily recognisable tunes, I couldn't believe this &quot;stuff&quot; had come from the same artist that produced Praise You.  Renegade Master is the type of track I've come to know and respect (that one is a keeper), and I have to give props for I Left My Wallet in El Segundo.  Other than that, this album sounds like someone mixed songs from the first dozen records they found during their expedition to the flea market.  If this is the sound you're looking for, save a few bucks, check out your local yard sales.  So as not to be too negative, I'll say this; the printing job on the CD itself is charming.  The notion of making it look like a turntable was inspired</review_text>
Sorry to say I'm not a huge fan of Tanghetto even after seening them play live at La Viruta last month. Few of the tracks are just undanceable and the music gets pretty boring after a while. I say if you want neuvo tango try Narcotango or Otro Aires.</review_text>
After discovering and loving the sound of Gotan Project I was shopping around for groups with a similar sound.  I stumbled along Emigrante and upon reading the other reviews written on this site about this cd, I thought I had found another gem.  Boy was I wrong.  The first track drew me in and left me spellbound, unfortunately, it was all downhill after that.  I was listening to the cd for the first time in my car and forgot it was even on.  The rest of the songs were so uninspiring, the music soon became nothing more than meaningless background noise</review_text>
There are only a couple of songs I did like on this cd. I did enjoy Ice Cube and Aaliyah, but the rest of the cd left me cold. I do think that if you can just find the two songs and pay to download them, it would have been better! I suggest borrowing first from a friend and seeing if you actually like it first before you buy.</review_text>
I am a huge fan of Elvis Costello and ran to the shop as soon as I read the great reviews of this album, what a mistake!!!Very few of the arrangements offer an improvement over the original version. The cardboard cut salsa montuno of 'Clubland' sounds as classy and natural as a plastic flamingo and the wonderful Ska sound of 'Watching the Detectives' is lost in a jazz arrangement that doesn't offer much to the melody.Elvis' voice is not suited the long sustained notes of 'Almost Blue' and most of the songs. It worked well on his 'Juliet Letters' album because the Brodsky Quartet played for his style but with the clean and crisp sound of the Metropole Orkest it is just painful.For me,'Hora Decubitus' is the only song worth listening from this musical jumble</review_text>
I have followed Bruce Hornsby for over 20 years and own every album he has ever come out with including two concert DVDs.  I was reluctant to buy intersections due to owning all the other, but if you have been to  Hornsby concert you know that he always keeos things fresh..no exception here.  I loved the DVD of some of his performances.  There are treasures here, Imagine, solo on the Piano at an awards show, the Star Spangled Banner at the World Series with Marsalis, and his performance with BB King.it is a must for the hard core hornsby fan</review_text>
I ordered the DVD of Damn Yankees to watch on TV for my daughter because she is doing a play and needed it for the day I ordered it. I paid for fast delivery because she had a deadline and we were thrilled to receive it on time but was very disappointed to see that it was the CD of only music! I don't think I will order from Amazon again, it was my first time and probably my last.Liz Snyde</review_text>
I honestly feel that Tesla reached the end here. After "Psychotic Supper" failed to get the label support that it desparately needed the group just fell apart. With this the whole metal scene was falling away anyhow as grunge was dying off after the death of Kurt Cobain, and here was Tesla trying to make up it's mind what way to go. With the opening track "The Gate" it sounded like they were going to head back to the hair days of the 80's, but then the next song "Solution" they played like a lost and wandering band of the 90's. The rest of the songs just followed suit. The groups slogan is "No Machines", but there's also another slogan at foot here, and that's "No Music Direction", and for some bands that's possibly a workable concept as long as there's an inkling of where the bands roots are. With Tesla it's all over the board where they would score a top 10 hit with an acoustic version of the song "Signs", which is a rock song, to where they do a cover here of Joe South's "Games People Play". I feel that Tesla failed to show thier influences here, and was just trying to make a living; which is not a bad thing, but it pretty much kept them at a cult status. I pretty much had this album, but didn't listen to it at the time as I was trying to leave the secular music scene behind, and just move onto Christianity, and I know the album lurked around in my head all this time, so I felt it was time to face it; I feel that the album is below par for a group that can do some memorable songs, and to me it seems they wanted out of the label, and possibly away from each other.</review_text>
Oh my goodness Rodger, oh my goodness.  Just oh my gosh, I'm just stunned.  This is the crappiest pice of crap that was ever ingested and mushed into chyme.  Yeah, you heard me, this is chyme.  Ok, let's see, let's mix bland country ballads with all kinds of awkward pop/country crossovers.... what do we get, half-baked, half-digested stuff that is for dumb teenage girls who are massively overweight.  Well, they're probably smarter than me........... I'm like as smart as a fungi.  No One Needs To Know and Whose Bed Have Your Boots Been Under are on the right direction out of the smelly stool sample.  Before I get too many people wanting to massively torture me with horrible utensils I'll say something nice.  Come On Over was an EXCELLENT effort, with all kinds of hooks, great production (errr, I mean it is Robert "I'm actually dead" Lang), and all kinds of fun.  Up! was even better (I'm not going to praise it too much, though, I mean, I AM an 18 year old guy...... so I already feel like I should be staring at a picture of Kevin Sorbo or something... which is not cool, I mean unless it's just hero worship, I could worship Kevin Sorbo)!  But still, we have this horrible, stinking, steaming mass of smelly wet clay-like pudding to shovel into the toilet (it's INTENDED target)...... looks like someone has bad aim</review_text>
i like a little bit of it, doesent mean its good, i wont throw it away or anything, ill just let it sift...wait...and look at the album cover most of the time. slayer is getting better though</review_text>
The worst Christmas album I ever heard.  I just bought it, played it once, and will NEVER play it again</review_text>
The songs are boring, the lyrics are plain. I am so dissapointed. I bought it without listening to it first thinking I would at least find one song. How wrong was I to find out that not even one track speaks to me. Andrea's solo album sucked. Now this! I think their creative days are over and if I see them in concert again, I hope I am not tortured with the music from this new album. Instead I hope they play the oldies but goodies that characterize them as the band I love so muc</review_text>
As a lover of gospel bluegrass I anticipated an enjoyable listening session with Blue Highway's latest offering. Let me first say that I am a fan of this group, which I consider to be one of the premier groups in bluegrassdom, but what I heard was bluegrass Muzak. Yes, the group's tight harmonies and excellent musicianship were in evidence, and that is what saved this disc from being sold to the local reseller, but the lack of inspiration and excitement was disappointing. Gospel music, even bluegrass Gospel, has a tendency to preachiness and taking itself too seriously as this disc proves. A good Gospel recording MUST have some cuts which are humorous, some serious and contemplative, some that push the envelope of orthodoxy, and most importantly it must have an element of FUN in order to keep the attention of the listeners. This disc fails in that regard containing standard old Gospel chestnuts along with some original songs that ape the oldtime standards. My advice is to either borrow it from a friend before buying new, or buy used. Want mine</review_text>
I'm a big fan of Great Big Sea and I purchase everything they release. Apparently they were trying to give this CD the "feel" of a live, medium-size venue performance. Unlike their other live DC offerings, this one sounds like it was recorded with a micro-cassette tape in some fan's front pocket. It doesn't give justice to their usual great vocals and unique sound. Overall, I was pretty disappointed and I'd recommend their earlier offerings over this one.</review_text>
Being a fan of Jack Johnson, I thought this one would be as good as the others.  I wasn't impressed at all.  It sounds like a few guys pickin' around in the basement.  The recording quality has very little production value.  At best, these are okay live versions of usually great songs.  This is an unnecessary piece for your Jack Johnson collection.</review_text>
The music for the soundtrack was so lame!  I though I was gonna cry cause I figured this was the end of B2K by this point.  The s'track wasn't even all B2K either.  I like the song with Jhene and Omarion "Happy".  Also I liked "Out of the Hood" other then that it was boring.</review_text>
Only way you are gonna like this music is if you are some depressed emo kid who listens to punk rock music just because it is punk, and you think that'll make you cool. This CD just doesn't display musical talent, maybe originality, but this is not high quality music</review_text>
I found the music rather annoying.  It was not what I expected at all</review_text>
The Raising Arizona part of the CD is almost exclusively electronic and only one 90 second track of the great banjo that I remember from the movie.  I recommend listening to samples before you buy</review_text>
I'm a "compleat" Beatlemaniac, and I don't mind the political statements at all, but this is a nearly unlistenable record that I have a hard time counting as a serious musical effort or even a real album.  I would have loved it if it had been a 7" single, "Woman is the Nigger of the World," with the rest of it just words written in liner notes.  After that opening track, the remainder is a serious chore to get through.  It's almost unimaginable that this came out between the excellent "Imagine" (1971) and the solid "Mind Games" (1973), but then again, John was not consistent, in part surely due to his apparent and admirable lack of commitment to being a pop star.  Love John for the genius he was, his commitment to peace, and the great music he made -- it's just that there's barely any of it on this particular record.</review_text>
Knuff respect to Public Enemy, they are one of the few groups in Hip-Hop history who've provided fans with ill beats and consciouss lyrics.  With that said, this single blows.  It's trash.  The beats are trash, Chuck D and Flavor Flav don't rap, the DVD is just them hanging out in some clubs.  It's a shame, legends such as Public Enemy are far above this remedial single.  If you want to hear their best worx, go and buy Fear of a Black Planet, or It Takes A Nation of Millions to Hold Us Back.  You won't be dissapointed..</review_text>
With the exception of "My heart will go on" by Celine Dion, Horner's soundtrack is not a masterpiece but a bunch of stinking skunks who are masked by a field of sweet smelling flowers.For a soundtrack score it is not riveting and really lacks any emotional connection to the film.  Overall it is just really overrated and the hit single got played so much that the masses just fell into a typical zombie trance and went marching to the store to buy it.  This was after they kept returning to the theater to see a fictional tale of love built around a tragic, awful event.It didn't stop them though; they could not get enough of seeing all those depictions of people freezing to death in the water.  Overall a below average soundtrack that road the coat tails of a hit single that was shoved down our throats for an entire year</review_text>
We read all the previous reviews and thought this disc would be a keeper. We (my husband, three kids 14, 10, and 5) tried it on a warm, spring evening in the car. One or two songs, like the Banana Splits, Speed Racer, and Scooby-Doo were fun. Most however, were harsh, and too fast for the parents and youngest guy.I would rather try these songs in their original state and skip the covers</review_text>
This record kind of sucks, but that's okay, because it doesn't suck in the way where you think &quot;oh hell we'll never get a good album out of this guy again&quot; (like, for instance, Rod Stewart's latest garbage), because, I think, it's not really Lou's fault. The problem is Lou's trying to draw his material from somewhere else, in this case a mediocre poet. We've always been willing to overlook his (Poe's) considerable lack of talent (example:  &quot;in there stepped a stately raven of the saintly days of yore&quot;) because he's so damn charismatic. Morbidly charismatic, but charismatic nonetheless. The danger is that too many people consider his pure dumb fun to be art (which I guess makes him a lot like the Rolling Stones). Lou, who's always shown himself to be a poet but a poet with a wink, has now chosen an artist who is basically Bernie Taupin with a better vocabulary to be his kindred spirit, and from someone who, Velvet genius notwithstanding, produced revolutionary and stunning works like Transformer, Metal Machine Music, and Berlin, this self-effacing friendship is the real tragedy</review_text>
I have been a NIN fan since Pretty Hate Machine. I think Trent Reznor is a brilliant musician. All of his previous albums have been absolute genius....until this? I pre-ordered this album anticipating another masterpiece. What a disappointment!! I still can't get over how terrible this album is! The only song that is worth mentioning is "You Know What You Are." That's the Trent I know! I purposely skipped the tour just so I didn't have to hear the new stuff! I hope this isn't it for him, but I will be cautious when the next album comes out</review_text>
While there are some flashes of brilliance in this album, it is compromised by a lack of direction. The 'Tastes so Sweet' mix of Rapture is beautiful, although cut far too short. Faithless, Afrika Bambaataa &amp; Soulsonic, and Crystal Method are all good driving tracks at the tail end of this album. The high point, without contest, is Darude's ripping mix of Rising Star's 'Touch Me'. This is a cut to throw on for the peak... when you find the party is just outside of Barstow with Hunter. That said, then there are all the uninspired tracks in the center of the album. These are more appropriate in an adolescent Brit girl's drawer next to the Spice Girls. For some labels, this would be normal, for Ministry however, it is a dissapointment</review_text>
This CD has some good songs on it, but the majority of them are less than 2 minutes! It's kind of a rip off since the songs are much shorter than I expected. They are mixed together, and sometimes a song is so short that the one before it is still fading out by the time the song after it has started! If you don't mind really short songs, buy this, but I wouldn't recommend it otherwise</review_text>
I bought this cd for one song, &quot;Walk Away&quot; which was one of their best known songs. I was hoping since that particular song was so good that maybe the album would harbor a few more gems. There wasn't. The rest of the album is like an anti-climax. I would suggest a greatest hits instead. If you see this cd just turn your pretty head and walk away</review_text>
collective soul had a few nice attempts toward pop music like dosage. The main problem i have with this album is none of the songs are hits so no airwaves and the fact that the album probably has about 7 fillers! Its just to flawed to recommend to everyone it may be if you are a diehard collective soul fans. i wouldnt lose this album but i wouldnt buy it again</review_text>
I love the sludge and the roar but the vocals are monotone and the lyrics laughable.  Gimme Earth or SunnO))) anyday</review_text>
I agree with "music fan" about this CD. Eden is a good album, and she's a good artist. But either this album was poorly produced or something, because this does not show her best. I wouldn't classify this as world music at all, because the instruments aren't used and it's more classical pop; if that's a genre. It seemed rambly to me with many of the songs sounding similar and lacking originality. I love her, she's unique in her genre. But she really shines as a classicist, with Classics, her work by Andrew Lloyd Webber (who she married) and operatic albums. This is what she's best at, so her collaborations on Eden and La Luna, which are classical in nature but still allowed her to branch out musically, turned out good. I have a lot of her albums, but I wouldn't buy this one. It's more something to listen to once. A few of the songs are good, the album isn't terrible, but it's not very good</review_text>
So Far, So Good...So What! (in it's origional form) used to conjure feeling.  The remastered edition sounds like a group of studio musicians tried to remake the album and just didn't quite hit the nail on the head.  If you bought this album on cassette when it came out in the late 80s, get your hands on that version.</review_text>
this is NOT,i repeat NOT five stars!in all honesty it's more like 1.5 or 2 stars and i'm a big fan of slug & atmosphere.albums like overcast,godlovesugly,the felt project,and the dynospectrum album is much better than this.though the lyrics are thought provoking,but slug has been better,the production doesn't hold up.it's some of the weakest i've heard from rhymesayers.there's only a couple tracks that stand out,but i'd have to say "don't ever f**king question that" is the best.if you wanna hear slug at his best check out the dynospectrum album.slug spits classic verse after classic verse</review_text>
First of all let me clearly state that im from Atlanta and I am a diehard fan of Lil Scrappy and that is why it breaks my heart to tell you that this CD is garbage. Besides Money in the Bank there are no other standout cuts and it is a shame because the underground mixtape he dropped with DJ Don Cannon early last year was on fire, He and Cannon delivered all new tracks and there were all on point, that was of course before 50's influence which brings us to our problem. The influence of Curtis Jackson A.K.A 50 Cent is very clear on this album. I like 50 but he knows little of the way we make records down south. If the G-Unit boss would have just stayed out he way and let Scrappy pick and choose his own tracks, verses etc. everything may have been fine. The guy is a control freak and as a result nobody in the "A" is pumping this and it is a shame because when Scrappy is on point the boy is unstoppable. This CD is garbage plain and simple and 50's influence is going to put the the crown prince of the south's career in serious jerpody unless he quickly wise's up. This is an honest review from a fan that has been down since day one.I have bought all the mixtapes and everything else he's dropped but, im telling you If you the consumer buy this Cd you will regret it and to Scrappy ditch the G Unit do what's in your heart and get back to business.</review_text>
I mainly bought this album because I was going to see them on this tour.  In fact the gig I was at was the opening show on the tour.  Again, the band uses their patented formula basically creating the same album over and over again.  I find most of this album to be very average.  Actually after listening, this album is not very good at all.  The majority of the songs are clich ridden in both music and lyrics.  There are a couple of catchy tracks most notably "Safe In New York City" which is a bit different but most of this album is cock rock at its most basic.  Probably one of the bands weakest efforts</review_text>
Do you LOVE "On Eagles Wings"? If the answer is yes, then do you know the words to Panis Angelicus? The answer is probably "no." I don't blame you for liking this CD. The problem is that it isn't Catholic and it isn't Classic. You should ask yourself if you are willing to entertain the songs that Catholics have enjoyed for thousands of years. If you are willing to look beyond the guitars at your local mass, start with Sacred Songs by Bocelli, or Simply Baroque by Yo Yo Ma</review_text>
thr pros about this album s that there alot of tight rappers and beats the cons about this album is that clue calls himself a dj but he's a dumb phony who doesn't know when to shut his mouth all he does is yell out throughout the whole album saying stupid stuff and giving shoutouts while the rappers rap he nees o shut up an lets us hear the song if u want this album still, go copy it off the net cause the is not worth the money    ohyeah he dosen't even scratc</review_text>
I have been listening to military band music for years, and am rarely disappointed.  However, this compendium of music by the U.S. Navy, Army, and Marine bands and associated choral groups is not to my taste.  Many of the arrangements are strange, and there is much too much vocal music when what I want to hear is the bands play.  I would not have bought this album hhad I known beforehand what I know now</review_text>
I really can't understand why all the reviewers are going crazy over this record. First off, I bought it without hearing anything by them before, but it had been highly recomended to people who like Tool and Mars Volta by Amazon!! They couln't have been any more wrong. So, why did i personally find this so painfull?Well, the whole thing in general is quite painfull. First off, the musicians. The whole band sound like studio musicians. No obvious indivuality or anything new to offer. Then we get to the vocals. The closest thing I can compare them to are Alison Moyet or Anthony and the johnsons. I don't mind Anthony and the Johnsons, but this guys vocals and the music just don't rock. Which is fine. It's ok not to rock! But why the hell, being a Tool fan and Mars volta fan, was I recomended this? It's bland, it's week, and the dubby bass, boring guitar playing/sound... weak vocals.. Actually, forget it. The whole package. It is just lame</review_text>
I like to have natural sounds or some type of 'yoga style' music while I'm either practicing yoga or just trying to relax.  This CD just didn't fit.  There are a few ok 'songs' but the rest of it is either too fast/upbeat or there's too much talking/chanting.  I found myself distracted when I put this CD on</review_text>
Certainly this album offers very little to a fan of The Ocean Blue's eariler work.  The vocals and guitars sound quite different (gone is that beautiful dreamy sound).  And what about those awesome saxaphone and  keyboard sounds that made their earlier tracks so fun?  Just because Steve  Lau is gay is no reason for the band to abandon keyboards altogether.  So,  anyway, what does this album offer instead?  Harder sounding guitar,  angrier sounding vocals, and songs that are somewhat intersting, but are  lacking in any magic that would make you want to listen to them after  you've had the CD for a couple weeks.  Exceptions: &quot;Whenever You're  Around&quot;, and &quot;Slide&quot; are good enough songs to standout  inspite of boring production</review_text>
I was very disappointed that the version of &quot;Paper Roses&quot; included on this CD is an updated and new recorded version from 1990.  It is not the original 1973 classic Marie recorded when she was twelve.Interestingly, this new version is produced by Sonny James, the original producer of the original single, that also features many of the original studio musicians.  So all is not lost. Still, I prefer the original hit version and am disappointed there was no indication that this CD included an updated &quot;Paper Roses.&quot</review_text>
Hmm...  Ok, maybe it was not the best reason to want to buy this CD, but I heard one of the songs on it, Hashkiveynu, performed (partially) during an episode of the West Wing, and it sounded AMAZING (it was NOT the same cantor as on this CD).  I am not Jewish and not even very spiritual, but I wanted to have that song in my collection.I immediately searched the web for the info, got the name of the chant and found this CD.  I almost purchased it without listening, when I found a different site, where they actually have rather long excerpts (2 min.) of most tracks, so I listened to them.Boy, was I relieved and disappointed at once!  Relieved that I didn't buy the CD and disappointed that I couldn't get the song I wanted (I was willing to buy a whole CD for just 1 song, that's how much it impressed me).The song sounds very little like the one from the West Wing, although I do believe that the site where I found the info speficially pointed to this CD as having a recording of the same song used in the show.  And I'm sorry to say it but the voice also doesn't hold a candle to the one used on the show - way too "operatic", as mentioned by many, and harsh and even unpleasant-sounding to me.  It took all the charm and candor right out of the song (in the show, they had a much more natural voice do the song).  I also agree that the choir does not mesh well with the soloist.If anyone knows where and if I can purchase a recording of this song done by a different singer (if it can be the one from the West Wing, I'll be thrilled), please, let me know.  In the meantime, I'm passing on this CD..</review_text>
I'd like to second some of the other reviewers' reviews of this album. It really lacks the energy and the coherence of the previous album. The tracks in general are a little slower. The production quality is overall about the same, but it is just not as "listenable" as Believe was. The exception I find on the album is the "Club Mix" of "Turn It Around."But if we think about that for a second, aren't we talking about "club music" here afterall? Are we under any pretenses that this is elevator or lobby music? I should think not. What we expect from this band, and from a second album is an equal or better effort at club music. House-ish, trance-ish, and anthemic. It's just missing on Turn it Around.I wholeheartedly recommend Believe, but I'd steer clear of this one unless you find it used.</review_text>
I can't believe none of the other reviews of the Ultra Lounge series state that these CD's contain almost all instrumental music, with very few songs that feature vocals.  I expect a lounge music CD to have a mix of both vocal and instrumental tracks, and of the four Ultra Lounge CD's I purchased, I count only three songs with vocals on all four of them.  While the instrumental songs do fit the genre of lounge music, they tend to blend into one another and become mundane after hearing several of them.  The titles of the Ultra Lounge CD's (such as Bachelor Pad or Bossanova) mean very little, as each CD fails to distinguish itself from any other because of all of the instrumental tracks.  The best lounge CD I have heard so far is from an unlikely source.  I purchased it at Pottery Barn, and it has a great mix of vocal and instrumental songs.  Keep this in mind when buying lounge music CD's so that you won't be disappointed the way I was with the Ultra Lounge series</review_text>
The versions of "Black Sabbath" and "War Pigs" actually comprise half of Black Sabbath's appearance on the April 26, 1970 edition of John Peel's 'Sunday Show.'  "Black Sabbath" features a unique third verse that appears on no other officially released version of the song.  "War Pigs" is actually "Walpurgis," an earlier incarnation of the song featuring entirely different lyrics.  Incidentally, the other two songs from that broadcast, "Fairies Wear Boots" and "Behind the Wall of Sleep," were released as bonus tracks on the supplemental disc issued with the first pressings of the original 1997 release.  All four of these tracks, while fascinating, don't rightfully belong on this collection, as this disc intends to highlight Ozzy Osbourne's career as a solo artist.  For that reason, the live version of "Paranoid" that appears on this set is equally unnecessary.Those songs are frustrating inclusions on an Ozzy Osbourne greatest hits album, particularly since they come at the apparent exclusion of some of Ozzy's biggest hits and/or notable tracks such as "Flying High Again," "Shot in the Dark," "I Don't Know," "Breaking All the Rules," or "Road to Nowhere."To add to the confusion, some of the solo-era material included here isn't exactly what it purports to be.  Ozzy has been the subject of a number of recent legal disputes over writing and performance royalties.  These disputes ostensibly prompted Ozzy to reissue his back catalog in 2002 with, in some cases, re-recorded tracks.  The 'Blizzard of Ozz' and 'Diary of a Madman' albums now feature pointlessly re-recorded rhythm parts, presumably as a snub to the original rhythm section of Lee Kerslacke (drums) and Bob Daisley (bass), who, incidentally, wrote the lyrics to almost every Ozzy solo track from 'Blizzard of Ozz' through 'No More Tears.'  The 'Bark at the Moon' album, while not re-recorded, was most certainly remixed.  It is the re-recorded versions of the 'Blizzard of Ozz' and 'Diary of a Madman' tracks and the remixed version of the 'Bark at the Moon' track that appear on the current edition of this collection.  Finally, the version of "No More Tears" is actually the video edit, not the album version.In addition, due to one of the disputes mentioned above, 'The Ultimate Sin' album was not selected for remastering in 2002 and has subsequently been dropped from Ozzy's catalog.  That album's biggest hit, "Shot in the Dark," which appeared on the original 1997 release of this collection, has now been replaced with "Miracle Man" from 'No Rest for the Wicked.'  Along these lines, the 'Just Say Ozzy' live EP and the double-disc live album, 'Live and Loud,' both of which contain a live version of "Shot in the Dark," have also been deleted from Ozzy's catalog.  Not even 'The Essential Ozzy Osbourne,' a double-disc collection covering Ozzy's entire solo career, features a single song from 'The Ultimate Sin.'  The ultimate sin, indeed.My recommendation is to avoid this collection (and the 2002 remasters) and instead search for the 1995 remasters or, better yet, search for the original albums on vinyl</review_text>
Lou Reed rocks!!! Dude!! But methinks this collection dost not. The tunes are all good, but there aren't very many of them, and the sound is deplorable, in that inimitable RCA-first-CD-edition sort of way (fans of the Jefferson Airplane and Harry Nilsson know what I'm talking about). A much better jumping off point would be &quot;Different Times: Lou Reed in the 70's&quot;, or, even better, check out &quot;Transformer&quot; or &quot;Rock 'n' Roll Animal&quot;</review_text>
If you need an experience of pure meaningless noise, this one's for you. However, dont expect it to change your life much.The price listed above for the album is a very good example of the old cliche, "you get what you pay for.</review_text>
Deep Lyrics man, I'm getting a lot out of this... But just wait for the next record when you'll get &quot;Hold On Loosely!&quot</review_text>
There are some artists who have been active since the 60's and 70's and who are still producing vibrant, excellent music. Paul Simon, say, or Bob Dylan. Kate Bush, though she started a little later. All of these artists have evolved past their original sound but are still great.Joni Mitchell should have stopped when she was ahead. Maybe I don't rate as a JM fan because I've only heard Blue, but I've listened to that album hundreds of  times times over the years.I wanted to find out what she was up to since then, and bought this album. All I have to say is, it was like nails on a chalkboard. I was EXPECTING her to change and grow, but not into some pale ghost of the 60's droning on about the evils of commercialism and modernism. The lyrics are old and tired, and the instrumentation is hackneyed and stale, too. The only good lyrics on this album were provided by Yates.At least her paintings are good.</review_text>
I didn't listen the disk but know the recording label. Never heard anything good produced by the company in several occasions when I was hooked by the low price: very poor immitations. Just go for the real things</review_text>
This is simply a transfer of the LP master done when CDs were just getting started. The quality is inferior to other collections and the selection is weaker. Go for the Collectables twofer instead. Much better sound and more cuts</review_text>
Let me tell you, Shayne Ward is just one of those pop singers who only go by looks, if he looked like shrek he would not be anywhere today, face it girls your only buying this because you fancy him.Look at Justin Timberlake, where is he today, they go and move on, and thats what Shayne will do except alot faster.This song is so rubbish, the thing I hate so much is that he didn't even write this!So its not his own material, and let me take you in on a little secret he does not care about this song, its not like these lyrics mean anything to him, as he did not write.And on "No Promises" thats even worse than this, yes he might of wrote it I don't know, but does the song have depth, or is it just a plain old expected pop song.By the way it's the second one.Shayne Ward has no protential, neather does anyone who comes of X Factor, its all just one big [...</review_text>
This disc was simply a waste of my time...very mediocre songs, heavy emphasis on sex instead of talent...Corey's voice is below average....I get the feeling that Corey Clark is IMITATING a good singer with a VIABLE career, and not doing it very well....clearly 'fake it till you make it' isn't working here.  The songs all sound the same, I kept waiting for something to get me grooving, but it just didn't happen.I think his ego is much larger than his actual musical potential...he either needs voice lessons, a little humility, and some professional grooming (and I don't mean clothing).</review_text>
Buddy Holly has a number of collections that are superior to the one put out under the 20th Century Masters series.  Every one of the CDs in this series is skimpy in content and superfluous.  This one is no exception.   Look elsewhere</review_text>
Hate to say it, but this is pretty drab stuff.  That said, I'm hardly about to complain; how could I?  This was obviously written for a film (that I have no interest in seeing), and Mogwai just released 'Mr. Beast', a solid (if unspectacular) album earlier this year.  I kind of see 'Zidane' as a gift, then.  Looking at the whole thing from that perspective, it's impossible to be letdown.But then, retaining much emotion out of this composition is downright difficult.  Mogwai, when channeling the right energies, create sublime, beautiful music -- truly as beautiful as any form of modern music, to my ears.  When they're a bit more ambiguous, though, the results tend to float in limbo and lack direction.  'Zindane' seems to possess certain elements of both these characteristics to an extent, but the result is surprisingly dull -- at best, it's pretty; at worst, it's utterly monotonous.The ideas are here, too; it's not that 'Zindane' lacks drive or intent.  It is a focused work. Yet,  it's obvious, I think, that the music, contrary to most film scores, desires to refrain from emotional manipulation.  While that's admirable, I find that musically, I'd much rather be manipulated than dazed; this is literally music to listen to whilst on painkillers.  There are a few nice themes and motifs, don't get me wrong, but this is ALL underscore -- Mogwai, in the best way possible, has a great gift at handling melodrama, and here they never appear to be guided by the dramatic light.I won't sway anyone from attempting to get 'Zidane', but I wouldn't hand it out to anyone unexposed to Mogwai in some hopes of garnishing their admiration. No, for that, I would naturally lead them to one of their many fine studio albums.  For, Mogwai is a band, after all -- they are not Jerry Goldsmith or Ennio Morricone.  For those unaware, Mogwai performed much of the score for the recently released film 'The Fountain' -- though they did not write any of the actual material, from what I've gathered -- and as a musical experience, the soundtrack release for that album absolutely blows 'Zidane' out of the water.  In my opinion, it even beats out 'Mr. Beast', so impatient fans who need a fresh dose of Mogwai 'oughta check that one out for sure</review_text>
I bought this because a few people had put it in their Amazon lists.  I just didn't like it at all.  It is one of those albums where you play it, and you don't take notice of it until the CD stops playing.  It is very old and the music is simplistic.  Cool cover though</review_text>
One good song, of course "The sound of silence", and the studio version is far better than this one. I am not a fan of the genre as you might expect</review_text>
While I love Billie, in her own words, these sessions were dull, and uninspired. Since the reviews should focus on one CD, that is the jist of it; boring renditions, and back up musicians that are not the ones that  Billie was used to making for a very uneven collection</review_text>
This CD while full of nice music, is to me rather pointless.It's listed as a sound track but all it has is background music instrumentals.Does anyone know the titles of the actual songs used in the movie?Aside from Crazy train</review_text>
This CD had the makings of a great recording. The problem was telling Popper where they were performing!Butch,please record another one but leave Popper at home.He's full of a lot of things,but TALENT isn't one of them</review_text>
About half the songs are great old songs I'm familiar with, the other half are songs made famous by other artists and most are clangers for Elvis that are painful to listen to</review_text>
Well, ok, Mehldau's arrangements aren't bad...He does a great version of "Paranoid Android" but otherwise...WHERE'S THE ENERGY?   There's really not a whole lot of excitement or energy in this album, and I do understand this as being a more laid back, mellowed-out album...but it is still possible to be more exciting, energetic, or emotional in this style.   All three of these things are pretty much absent from this CD which ends up making it dull.   :yawn</review_text>
sinceramente, no puedo entender la devocion de muchas perosnas, incluso renombrados artistas, hacia este musico... ungido de la leyenda GRAPE, amparado en el descontrol y la libertad absoluta que encierra la locura, esta coleccion de temas no genera mas que sentimientos encontrados..lastima, piedad, curiosidad...no se , me genera igual sensacion que muchos discos de erickson (13th.....).. en ningun momento se me revela como la creacion de un genio.. en fin, son opiniones, nada mas.</review_text>
These songs are hacked up versons of Rick's music. I played it a couple of times until I got the library of original LPs. The Lps are better. At least they carry full versions of songs. I pass on Rick and this package. RCA cheats people out of good music..</review_text>
I like most of AC/DC's music, but I can't stand their latest album Stiff Upper Lip.  Stiff Upper Lip is the only AC/DC album where you can play it all the way through, and not even hear one good song.  Stiff Upper Lip doesn't even come close to being as good as Back in Black or Highway to Hell.  Every song on it just bugs the heck out of me.  Listening to one song off this album is enough to test my patience; but enduring all 12 of these musical abominations is enough to drive me crazy!  The overall sound is very similar to their earlier albums like Highway to Hell or Back in Black.  BUT...those CDs had variety, they were semi original, and they were actually pretty good.  THIS CD is just completely worthless.  I have heard some cra ppy CDs in my lifetime, but none of them were more pain to listen to than this.  The vocalist sounds about 10 times worse than he did on their earlier albums, the music is chunky, repetitive, dull, and boring, and most of the songs sound the same. Stiff Upper Lip is so bland and dull sounding that it sounds more like the monotonous droning of an electric fan than a rock n roll band.  The music is so repetitive and similar sounding that its more like listening to the same annoying song for 60 minutes than 12 separate tracks.  This CD is just unbelievaby terrible.  It is a disgrace to this band's legacy, and the band members should be embarrased by it.  Oh well, I guess they probably only made this album because they needed to fulfill their record contract, so I guess they don't care about how awful it is anyway.  All I can tell you potential buyers is to stay as far away from this piece of garbage as possible.  It is a TOTAL piece of cr ap and it is not fit to listen to.  Go buy a GOOD AC/DC CD like Let there Be Rock, High Voltage, Powerage, Highway to Hell, or Back in Black.  Stiff Upper Lip suc ks so hard it leaves a big purple bruise.  It's so awful I'd rather listen to the new Nickelback CD than this!</review_text>
I am a HUGE ATL Fan. Black Mafia 4 Life, know what I mean. I waited a long time for this release, and it was painful to listen to. It just seemed to lack direction. It might be said that this album (an independent record label) was so bad, that it ended their careers. Too bad, I loved ATL.</review_text>
Sean "Puffy" Combs, Puffy Daddy, Sean John, P Diddy or Diddy.  When he figures out what he wants to be called is when I figure out if I like him.  Meanwhile, there still isn't one good DVD set for Star Wars.</review_text>
These guys are not artists. They are unimaginative lamebrains unwittingly and badly rewriting already overplayed music from a long dead scene. It's like a few monkeys build a house, and all the other monkeys rave about it, but in reality the house is just a banana tree with a welcome mat... whatever that means.I am constantly astounded as to how waste like this gets on the radio. Buy this cd if you want to vomit everywhere.</review_text>
While I doubt I'll EVER get used to the edited (single?) version of 'Nights In White Satin' presented here, I have to agree that the song selection in general is excellent for a compilation of this seminal band.  That said, The Moody Blues (or more likely, their record label) haven't exactly been shy about releasing such anthologies and hits collections on CD, either.  While 'Gold' represents an affordable means of buying some of the best known and loved music from The Moody Blues, it also is for me one of the most trying listening experiences as well.If I had to guess, I'd say much of the music contained on 'Gold' comes from different masters than the songs currently found on other collections, and on the band's original CD albums.  There are definite issues with the sonic quality of these songs as presented on this disc.  For instance, the music track of 'Nights' is horrendously compressed in comparison to earlier CD versions of this song; perhaps the record label was working with an unremastered single release master of the song (my guess), but the audible discrepancies between this version and earlier examples (albeit, in the full album form including The Late Lament and the full orchestral intro) are hard for this listener to stomach.  I can point to any of the earlier music included here and say pretty much the same thing.  Whatever the reason, the original source material used for this CD could've seriously benefitted from earnest remastering work.  While I suspect that would've raised the asking price of 'Gold', I also would contend that great music DESERVES such caring treatment.As it is, too much of 'Gold' as issued is indeed quite tarnished, which in the real world given the metal that goes by periodic symbol of Au would've been impossible to do.  But evidently in realm of the corporate music world, when selling music on the cheap and banging out sloppily compiled CDs it's very easy to take the most precious and thoroughly muck it up</review_text>
yet even some of you who agree that the album bites still say that "tub thumping" is okay, even if it "gets old after awhile". that song is CRAP!!! has to be one of the worst songs ever to get play. EVER! sounds like a bad radio commercial for some english beer they're trying to market in the states.that song (if you can call a random string of cheesy choruses a song) makes the strongest argument AGAINST ANARCHY that i've ever heard. proves that people who can't agree on anything can't make a song that makes any sense or follows any consistent theme.gotta go - just threw up in my mouth from the bilious memory of this worthless pop drivel</review_text>
I don't even own this CD, and after seeing the reviews I don't want it.  90% of the "5 star" reviews are people with ONLY ONE review.  Suspicious?? Look for yourself, it's right there to see.  I have some other meditation CDs that are very repetitive, I'm not going to make the same mistake here, especially with such SHAMELESS self-promotion</review_text>
My youngest brother, who has a pretty strange sense of humor, bought me this CD for my birthday; I wonder how he knew I didn't own it already? I don't even know where to begin with this one. What can you say about somebody who poses for an album cover in rainbow-painted panties while licking a heart-shaped lolli-pop? And the foldout poster of her reclining on pink satin sheets with said lolli-pop is downright laughable. Does she expect anyone to take her seriously? After her first album, I thought Carey had a remarkable talent that needed some fine-tuning, particularly in regard to her penchant for singing cliches. Instead of getting better, though, she has turned her career into a self-debasing fantasy of baby-doll mannerisms coupled with relentlessly monotonous song choices. Rappers like Jay-Z, Snoop Dogg, Missy Elliott and Usher are brought in to add spice, but they only drown in the sticky-sweet syrup of gunk that she chooses to sing. She may have a lot of #1 hits, but who can tell any of them apart? Rainbow is only Carey's latest entry in a career that has lowered the quality standard for divas everywhere.D-  Tom Rya</review_text>
Perhaps Puffy only got as far as he could riding on Biggie's legacy, but lets face it, he really has very little talent, charisma, charm and just seems so dull, he is basically a male Paris Hilton, going around acting like the world's biggest d1ck ny saying "look people, I got money, arent I cool" besides Biggie(RIP), Bad Boy really is not great, most of the artists are poor quality, The production is awful and no one has not even shown potetial. This album is basically not even worth printing or existing. It is just sad that many great underground rappers are not getting any attention while garbage like Diddy plague are airwaves and puts his dumb face everywhere on TV. I don't know why people like Tupac, Biggie, Dimebag, Chuck Shuldiner and countless other greats are buried but this guy still breaths. So I would say in conclusion that we should do what people like chingy and D4L deserve, a 1 star rating.</review_text>
It was awful! The reproduction of the music was grainy, scratchy and virtually impossible to listen to</review_text>
Did not care for the selections on this CD</review_text>
Golijov's music incorporates Jewish, Arabic, Christian, Afro-Brazilian, and other ethnic influences ad nauseum...So what?Listening to this disc is like having dental work done without novocaine.Only DIVERSITY NAZIS who want to smugly bask in their own "enlightened" weltanschauung will find much to enjoy here.Golijov cunningly caters to these folks' taste. May he ride it all the way to the bank.</review_text>
Some will mistake me for a Evidence hater, but I'm really not.  I just want the man to put some effort into what he does.  I'm tired of taking just any ol' thing artists throw at us nowadays because the "fans" don't expect very much -- or simply don't know what good is anymore.  Sure, you can relate to what Evidence is saying, but you can put on a dope instrumental CD, sit with a friend or knowledgable hip hop head, have a discussion about any topic, and the resulting feeling will be something like the feeling you get from this album.  I quickly get tired of the "slow flow" -- see: talking -- and I feel like anyone can do it.  I don't shell out money for things I can do myself.  Really, the only difference between him and 50 cent is content.  When I hear someone say "slow flow" my mind translates that into "reduction of standards to make it easier for cats to get on" because this album would have been thrown out the window before the jiggy invasion came.  And lot of these beats, though very dope, are as slow as his flow is.  Couple that with the fact that there are a lot of wack guest appearance from cats like Joe Scudda (I'm sorry, I tried to like him, but dude is simply terrible), Big Pooh (same goes for him), and Madchild and you have an album that can have a drowsying effect on the listener.  The only dope guest shots come from Phonte, Planet Asia, and Slug.  Yeah, I know the fans and jock riders will hate and call names, but I'm going to keep it honest -- fu** real.When Ev actually puts his back into it, he creates some dope material.  "Down With New York City" is nice piece of work that has Ev gettin' busy over an air tight Jake One track.  "Chase The Clouds Away" is another track where Ev does his thing over a pounding ALC production.  The standout to me had to be "Line of Scrimmage" which features Ev and Atmosphere frontman, Slug, getting nice over another dope ALC creation.  With the likes of Alchemist, Sid Roams, Jake One, DJ Khalil, Babu, and Evidence himself providing dope beats, I'd have to say that the production is definitely the strong point of the LP.Simply put, I don't recommend playing this CD while operating heavy machinery.  I respect Ev and his whole crew (hell, I love Rakaa), but this album will make you nod off instead of nod to the beat.  I can only call it the way I see it regardless of whether or not the artist is a favorite of mine or not.  Bring on the unhelpful votes if you want, but I can only recommend this to the die hard fans -- who should eat this one up.  Everyone else should download this and test it out first.Standout Tracks: Letyourselfgo feat. Alchemist & Phonte, A Moment In Time feat. Planet Asia, Line Of Scrimmage feat. Slug (My Favorite), and Down In New York Cit</review_text>
Holy cow, I was ready to rip my hair out after listening to this. Horrible, sophomoric, insipid... YUK. This is like Chinese water torture. drip drip drip on and on. YAAAGGGHHHH</review_text>
Roni Griffith has just come out with her new release "Only You"Its Great!!!!!   [...]She has come back so much stronger.  Check it out. Evi</review_text>
In many ways a relic of its era, "Not of This Earth" is the first widely distributed release by Joe Satriani (a previous EP ended up being reissued as part of "Time Machine", years later).  The guitarist, supported by drummer Jeff Campitelli and percussionist John Cuniberti came into public attention when Steve Vai, a former student of Satriani, ended up singing his teacher's praises in the music press.The result is that this album, more than likely to have been lost in the shuffle of instrumental rock music, received wider recognition and poised Satriani to explode into a bonafide celebrity on his next record.The album itself is a bit uneven-- Satriani is a flawlessly brilliant guitarist, but as a songwriter, he wasn't quite ready.  Several pieces ("Not of This Earth", "Hordes of Locusts") seem to run out of steam before they end, and a couple ("The Snake", "Driving At Night") feel like bad '80s metal.  On the other hand, several pieces shine-- delicate and lovely "Rubina", reggaeish and emotionally soaked "Memories", and the overtly Frippesque "New Day" are all fine examples of what Satriani is capable of.  But my favorite is probably "Brother John", where Satriani abandons all his effects and performs his delicate and bubbly melody cleantone.In the end, the album is ok, but Satriani would go on to do so much more interesting in the future.  Come back to this one if you've picked up a bunch of other stuff and are looking for more, but most should start with "Surfing With the Alien"</review_text>
For those who were fortunate enough to aquire one of the first two releases of the THIEF soundtrack (like myself) congratulations - you have the version of the CD that contains the best song on the soundtrack, Beach SCENE. It has been dropped for this US release.For those who were interested in obtaining the Thief soundtrack being mainly interested in the one song, Beach SCENE (most of the other songs can be found on other Tangerine Dream albums), please realise the following differences between Beach THEME and the now dropped, Beach SCENE.The song, Beach THEME is a much shorter track (almost by half) and there is a very cheesy, acoustic, "rock n' roll", drum beat that was mixed/dubbed over the original Beach SCENE song which has the much more mellow and less invasive electronic, sequenced drum beat in it. It's Beach SCENE that was both heard in the movie and over the airwaves back in 1981. If that is the song you remember (fell in love with) and are looking for, do NOT buy this latest release. Keep looking for those Out Of Print CDs - they are out there.On a lighter "note", it's very nice to see they added the ending/end-credits song, CONFRONTATION.This is a lose/win scenario for THIEF soundtrack fans - it all depends on which song is more important to you. If you already have the earlier releases with Beach SCENE on it then buying this latest version  will now complete a defninitve soundtrack for them as that last song in the movie has now finally been added to the official soundtrack</review_text>
To those of you interested in this CD in lieu of finding the &quot;songs with lyrics&quot; in the movie ICE AGE, got bad news for you. They are NOT here!  I really do hate it when a soundtrack is put out for a movie and they don't include the best or features songs in the movie.  Anyway, the song that pretty much everyone wants when Manny, Sid, Diego and the baby are together and walking towards Half Peak is called &quot;Send Me On My Way&quot; by Rusted Root. It is on their latest album &quot;When I Woke&quot;. Put Rusted Root in the Amazon search engine and you should find it.  Hope this helps those looking for this song</review_text>
Brooks & Dunn, Kenny Chesney, Lonestar, Martina McBride, Montgomery Gentry, Aaron Tippin, Lee Greenwood, Neal McCoy, Kenny Rogers, Randy Travis, Phil Vassar, The Warren Brothers, Dusty Drake, Hank Williams Jr., Alabama, The Charlie Daniels Band, David Ball, and Blackhawk.What do these artists have in common? Cutting edge musical geniuses? Gifted songwriters able to speak to a wide range of audiences? Innovators in their genre?Err, no.Actually what they all have in common is that they all appear on this package, created to commercially exploit the war on terrorism, one which contains songs like Where The Stars And Stripes And The Eagle Fly, This Ain't No Rag, It's A Flag, and Back Where I Come From. In other words, maudlin, xenophobic, cliche filled, black/white dichotomous sentiments, and the lack of any attempt at rational or questioning political analysis, all set to fiddles and pedal steel guitars, and to be marketed and sold at Wal-Mart. I should add that I am not against patriotism, when it is intelligent and well informed; this, however, is dumb, reactionary faux-patriotism. Nothing is more so than the song God Bless the USA. As an American who loves his country, I can say that this song, with its syrupy sound and its naive lyrics, does not speak for me.I listened to a bit of this schlock on a plane ride a while back just to see how much of it I could take. The answer was - not very much. What little I could take made me want to drink, and heavily.Some of these performers, specifically Brooks and Dunn, Randy Travis, Charlie Daniels, and perhaps Kenny Chesney and even (I hate to admit) Toby Keith are actually fairly talented; others, like former lounge singer Lee Greenwood, Alabama, Montgomery Gentry, etc, are 3rd rate musical hacks.Ultimately, listening to this nonsense, I'm reminded that some of the greats of the genre, like Johnny Cash, Hank Williams, George Jones, and Willie Nelson were neither knee-jerkreactionaries nor apologists for a ruling political party. Then again, Dusty Drake, Montgomery Gentry, and Blackhawk are no Johnny Cashes. Just Nashville hacks, soon to be forgotten.</review_text>
I was looking to get the DVD of DAZED AND CONFUSED but got the CD. When it was advertised on the AMAZON website it led me to believe that it was a DVD as you see it above. (1993 Film) I had to return it and my expense. Very disappointing transaction with AMAZON. Threfore, i am not impressed</review_text>
If you work in a comic book store, live in your mom's basement, own a lot of black candles, and think that H. P. Lovecraft wrote history books, then you might like this garbage. If you have a life, a clue, or a girlfriend, then you probably will not have any use for this stuff. I still can't figure out how record companies get away with classifying this pseudointellectual fluff as metal. It belongs in a category with Sisters of Mercy or Morrisey. This record is completely lacking any imagination or energy: depressing teenagers is like shooting fish in a barrel. I guess if you want to play dungeons and dragons and fester about feeling like an outcast, this would be the thing to listen to. Personally I think it's a huge ripoff when somebody takes five minutes worth of music and stretches it out into an hour. Don't give these jokers your money.</review_text>
Informatively, I have Mason's DVD's, which I quite enjoy.However, this CD, labelled, "BRAND NEW," contains many  repeats andsituations. In fact, at times I was ahead of Jackie Mason, mouthing word for word the joke and situation he was leading up to me.Mason spoke as if he was rushing to meet a deadline, to the extent that much of the CD sounded like gibberish.  For most of this CD I sat stone faced and suspected that perhaps the applause and clapping of hands were canned.Mason, in my opinion, went overboard in his use of obscenities,loudly and in his asides,seemingly contrived for shock value.As for me, I think that this mislabelled, "BRAND NEW," CD was aflop, and I would not care to have it in my collection for fearof the impression I would leave after my demise.So, another item destined for my shredder.Finally, I would recommend the Mason DVD's, which I would have preferred with a slower delivery and less obscenities that addlittle to his performance.Robert LyonsReno, Nevad</review_text>
Once again, the geniuses at Universal have failed to give fans a decent collection! Although the single disc Very Best Of released in 2005 provided a fine and simplistic overview of Robert Palmer's career, it omitted a few "must have" songs in favour of live material (making for a 90% OK collection). Earlier anthologies also suffered invariably from "redo" syndrome: the artist redoing a vocal track here, a drum mix there, re-recording entire songs elsewhere. This collection's no different. In fact, there are many "remixed" and "redone" and "alternate vocal" mixes present (something the Very Best Of album avoided altogether, much to its credit). Here, insult is further added to injury with poor song sequencing. Indeed, the classic and sequenced "Sailing Shoes/Hey Julia/Sneaking Sally Through The Alley" trilogy that marked the beginning of Palmer's breakthrough album is present, but the songs have been scattered apart from one another. Thereby pondering the question: What were they thinking? Why was this done in this manner? What do fans really want? A 2 disc set that features the original material (remastered, yes, but not remixed in any way, shape or form) and a proper chronological sequence. Done in this manner, such a set would properly honour one of popdom's most memorable and talented individuals. What Gold has done showed that compilers went through a rock encyclopedia, took the right batch of songs, but mish-mashed them in a half-cobbled manner. This collection does no one any favours. Stick to Very Best Of until another bright light at Universal tries their hand at compiling a decent collection. That said, the way the music biz is these days, don't count on it.</review_text>
I bought Guerolito after hearing "Heaven Hammer," the remixed version of Guero's "Missing."  That remix, by Air, is the sort of product that makes remixes valid - it takes the passion and yearning lost in the original production of "Missing" and makes it feel at home in a louder, more tempting sonic landscape.  That song became astonishing where the Guero song was simply alright, and the new song, "Clap Hands," is at least a good time.  However, it's hard to swallow the cobbled remixes on the rest of Guerolito - the beat and the original of, say, "Earthquake Weather," (here as "Terromoto Tempo") are both individually appealing enough, but together sound dismayingly like they're from different planets and belong nowhere near each other.  "E-Pro" becomes a groaning mess, the lovely "Farewell Ride" an electronic nightmare, and both those descrptions would be apt to describe the record as a whole</review_text>
I definitely understand why this band is classified as emo. This CD helped me solidify the impression I had that I don't care for emo.The album is not bad and the band is tight enough for a young band, but the issue I have with emo and with this album in particular, is it's not really anything. It's not hardcore, it's not really melodic....it's sort of stuck in the middle of both but not quite reaching either one.Maybe I'm not the target audience for emo or this band....I get that, that's ok. I can't stop thinking Thursday seem like they're trying desperately to sound like Fugazi and never really getting there. And that's the rub of it I guess....with bands like Thursday and She Wants Revenge...they appear to be reaching for the roots of alternative/hardcore or newwave music but for someone who knows what the real thing sounds like, they're a poor imitation. The sound is immature and lacks the urgency and edge that the original bands had at the time.I have a friend with a 14 year old son who asked me to burn him a copy of this CD. I think I'll just be giving it to him and calling it done</review_text>
I loved "Come Away With Me" the first moment I heard it.  I also had the opportunity to see Norah and her wonderful band in concert ... the experience was absolutely FANTASTIC! I couldn't have asked for a better!So naturally I waited in eager anticipation for her new album "Feels Like Home" which after only one listen made me feel narcoleptic.  It was a good thing I didn't try and listen to it while driving.  To be perfectly honest, I haven't listened to it since.She is so talented, I wish this effort had been as successful as the first, but not everyone hits a homerun each time at bat.But I still hold out hope that her next album will be better</review_text>
I was expecting it to have a lot of International type music to it but it virtually sounded the same as the original.  I think I may have mistaken this cd title for another of Shania's.  Her music is great but I don't see a difference with the international version</review_text>
I remember really liking this album when it was first released, even though I could tell it was not in the same league as The Real Thing or Angel Dust. Listening to the album now, I realise it is by far the worst FNM album since Mike Patton joined. The whole album feels very rushed, it has a sparse, raw sound, very different to Angel Dust's polish. The music is generally very simple with many tracks sounding like B-sides and lacks the consistent melodiousness and sense of rhythm of their previous two classic albums.It was a shame to see guitarist Jim Martin depart. He had an unmistakable style and crunching guitar sound and was an integral part of FNM's style and make up. However, being replaced (for a short time anyway) by Trey Spruance is no bad thing - anyone familiar with his work with Mr Bungle will know he is a genius with a guitar and his work here on King For A Day is excellent, it's just a shame that the material he has to work with is largely uninspired.How ironic then that on such a disappointing album, FNM produce one of their greatest ever tracks - the title track is pure genius, full of the care and effort, rhythm and melodiousness FNM were famous for. Beginning with a great bass riff and acoustic strum, it is soon joined by a gentle female voice effect and simple minor piano scale and then brilliantly builds into a tour de force of percussion and guitar work before cleverly returning to the gentle acoustic sounds of the intro where it carefully takes 2 and a half minutes to wind down beautifully - this is FNM as you'd expect them. Another track that deserves special mention is Cuckoo or Caca, a great metal piece with excellent percussion and keyboards and crazy vocals. It's scorching and funy and another reminder of the greatness FNM once held in abundance.It's just a shame that these moments of inspiration are surrounded by so much surprising blandness (Caralho Voador, Take This Bottle, The Last To Know) and 2nd rate metal (Ugly In The Morning, What A day, Get Out). Star A.D. could have been vintage FNM but in the end falls flat, Evidence starts off interestingly enough but soon gets boring and metal tracks like Ricochet, The Gentle Art Of Making enemies and Digging The Grave are simple and sound like what most student bands are writing. However, the album does end on another note of vintage FNM - Just A Man is funny and catchy with Patton having fun doing his Tom Jones impression and the inclusion of a gospel choir at the end is inspired - you find yourself not wanting it to end.Patton's vocals throughout the album are still amazing but should be accompanying much better material and you can't help but feel he was a little bored here - I think his heart always really lay with the far superior Mr Bungle, where he really shone and where his voice was absolutely perfect for the complex and avant garde material.I suppose it's not surprising that King For A Day is a largely empty affair, the departure of Jim Martin and the diminished presence of Roddy Bottum at rehearsals meant that FNM's original chemistry and resources were sadly lacking and so were unable to achieve what they once had been able to. It's really an album for Faith No More fans, it's certainly no classic despite some classic material and I feel it was the beginning of the end for FNM, they would improve with their next album, Album Of The Year - but only marginally.</review_text>
This CD should have been called "The Most Annoyingly Overplayed Songs of the 1990's." With the exception of "Shine," every single track on this CD is juvenile, mindless, fluff that was overplayed on the radio in the radio until you were ready to scream! If you're looking for a CD that represents the greatest music of the 1990's, check out Non Stop 90's Rock or Forever 90's instead.However, you might be interested in this CD if you want to host a cheesy 90's dance party. The songs are kind of fun and catchy if you listen to them in moderation</review_text>
Mercifully, VH-1 hasn't released the nauseating, moron-targeting 'I Love The 90s' DVD series (yet), so you'll have to settle for a similarly appalling companion soundtrack disc.This is precisely the kind of CD which shouldn't even exist anymore given the availability of this material on the internet, legal or illegal.  There's no rhyme or reason to the collection, and the songs you might actually want to remember...you probably already downloaded them.The source show is easily one of the most appalling projects MTV/VH-1 has produced in some time.  It's basically a bunch of 'comedians' and third-tier celebrities talking about the 80s or 90s (or rather, the highlights of what corporate product was released in 1996, say) with such fond memories and gusto, hoping the next generation ingests this poison with the understanding that Mambo No. 5 was a 'good, memorable song' for instance.Avoid at all costs.  Take pleasure in denying Tag Team their royalties when you find their 'classic' song on online...for free</review_text>
This CD shocked me. At first I was listening and enjoying the beats on every track. But then listening to the actual content of each song, B*tch this and h*e that. Come on, as a young female, how am I supposed to bump this in my car? Every single song on the CD is disrespectful. You know what really makes me mad, this is what's supposed to be hot, popular. What kind of message is this sending to our young black men? Our young women? I would not recommend this for any one, especially anyone under the age of 16 or any woman.</review_text>
The remix is totally devoid of any taste:First the vocals are completely-off;the mix levels of vocals is far lower than the new musical dressings. Secondly,there is absolutely no respect on part of the "mixing DJs" for the great vocalists:there  is no melody and absolutely no 'jelling-together' of the music with the vocals. I was deeply disappointed with this cd.If you are into remixes get The Rod Stewart "Do ya think i am sexy" single cd instead</review_text>
I was very disappointed with this volume. The past 2 volumes had great retro/loungy mixes and this new one is too repetitive and clubby. I was excited to see the Postal Service doing a mix, however it sounded just like any of their other songs. This CD sucks.</review_text>
My two parakeets seem to enjoy this CD a bit, but if you want a CD for relaxing listening, be prepared to be irritated.  I tried to go to sleep listening to it one night.  I had to turn it off because it just got on my nerves.....I kept thinking it was stuck....like a record stuck in a grrove.  It sometimes seems they recorded it by just hitting the &quot;repeat&quot; button on a couple of bird sounds.  I think I could have done that.  I'm just glad it didn't cost a lot, but now I can see why.  Sorry for such a bad review, but I just had to tell anyone planning on buying it.  I now just play it for my birds when I am NOT in the room</review_text>
Anna Netrebko's I Puritani selections are way below the art and skill of Callas, Sills, Sutherland, Caballe, and Gencer. She has no passion, no trills, no high notes that are deep and rich. Her best is in the Russian repertoire and possibley some undemanding Mozart.Her broadcast from the Met Live of the I Puritani was alright, but scooping, avoidance of repetitions, running through passages like a locomotive, and an ending that would have brought the wrath of most opera houses in the world..scooping again, and a tight awful sounding high note. The same tentativenes is also here on this CD.She should know this. Her beauty and acting and allure are what interest the masses, not the voice, which is forgiven everything.Too bad; she could be a lovely Tatyana some day.Also too, the Traviata is not that great; Anna Moffo , Renee Fleming, M. Caballe, and of course Maria Callas..Listen to these and hear the difference</review_text>
Well seeing all the reviews on here and being a former fan of sugar ray along with being bored to death at work I've decided to write my own review.  I believe sugar ray had something special with the first two albums as well but as time went by they have gradually gone from ultra-hip, I just wanna drink beer and cause trouble types, to oh so sappy songs about love and how heart break sucks, nothing that hasn't been told a thousand times over. When I first hearsd Sugar Ray back in 97 I thought their sound was revolutionary, I bought Floored and liked all the tracks and soon found myself buying the first album, then the third, fourth, and fifth albums came out, the third one was alright i bought it for the songs that weren't radio friendly such as Glory, Personal Space Invader, and Burning Dog; And with the release of their fourth album I bought it as well, hoping that they would get back on formula; Yes as you might of guessed i was delusional; their music had seemed to had gotten worse as predicted.....Now with the release of their fifth album, they had already lost me as a fan so therefore, I give all three of the most recent albums of theirs a 1/5 stars for lack of originality</review_text>
Some of the songs here are good, most notably "Never Be Forgotten".....beautiful.  I heard this song on the radio and I thought it was Faith Hill or Martina McBride singing.  Herein lies the problem.  The song is good, the voice is good.  But if she sounds like Faith or Martina, there's no distinction to set her off from the rest of the pack out there.  Add to this that this is mostly bubble-gum pop and not country....there's really nothing that stands out here.  Why are recording companies giving contracts to people who sound like everybody else out there?  That's the question.</review_text>
I can't believe the touch of B.B. King. I enjoy his playing immensely. I know this album gets buried in accolades. But I don't like it. The quality is poor and, differing from other's opinions, the crowd noise takes away from the music. B.B. said, in so many words, that Live at the Regal was far from his choice as his best recording. Typically, he said he wouldn't argue with success--and left it at that. There are so many good albums by B.B. You can't go wrong for $4.65 for the "Ultimate Collection". Sure it doesn't have them all--but it has quite a few of his great songs, including a few from Live at the Regal. I would steer clear of this selection. Or I'll send you mine for free</review_text>
If the name Pink Floyd wasn't on this cd, who would really rate it higher that one or two stars ?  I am a Pink Floyd fan, but I have to say that I don't like any of their early works.  To me, the band begins to make great stuff with "Meddle" and their first cd were boring, even with the Pink Floyd name on it. The only good track is "Childhood's end", the other tracks are poor</review_text>
Eight years ago today was the day Blondie's reunion album was released, and though it was great to see Blondie back together, No Exit just fell short on many levels. 2004's The Curse of Blondie(see my review also on Amazon)is a much better album and should have been their comeback. No Exit won't exactly take you back to the hooks that made Blondie famous. Harry's lyrics are wonderful in "Double Take," but the deadpan melody literally kills the song. Fans were also not terribly waiting for jazz standards("Boom Boom in the Zoom Zoom Room") or revamped demo tracks("Out in the Streets"), but the worst cut is the title song that includes a rap verse by Coolio. Both the band and Coolio could have thought of something more productive to sing about. The music isn't catchy either. All is not lost with songs like "Night Wind Sent," and Harry's own transformation in "Forgive and Forget, plus who would dare argue Blondie's potential to shake the pop world again when you hear "Maria." As the album's best track, "Maria" is a wonderful reminder of how Blondie, and Debbie, can still create an infectious pop song that leaves a template on the mind</review_text>
Mindless jock rock masterminded by a dope fiend. This kind of crap couldn't even sell a can of Coke these days. Choreographed crunches of noise as lame as a crackhead on crutches. I hear Scott weiland kept a billy goat in his trailer during the making of this snoozer -- and that when recording was all done the goat was nowhere to be found, but Scotty was sporting a fresh new goatie</review_text>
...Sorry, guys, I think that the cover says it all. Totally out of focus and falling apart. I much prefer his later work</review_text>
you know i thought this would be a great cd but no it is a total piece of dreck exceptfor ken nordine he is a god in spoken word, i wished i would have bought two coppiesone to poop on and one to cover it up.</review_text>
I saw the movie and liked the songs in it.  I ordered the soundtrack from the movie, but it was not the soundtrack.  They have a dubbed another person in on Ike's part.  All the songs from the movie were not on the soundtrack and some other of Tina's were included.  I feel that if it is going to be advertised as a soundtrack then it should be a true soundtrack.  I was disappointed.</review_text>
There is not much I can add to these reviews here. Just like me, a lot of people here were dissapointed because of the fact that so many classic 2Pac songs were remixed only to sound like disasters. Why would such an abomination happen? Suge Knight is trying to milk the Pac legacy until it is bone dry. Well at least he has done something right if you ask me. It sucks that this is how we are forced to remember Tupac Shakur, over tracks chopped up into this. Die hard Pac fans won't even like this, if they haven't heard it already. I'm so waiting for a remix album of "The Chronic" and "Doggystyle".If Suge Knight was smart you would reissue Tha Dogg Pound's "Dogg Food" on dual disc, because that is the only reason why I don't have that album yet.</review_text>
Yo Nu-Mixx sux i hate when people make cd's like this to make some money off of great artist like Pac. This cd is disrespecting Pac and nobody should get this if your a Pac fan. They take great songs and make crappy beats. Get this if you want to support Pac haters or waste your money</review_text>
Here's my theory in regards to how one should rate a remix album: If a song is remixed, then that remix should be better than the original song. Otherwise, what's the point?With that being said, Nu-Mixx Klazzics is pretty much pointless. This is nothing more than a cash in album. The people at Death Row/Koch know that folks will continue to buy Pac's music as long as you can manage to put a new spin on it (especially the die hards...they'll buy anything associated with the man). Well, the spin they put on this particular album is just plain terrible.If you have the source material, stick with that. These "remixes" don't make the originals better, they actually make them worse. The beats sound like throw away beats from an old JT Tha Bigga Figga album and some of the lyrics have been altered/changed so that they sound updated (removing Snoop from "2 of Amerikka's Most..." and distorting Pac's vocals when he says his name is just terrible), but these changes are only for the worst. In short, all aspects of this album are sorry. The guests are wack and the beats are generic, hollow, "clubby" beats. Remember y'all, when these albums were dropped back in '96 the beats had more meat to them.There is one decent track though. "Life Goes On" gets a different look and I'm not so sure that it's all that bad. I find it tolerable, but I could see why why someone wouldn't like it. But this is coming from someone that wasn't all that crazy about the original because I wasn't feeling the beat. If you enjoyed the original, then stick with that. Also, I like that the original version of "Hit 'Em Up" was used here. In this version, 'Pac can be heard giving props to east coast emcees that he was cool with (thus proving that he wasn't anti - east coast, just anti - Bad Boy).Whoever gave the green light to have this released should be fired. It's a shame that folks are pimping Tupac's music like this. But they'll continue to do it as long as folks continue to buy it. I'm drawing the line here. Shame on you, Suge. Your label isn't relevant anymore, get over it and move on.Standout Tracks: Don't even waste your time looking for an</review_text>
I didn't really feel like some of the songs were really love songs.  A lot of these songs I had not even heard before.</review_text>
While well produced, I was disappointed in the album - mostly because the majority of the tracks were re-recordings.  Frankie Laine still sounds great - but it just wasn't the same.I bought the CD to replace a well worn vinyl album, but on listening to the CD I found the songs to all be slightly (and in a couple of cases very), different in tempo and vocal inflection - it's definitely not the album I've loved for over 30 years!  High Noon in particular is quite different, much slower, with vocal emphasis changed.  I'll probably listen to the CD from time to time, but not with the same relish that I enjoyed my old LP</review_text>
If you want the original recordings, don't purchase any volume of Television's Greatest Hits.  I've had better luck recording the songs off of my TV with a cassette tape recorder and then dehissing them on my PC.  These collections have sterile sounding fake stereo recordings of "The Beverly Hillbillies" and "The Munsters" that just don't sound right to me.  If the original recordings don't matter to you, then you may like this CD</review_text>
I wrote a review but I guess it was so bad for Ultramagnetic, Amazon booted it. The album is trash. Nothing at all like the 3 studio albums made over a decade ago. But don't take my word for it, sample for yourself.Ahead of their time? Faith no more. What can I say about this album without my review getting kicked off Amazon again? I've used no profanity or content of explicit nature but this album highly does. 1988's CRITICAL BEATDOWN never, ever gave that kind of deliverance. That's why that's a classic and THE BEST KEPT SECRET is not, by any means (vocally, production, lyrically, concept). Can I get a witness? Please?DJ MOE LUV is the only producer on the album trying to keep that old Ultramagnetic sound alive here on "Vibrato" and "Mechanism Nice (Born Twice)" the album's 1st single. CED-GEE kills the album verbally and lyrically bragging of 16 bars in almsot every track and being very explicit and obscene (never heard that on CRITICAL BEATDOWN by CED). KOOL KEITH does fine on solo track "Late Nite Rumble" but KOOL KEITH is goin' nowhere with his lyricism and on most of the other songs, HIS delivery is sounding just like CED's towards the end of the album. T.R. LOVE? M.I.A. You see him in photos, you hear silence from him, he doesn't even produce a track. Production by CED, MOE and 2 others and the other 2 sound like KUTMASTA KURT producing (producer for most of KOOL KEITH solo stuff). I do not mean that in a good way. The beats of "Nottz" is bangin', the lyrics by both KEITH and CED should raise eyebrows on what's next to come for THE BEST KEPT SECRET being the B-side to the 1st single "Mechanism Nice (Born Twice)".Songs like "Ain't It Good 2 U" (2007) and "Party Started" are for gentleman's clubs for the girls to dance to. Now do you see what direction this album is goin'? If you're lookin' for Ultramagnetic to comback with a reunion album with the same spacey super dope production and/or the masterful, brainiac, monkey wrench lyricism as CRITICAL BEATDOWN; FUNK YOUR HEAD UP and THE FOUR HORSEMEN albums gave you over a decade ago, you will not find it here. Maybe in the next 14 years. Right Ultramag</review_text>
I had reviewed the first edition of B'Day and I personally called it "Business day" because Beyonc could not offer what we could expect from her especially after the highly acclaimed Dangerously in Love. Actually, in my opinion if Ne-Yo had not inserted irreplaceable" in this project, it could have been a bust. I agree Dj-Vu and Beautiful liar were hits but I give the credit to the casting rather than the script. Had these songs been given to India Arie, God knows what was gonna happen! How can she accept to put out such a poor album? Some said Beyonc views releasing albums in quick succession as a means of ejecting herself from her contractual obligations to Sony Columbia and team up with Jay-Z to form a new record label... but this cannot justify such an inconsistent and poor album.Ne-Yo confessed that the R&B genre is suffering from serious malaise. "People just forgot what it was supposed to be, what it was supposed to feel like, the essence of what it is," he says forcefully. "It's a vibe, it's a feeling -- it's supposed to make you feel something, as opposed to, `Let me go eeh-eeh-eeh-eeh-eeh and put a beat behind it and see if people will dance to it.' Come on man. There's more to it than that..." Ring the alarm from B'Day falls in the same category.I read a reviewer who proclaimed B'Day to be the best he's ever had and this is like saying George Bush is the best president America has ever had... Does this person know The Beatles, Stevie Wonder or Aretha Franklin? I suggest him to go back to the stores and get one of their albums and he will then be able to differentiate between music and marketing. I suggest the same reviewer to get albums called what's going on' (Marvin Gaye), Purple Rain (Prince), The Day (Babyface), or even the recent Let's get lifted (John Legend).It is very sad to see artists (especially hip-hop) concentrating on making hits, shooting sexy videos with the major target being going platinum and most of the time I find it better to buy the single and not the entire album since they all are full of fillers. What follows is that after a few months we completely trash their records.Africa is the world's second-largest and second most-populous continent with 900 million people. Maybe if the same guys had a purchasing power which exceeds Latino market, Beyonc would be realising another edition in Swahili which is the most widely spoken language in Africa and she would be arguing she's had a great love for African culture ever since she was a child pretending she's coming back to the roots. Anyway, let's not be fooled by these music industry games, their aim is to make money and this entails ignoring the basic artistic aspects. I agree bootylicious Beyonce is the hottest lady in the music scene at the moment and none has denied her natural talent as a singer but she needs to refine her albums and give us s.th that can reach our soul.There are some female artists who are making good music without injecting too much cash in marketing to force sales: Corrine Bailey Rae and Heather Headley</review_text>
I like the music, but the sound quality is terrible.  I bought this CD because it was released in 2003, but there is ZERO improvement in sound quality from previous older tracks</review_text>
The lady can sing, but her "Christian" message is compromised because of her part in "Chasing Papi", where she played a woman who - had she had the chance - would have hopped into bed with her on-screen boyfriend prior to marriage.  It's "Crystal Clear" to me that Jaci broke my heart in a million pieces when she played that part.  It's really tragic to see such a beautiful young lady with such a opowerful voice and message now reduced to nothing more than a hypocritical wannabee, much in the same way that Stacie Orrico is now becoming.....and is it just me, or is it coincidence that these two womens' album covers look strikingly similar?  It appears their paths in life are similar, too: compromising a message and a stand that once set them worlds apart.  As with a recent review of Orrico that I made, I'll give Jaci Velasquez her due:  she can sing, and what I mean by that is sing the roof off of a house!  This album was excellent.....was.  Now, whenever I think or hear of Jaci Velasquez, I can only think one word:  HYPOCRITE</review_text>
what a shame.  c.a. was such a talented and beautiful young woman but apparently got some horrible career advice.  maybe she wanted to be this way, but most likely, it was a manager, or record company trying to create a even more slutty successor to britney spears.  more is not always better, and in this case, it is definitely worse.  hopefully, she banked her $$, cuz i can't imagine that she'll ever recover from this debacle.  that would be as likely as a porn star trying to make it in hollywood.  very sad</review_text>
I picked this up because a) it's Boz Scaggs, a guy whose records I wore out when they first hit, and b) it's full of great old songs.  BUT:  Boz sounds like he's doing something else, maybe surfing the internet or looking out the window, when he sings.  Hard to imagine that the man who punched out "Lido" can sound so half-asleep performing great material.  A washed-out, almost depressing performance.  There are many much better renditions of these classic songs.  I imagine it's hard to come up with new material, but please, if you're going to do these songs at least sing as if you're awake.  No emotion, no involvement.  And to add annoyance to injury, Boz somehow found the world's worst drummer for this session.  If you can tap your fork on a tabletop you can play the cymbals and traps as well as him, incessantly dopey and grindingly repetitive.  Pass on this one</review_text>
Except for the song, Mother Mother, I didn't really care for the rest of the cd.  I bought it for Mother, Mother so I guess I got what I wanted.  I had hoped to like other songs as well, but, oh well</review_text>
It's a decent album but she seems to copy riffs a bit on this album. Mother Mother definitly rips of Stairway To Heaven from Stairway's ending vocals riff. (and as we wind on down the road..) Does she give Zep credit on that? Now that Rockstar Supernova has used the song twice it has brought Mother, Mother back to life a bit but that riff rip just annoys me. Good female yell and complain song but I just can't get past that riff rip</review_text>
I bought this CD not long after it came out.  It didn't last long in my collection because it only has a few good songs on it!!!  I like Somehow Our Love Survives and Abandoned Garden.  Other than that this is a mediocre effort for Michael. He has used this kind of Brazilian theme on Sleeping Gypsy already. Stick with your roots Michael...you are from California...not South America. Try buying Blue Pacific instead!!! I abandoned this one a long time ago</review_text>
I can't, for the life of me, understand the appeal, or better, the necessity for the Black Crowes. To call all the riffs recycled is to give them credit for originality they don't possess...There's nothing here that hasn't been done better, with more creativity and feeling, and of course, originality, by the Stones, Faces, et al...And it's not a valid counter-argument that the Stones stole  from the great blues masters, because, of course, they did...but what they also did is add some value, something of their own, that was completely fresh...What these guys have done is the aural equivalent of sewing a new name tag on..</review_text>
I was deeply disappointed by the so-called &quot;return of the funk&quot; with the Headhunters reuniting with their original lineup. As compared to Herbie Hancock's original &quot;Headhunters&quot; release, the Return of  the Headhunters is missing one main ingredient, the grease. This recent  release has traded the &quot;grits and gravy&quot; created by the sounds of  overdriven analog equipment and early model synthesizers, for over-produced  smooth jazz-funk, complete with overused N'Dea Davenport R&amp;B hooks that  left this album flat</review_text>
This CD was supposed to expose a new side of Dar Willams, it has failed to do this. The lyrics, and songs are repetitive of previous works. I would suggest buying something else</review_text>
Bobby Bare is a great singer, one of the most underrated country singers ever.   However, most of the songs on this cd pale in comparison to his earlier work like &quot;Detroit City&quot; and &quot;Millers Cave&quot;</review_text>
I found the vocal delivery on this CD too distracting to allow me to relax. The frequent hesitations and awkward phrases prevent any sense of flow. The narrator's soft, lilting voice is not by itself hard on the ears, but too often it sounds like she is improvising and reaching for words.</review_text>
usually jerry's scores for movies are priceless,(i.e. the other score for &quot;legend&quot;)but rudy is a little bit too unoriginal and the feelings meant to be expressed seem much too&quot;forced&quot; for my taste.it's ok as a weird sort of comedy album,I suppose,but from the  main theme I was laughing because it's meant to be such a serious experience-but isn't!I think that only the biggest goldsmith efficianado could find joy in this cd.(.</review_text>
this cd is pretty awful,you wonder why leona even got the chance to record a cd, one of the worst songs ever is Calling,, it sounds like taunting from elementary school kids on the playground, na na na na , na na na na, i agree with the reviewer who said she is a very weak edie brickell sounding singer........</review_text>
Fight Club is without a doubt the greatest film I've ever seen. Yeah, I'm a fanboy. And what? And to make a great film flow, you need great music, right? Well, you need great music that fits the film, and the Dust Brother's score more than does the trick. The film is dark yet satirical, and it needed a score that would compliment that.However, the score simply doesn't stand up on its own. At times in the film it perfectly enhances the dark atmosphere, but its only a part of a tense scene. And hence, it sounds rather empty by itself.No matter how much you like the film or thought the music sounded good in it (as I did), I wouldn't recommend it. Like so many other scores, it could have been made into great music but fails since its just lifted from the film</review_text>
Phaeton's son flewOn wings of wax into sunCrashed and burned instea</review_text>
All in all, I was really dissapointed; I really enjoyed the King Geedorah album.  I thought the King Geedorah album boasted  stellar, thematic, production, tolerable skits, and street-wise but deep lyrical content.Doom is on the boards for about 1/3 of the tracks on 'Escape...'  All have the stereotypical Doom sound, with the only standout being '1,2...1,2.'  The X-ray produced tracks are minimal, but generally sound stiff, lacking much of a groove - thin synth lines, few sampled melodies.  I did like 'Warning (Kong),' which has a nice, minimal, dark groove.The lyrical flows have a classic New York sound, pretty good.  Lyrical content is pretty bad, unless you enjoy repetitious rhymes about smoking weed and women riding my d$&*.</review_text>
...AND IM HAPPY ABOUT IT!i think i might cry if'n it shows up again. fareals.if albums where 3 dimensional this wouldn e'en make the c-side!i love me some roy, but bruh hurt me with this one.i forgive him tho, cause he done gave me much much pleasure up til now... ...um, hope that came out right.*pimp struts off stage/pounds chest with gorilla fist/machismo free flowing*m'out yall, peace!</review_text>
I did not get my order. you were suppoused to send my money back. i am waiting.thank</review_text>
I purchased this CD shortly after finding out that Nickel Creek would be disolving their union as a band.  I hoped that this collection would be suitable for both myself (as a strong supporter of Nickel Creek) and my two children.  This CD honestly fails to deliver a suitable substitution for the music that Nickel Creek produced over the past 7 years.  Although, I guess that was an unrealistic expectation to have for this CD.  You have to keep in mind that the members of Nickel Creek were just children themselves when they released this CD.  I don't believe that they had found their true musical identity, and they obviously wouldn't have reached their full musical potential yet.  This CD isn't really the best for a todler either, so I have to say that this purchase was a let down overall</review_text>
I'm going to the trouble of writing this review to warn you: this cd is not like the other Putumayo cds. No, it is not fun, hip, relaxing, good to dance to, or stimulating. It is a selection of hackneyed Sinatra-style slop sung by a variety of leery-sounding men with fake deep voices. I have this rule for music: if it makes me think of animated dogs kissing over pasta, it sucks. Consider yourself warned. If you like good music, try French Cafe instead</review_text>
This is probably the worst CD I have ever bought. It had won some award and just bought it without listening to it, hopping that it would be OK. I listened to it and threw the CD in the trashbin. Waist of money or just not  my kind of music</review_text>
I had the privilege of attending recitals of many of the 50's and 60's Jazz Legends - before they became household names.  It was truly an honor and a blessing to be part of an era that will never come around again.  I heard brief notes from this CD and I must agree that Mr. Winston did attempt to captureMr. Guaraldi's timeless expressions, but the this production did not have the same "golden flow" as the original.</review_text>
Looking at the liner photos makes clear that Falkner is the prettiest thing this side of N Sync (and doesn't he know it, especially in the shot of him being served what appears to be a large dose of Johnnie Walker Black by a leggy Bunny Flight Attendant).  Which raises the question: is this the recond a boy band member would turn out if he got the idea he was an ARTIST?  Not to put too fine an edge on it, let's say bluntly that this is a vanity project by a middling talent.  Falkner does everything on the CD and my reaction is so what?  His voice is mediocre; his lyrics are banal (&quot;Life can be just like a painting full of wonderful strangeness&quot;) or precious (&quot;Suspended on this stage of grace I have to remember this sound&quot;); the layers of sound he tracks down are just that -- layers of sound, with a disspiriting sameness song after song.  Give him two stars simply because he CAN do all the stuff on the record, but this guy needs to become a whole lot less full of himself and to spend a year or two listening to, say, Chrissie Hynde and John Hiatt CDs.  We'll let him come back then and try to write and play some adult love songs</review_text>
Look, I dig stand up, and I dig fat jokes, but this guy isn't that great.I got a friend who loves John Pinette, but I can't see it.He tells jokes about how fat he is, how he likes to eat, how he doesn't like to move.  Its the same over and over and over again.  Its dull and it's too easy.  They're not even jokes, really, just comments on how fat he is.Also a fair part of his act consists of "asian people talk with accents and thats funny" which I find cheap.  Stereotypes shouldn't be jokes, and even when they are, they shouldn't be THE joke.  John says something with broken english and the audience laughs really hard.  Why?  Why is that funny, here in the 20th century?Maybe I just don't "get" his humor, but I don't think this guy is any good.  I perfer comedians who tell jokes.On the plus side, this guy is clean, which is rare these days.  But there are better clean comedians around.   Try getting a Brian Regan album or an Emo Philips album.  Jerry Seinfelds album is good too.  Try those guys because they're clean and legitimately funny</review_text>
I have all her other cds I especially love Unsung Heroes there is a vibe to that cd that gets u right in but with this one its like shes just tryin far toooo hard to be good....Sure the technique is spot on but THERE IS NO SOUL the emotion is missing...for me I like my jazz vocals with feeling. I like the singer to take u on a journey deep into to the song. u wont get that here all u will get is technique..</review_text>
I have both Volume I & II so couldn't resist buying Volume III.  The music was good, can't complain about good pickin' like that but I did notice that the original intent of the album is being re-thought it appears and it takes away from the entire concept for me.Will The Circle Be Unbroken II was originally made to showcase the talents of the decendents and family of the original players/singers on Vol I.  It was keeping the "circle" alive by bringing in fresh new sounds from new generations of musicians of those who played on volume I.TOM PETTY??  Where does that come in to play?  How does he fit in the circle?  I was amazed that "this ones son" and "that ones son" were invited to play on this album, but the Huskey's (whom I loved for their bass playing) were totally ignored this go 'round.Junior Huskey played Vol. I, Roy Huskey Jr. (Junior's son) played Vol. II.  Why wasn't Roy's son John invited to play on Vol III?  Isn't that the purpose of this album? To keep the circle alive?  Roy Huskey Jr has 2 sons, one of which is a musician (not sure about the other one).  Where was he?  Given the tradition of the albums, I don't see how Tom Petty could possibly be invited over a 3rd generation family musician.  I was very disappointed to find the Huskey's not on this album.  They were the backbone of the first two.Not just the Huskey's, but there are other noticeable's left out of this album as well.  It's just a shame that such a great concept has gone down the tubes.It seems to me, that in favor of the elite, the circle has most definitely been broken which really takes away from what the album was intended for</review_text>
The fact that this has had no US release was an immediate warning .... however as a longtime fan I figured I would check it out.  Boy is this bad.  There are a few decent tracks, however the truly awful "Crazy Little Thing Called Love", "This Magic Moment", "Only You" - among many others - make this unlistenable.  Miss Ross is a great singer and interpeter - check out the delicacy she approached the Billie Holliday material.  She is a producer's singer: Ashford and Simpson, CHIC, Holland Dozier Holland - even Hall & Oates - all were able to take her talent and create - in some cases - true all time classics.  This is a mess.  Diana, your voice still sounds great - STOP executive producing your projects</review_text>
the track selection is fine and okay, but the track order is bad. No FLOW! proving that he just took popular tracks that other big djs are spinning and sold an album without a smile. the mixing is terrible and abrupt, its basically not mixing. no art there.</review_text>
Like the Backstreet Boys (essentially the same band), and Brittany Spears (their female solo artist - and I use the term loosely- equivalent), NSYNC represented all that went wrong with the music world in the '90's. Sure, there have been completely commercial bands out there for ages, but at least groups like The Eagles wrote their own material and played their own instruments. Not NSYNC, who instead rely on unimaginably boring backing tracks and a stable of professional songwriters who couldn't write a decent tune to save their lives - I bet even their voices were digitally altered.And then there were the inescapable hits - Bye Bye Bye, Pop, It's Gonna Be Me, Tearin' Up My Heart, et al., that weren't even good the FIRST time around, to say nothing of the nine trillionth. No risks taken. No attempts to step out of their winning formula that somehow made this group of no-talents famous. Basically, this band was thrown together by a bunch of record company chumps who saw five or six guys who wanted to be famous (and probably had never previously met), sent them through the assembly line, removed any sense of individuallity or creativity they might've had, and dumped them upon the masses, who they must've brainwashed or something. I didn't even like this group when I was 10, to say nothing of now. Makes you wish Zappa was still alive - he'd have a field day with a group like this, and undoubtedly dish out some of the funniest insults ever in the process.</review_text>
Best of Dark Horse is another half-hearted attempt to gather George Harrison's greatest songs together. This time we only get tracks from 1976 to 1989.While there are some good songs (Blow Away, Crackerbox Palace, Cheer Down, etc.) the rest don't represent his best songs from this period. Where's Faster, This Is Love, Someplace Else, etc?The only reasons to purchase this CD are for the rarities Poor Little Girl, Cockamamie Business and Cheer Down.Until they make a true Best Of, we'll have to make our own single-disc compilation. Here are the tracks needed: Apple Scruffs, My Sweet Lord, All Things Must Pass, What Is Life, Give Me Love (Give Me Peace On Earth), Living In The Material World, Crackerbox Palace, Blow Away, All Those Years Ago, Dream Away, Cloud 9, This Is Love, Someplace Else, Got My Mind Set On You, End Of The Line, Handle With Care, Cheer Down, Devil's Been Busy, Any Road, Rising Sun.[DW]</review_text>
Chicane should just stop releasing material under that guise ever again. FFTMC and BTS were lush and beautiful productions. NIcks latest attempts have been pathetic...from a musical standpoint and from a professional production standpoint...even his older 'pop' remixes for other artists were better than this rubbish he's doing these days...no, we're not saying recycle the older productions, but instead it's a matter of putting the effort and 'originality' in the profuctions...a signature if you will...and hey, it doesn't have to pigeon hole you if done with class...yes, how the mighty have fallen...oh brother..</review_text>
No one questions Lyrics Born's talent, which can be matched by few. His breakneck delivery will make you swear they sped him up in the studio, except then if you go see him do it live (recommended: he is a charismatic performer) you realize they didn't.The problem with this release is not, therefore, Lyrics Born himself. It's just that there's not enough interesting things happening around him. There are handful of standout songs on this record, but there is no excuse for it running as many tracks as it does. The skits remind me why I sometimes think the whole idea of skits on CDs tired itself out in about 1997, if not earlier. Worse, the fillers sound similar to the hits but less memorable, making the whole album kind of drag, and the grooves, guitar licks and keys, all of which are good in small doses, become sort of flat after a time, especially when Joyo Velarde isn't singing backup vox. Surely a few of the songs could have become B-sides on the single, or something, instead of bloating the album itself.Do That There, Rise and Shine, and One Session are my favorite tracks, the ones I would say go buy from the iTunes store or something right now. There's nothing wrong with the rest, I just don't find myself listening to them much. I like the concept of Later That Day but it should probably take less time out of the day to listen to</review_text>
While filled with talented performers, this cd sucks.Rocky is a campy, 1970's B-Movie, that's what makes it enjoyable. Even as a stage show it's a hokey, rock-and-roll extravaganza.This cd tries to turn Rocky into Thoroughly Modern Millie, and it just doesn't work. The corny sci-fi sound and less than amazing vocals are just what make Rocky..Rocky. This cast has so much less enthusiasm and energy than the original Roxy cast.And lastly, Tim Curry is Frank. His rendition is too ingrained in my head for me to accept the twangy annoyance that is the Frank on this album. Ripley is a little too legit for Janet, and the female Eddie weirds me out.Buy the Roxy cast. It's so superior it's almost laughable.</review_text>
This product is listed as "Limited Edition Special Packaging" at a cost of $30.99.  It's nothing but an ordinary CD in a plastic jewel case with a "Made In Hong Kong" sticker on the back.  It's the import version.  There's nothing "special" about the packaging.  Save your money and get the domestic version for $14.The album itself is awesome by the way.  Nick Cave continues to make fantastic albums.  Even though I feel ripped-off by Amazon's inaccurate advertising I must say this album is totally worth having.  This is raw and noisy.  It's removed from the introspective albums that Nick Cave has produced with the Bad Seeds recently but is better conceived than any Birthday Party record ever was.  It's not The Bad Seeds. It's not The Birthday Party.  It's GRINDERMAN!To be fair, I asked Amazon to refund the price difference between this misleading product and the domestic version, the difference being about $17..  They agreed and I got my refund in no time.  Thanks Amazon, great customer service</review_text>
It is ludicrous to even mention the fact that The Duprees have lasted so  long and can still be seen in Atlantic City considering the fact that there  is not one original member of the Duprees in the group that is seen in  Atlantic City. This is a major problem with many groups purporting to be  from the 50's and 60's. The Duprees appearing today is a perfect example of  caveat emptor ... buyer beware for those readers who don't read Latin! For  those of us who were Duprees fans, this is a not to be missed CD of the  original Duprees with the incomparable sound of Joey Vann and harmony that  is hard to match. They did Joni James proud in their remake of a number of  her hits. It is nostalgia personified hearing the original Duprees</review_text>
Diana Krall's popularity is not hard to understand, she's easy on the eyes and possesses a fine voice - rich, round, and polished.  But that's where the good news ends.  The selection of material and the narcoleptic Bossa-Nova-on-the-rocks arrangements combine to create a CD that is nothing less than a love song to Darvon, in fact, inside industry sources maintain that the entire CD was recorded in the frozen food section of a supermarket late at night in order to eliminate the middle man.The rule with standards is, don't do them unless you can bring something fresh to the fair.  Ms. Krall beats these exhausted warhorses mercilessly; cruel and unusual punishment considering it's a wonder they're still standing.  The resuscitation of Popsicle Toes is both the final insult and injury, for blissful years this sliver of saccharine twaddle resided in richly deserved obscurity; how could she do this to us?  Wherever there are hotel lobbies occupied by mildly inebriated people who aren't listening to each other, much less the ambient audio wallpaper, there will be a demand for music of this type.  The Diana Kralls of the world can always find work because for many - smooth equals good.  Walk, don't Krall.  Beyond this woozy, soft-focused world there is music that is real, and really matters.</review_text>
Agreed, the fan IS there, but I must admit they are actually singing well in the actual Solesmes style (based on these samples).  I have heard superb chant and frighteningly bad chant.  This is not as bad as it gets I assure you.  Try to find something from a Seminary or Monastery</review_text>
I would love to own this soundtrack but why anyone would pay 120 bucks is just plain dumb.  Quite frankly I would like to see your copyright on this item to see if you are just Reburning these CD's and reselling them.  For 120 bucks you should be reported to the authorite</review_text>
I was prepared to spend the original $26.05 list price for this motion picture soundtrack. At that price it was already the most expensive out of 12 CDs ordered. I was refunded the money to "The Last Starfighter" due to an error listing. When I went to re-order, the new price is $49.95. What a joke! Someone is pocketing an incredibly high profit margin. I would love to have focussed my comments on the actual composition, but until it is sold at a fair price, I will reserve my rating</review_text>
Ok, at long last Public Enemy has finally let me down by allowing a bunch of sub-par average, non-innovative, non-avent guard, DJ's mix there stuff up. Even DJ Spookie's mix was not that grand. Everything sounds like beats that I discovered in the early 90's.On the other hand, this album is only a couple bucks used, so I would HIGHLY HIGHLY HIGHLY suggest buying it if only for 54321 BOOM which is perhaps one of the best PE tracks ever to come out! Not only are the beats right on, but the lyrics are some of the hardest I've heard yet!And for the note, my review has nothing to do with me not being flexable to change of sound. Infact I LOVE the new PE (Whirl Odor) even though it has club friendly sounds, mainly for the fact that they are not your mere average club beats (they are very multi-layered) and of course the lyrics once again only get harder and harder and harder, and more direct and to the point as we aproach the last times of this world(lyness)</review_text>
When merging female vocal yodels and copying elements from Switchblade Syphony, one can only be disappointed in Diva Destruction's music.  The positive aspect is the better production on this CD compared to their debut</review_text>
This cd should not have been released because it adds really nothing to this Jarrett quartet's other three releases.  It's like taking a fat paint brush full of cheap house paint and making a greasy mess of what WAS a very beautiful triptych.  "Belonging," "My Song," and "Nude Ants" are all virtuoso, spiritually empowered performances and should by all means be purchased and enjoyed.  But, I'd go nada on this one if I were you.I was sitting with my 88-year-old mother listening to the last track and complaining about how lame it was and she said it was "hum-drum."  And she's 88, likes Lawrence Welk and it was past her bedtime.  (It's past "Late Night Willie's" bedtime too, I hate to tell you.) Heck, I've heard high school jazz bands cook twice as hot as this "Keith and the Somnambulists" incarnation.  Garbarek sounds like he's going to give himself a hernia trying to get out the altissimos.  I can't think of one interesting drum riff in the whole 61 minutes plus.  (Neither can Christensen.)  Les Scandinavianes sound like they need about 10 hours sleep and then, maybe, they start thinking about picking up musical instruments.  Jarrett is as wired as ever, but even he can't keep up with some of the tempos and the overall mood is disoriented, forced and cumbersome.  How any reviewer can say that this release captures the quartet's tight integration, displayed amazingly well elsewhere, is beyond me.With the exception of "Innocence," none of the compositions are very good, either.  "Oasis" has an interesting, if dire, melody line, but it can't summon the required ambience because of all of the clutter and dog poop around it.Unlike the other three releases mentioned above, this one has very little magnetism - the first track is all rambling rose jazz, where none of the musicians are feeding off each other.  I don't enjoy this kind of jazz, so cliched and unintegrated.  It contains that Jarrettian need to rush things and gang jump the tempo with heavy-handed neurosis peddled as jazz fusion. You feel like some nut in a BMW is suddenly sitting 10 inches off your bumper, too demented to use the passing lane. (Yes, I know Keith has mastered his scales and likes to crack knuckles with tempos and, yes, I now have a headache.)  There is an interesting part at the end, however, where Garbarek cuts way back on the throttle and swaggers around in the lower and upper registers of his tenor sax in some nice ways.  But the transition is contrived at best and bears no organic relation to the first part.Only "Innocence" benefits from the fact that these guys are probably taking a red eye flight to New York soon.  It is a beautiful lullabye, arguably Jarrett's best composition.  True, the "Nude Ants" version is all you need really, but something happens on this version of the song that is very special.  Jarrett puts in one of his best, if not his best, jazz piano performances.  The composition is perfectly suited to his virtuosity and sensitivities and the somnambulists, who are still pulling a Code 9, can't screw it up even if they want to.  (There is a halo around Keith Jarrett's head I bet you.)  Garbarek (somnambulist #1) plays the melody with a lot of heart, but he screws up the tempo in a very brief, weak improvisation.  The man is tapped, knows it and decides it's time to end the song.  Palle Danielsson (somnambulist #2) misses a lot of notes (doubly bad on double bass) and goes off into an ill-conceived, top-heavy improvisation right at the beginning of the song. Like Garbarek, he knows enough to STOP and retreat, letting Jarrett take over.  I can't remember a dang thing about somnambulist #3 (Christensen).  But Jarrett's effort cannot be touched and he plays like a true wizard.  A week later at the Village Vangard ("Nude Ants"), they'll all be playing at this level.If anything, I'd like to see the PM version of "Innocence" included in a compilation of the best concert performances by this quartet rather than a whole release of this mediocre concert.  For the most part here, we get hum-drum mountains, where many of the great riffs from the releases mentioned above are handled like a shaky old butler serving up tea, with people getting burned and tablecloths getting ruined.In particular, Garbarek's performance on "Nude Ants" is far superior to this one and maybe the mean streets of Greenwich Village got his "Norwegian up."  Maybe they weren't so sure if they were going to make it back to the hotel alive - New York USED to be like this you know - and, well, it just might be your last gig.  On "Personal Mountains,"  it's all polite "thank yous" and Japanese clapping robotically.  Not a tinkling glass of booze in the whole schmooze.  Not even a bonze meditating for more.  But, that Manfred Eicher, such a card, I tell you.</review_text>
Like the other reviewer of this cd, I am also a fan of Buffalo Tom. Unfortunately this doesn't sound very similar to BT, in fact it is a bit dull.  None of the songs seem to have hooks or melodies that stick - after you hear it you instantly forget it. I gave it 2 stars instead of 1 to be fair, since I only played it 3 times, hoping it would grow on me.  I'd recommend "Up Here" instead of this one, it's much more listener friendly</review_text>
VERY VERY DISSAPOINTED. E-40 RAPS TOO QUICK, HE IS TOO HARD TO UNDERSTAND AND HE SOUNDS LIKE A TRICK</review_text>
man i don't know what he was thinking when he recorded some of these songs.  the musicianship is, of course, outstanding and his voice is perfect for covering lightning hopkins, furry lewis, son house (shaker lp) but who wants to hear repeated renditions of my old dog blue? i agree with other reviewers who laud "james alley blues" "richland woman" the 2 l.hopkins songs "katie mae" and "darling, do you remember me" muddy waters' "little geneva" and sonny boy williamson's " don't start me to talking." the other songs do not merit a second listening for anything other than historical interest.  the "shaker" cd is even worse.  son house's "death letter" is above average, maybe even great.  the rest is barely listenable.  if you love the blues, particularly folk blues you will be infinitely happier with any l. hopkins cd</review_text>
Stinkish-I totally agree with you 100%!!!! What was mattel thinking when they released this item? Some songs are ok, but "Hit me baby one more time?" That song is soooo old! And so yesterday, by lip singer, Hilary Duff, is sooooo yesterday!!!! You gotta be desperate for music to actually buy this or want it.If you think that i am way wrong then include me in your review</review_text>
Although a few of the tracks seem inspired, it's mainly Mulligan going through the motions with Getz, with very little chemistry between them.  &quot;Anything Goes&quot; and &quot;Scrapple From the Apple&quot; are nice  enough but beyond that it's weak.  Mulligan himself didn't speak very  highly of the recording session, saying that he enjoyed his other dates  with Desmond, Webster, and Hodges, but mentioning that &quot;Granz wanted  that session a lot more than I did.&quot;  Of course, it would be quite out  of the ordinary to hear anything but negative remarks about Stan Getz and  his sparkling personality.   Save your money and go buy the 2-disk reissue  of &quot;Meets Ben Webster&quot;.  Or, if you don't have it already, the  seminal Pacific recordings with Chet Baker</review_text>
I purchased "Empty" not long after it came out and it was fairly enjoyable, but eventually forgettable, pop/rock.  This sophomore effort is, simply put, amatuer and sub-par.  Some of these sound like they would have been packaged more effectively as "Empty" B-sides, while the cover of "Electric Avenue" never really distracts most listeners from thinking "What is this and why?"  Over all, this might appeal to most Christian radio listeners, but only because they will never scrutinize it for what it actually is: mold-fitting white noise</review_text>
Having been a fan of Joan Osborne's take of "Son of a Preacher Man" on her original indie record and "Heat Wave" from the recent 'Standing in the Shadows of Motown' soundtrack, I was looking forward to hearing this record of covers.  I was ultimately disappointed.First of all, I have to say, there are two real gems on here that really needed to be updated, one for its amazing vocal/instrumental sound (The Spinners' "I'll Be There") and the other for its message (Timmy Thomas' "Why Can't We Live Together").To be sure, there are some great tunes on here that I am always up for listening to, such as Stevie Wonder's "Love's In Need of Love Today" and Undisputed Truth's "Smiling Faces Somtimes", but Osborne adds little to these.  When she does change things around, the effect is questionable.  I know that Norah Jones has brought back the torch song style, but Osborne's bluesy take on Edwin Starr's "War" is seriously misguided.  The same is true when you rip the melody and add bland vocals to classics like Aretha Franklin's "Think" or The Band's "The Weight" - especially since the former could have really used some punch from such a powerful singer like Osborne.Overall, this was a missed opportunity.  I hope her upcoming 2005 record is a reinvention</review_text>
I should have reviewed this along with FM. Both were double record hit soundtracks. Both represented youth. Both are excellent time capsules of what radio was playing. One was a bad movie with a great soundtrack and the other was a classic movie with a terrible soundtrack. This is the terrible soundtrack. When the best songs are by Billy Squier and Sammy Hagar you know you're in trouble. Jackson Browne, Joe Walsh, Don Henley are each awful. So were the GO-GO's. Not surprisingly Don Felder and Jimmy Buffet both sucked. I almost fell asleep in route 128 traffic when Graham Nash played. The band that called themselves Poco can't be the same Poco I grew up with. There were some listenable tracks by Timothy B. Schmit, Louise Goffin and Stevie Nicks but then there's Quarterflash. However, amongst all this crap was a gem...the very last song is Goodbye Goodbye by Oingo Boingo. This song rocks and Danny Elfman sounds crazed. Unavailable anywhere else which saves this from the trash</review_text>
Ryuichi Sakamoto's credibility is on the precipice with Chasm, a turgid unlistenable work of crud. Check out Coro and Only Love Can Conquer Hate, both sound like factory machinery at work. Dire, dreadful and diabolical. Stop being the artiste Ryuichi and have a go at entertaining. Your fans deserve better</review_text>
La Grange is probably at the top of most ZZ Top fans lists, and rightly so as it is superb, but the version contained on this collection is the one where they did some weird digital reverb stuff to the drum track, which completely destroyed the roadhouse vibe of the original recording.  It is so awful that I don't know how anybody can listen to it.  Thankfully they got smart and went back to the original for Rancho Texicano.  Clueless classic rock stations are still playing the version contained here, dummies.Also, Waitin' on the Bus/Jesus Just Left Chicago are two absolutely essential tracks that are inexplicably missing here</review_text>
This album in some ways is a perfect antithesis of the quirky, wacky, vivid personality of the first three Galactic studio albums--this is boring, flat and generic. Is that Stanton Moore or a drum machine? Precede straight to Garage a Trois</review_text>
I own all of Bebo Norman's CDs, and I LOVE all of them, except for this one.  I bought it and listened to it once, and I hated it.  It does not sound like Bebo.  This sounds like Steven Curtis Chapman or Michael W. Smith or any of the other mass produced Christian/pop music artists.  On all of his previous albums, even though he changed his sound slightly, it was still generally very acoustic and Bebo-ish.  This album sounds nothing like his previous music.  I was disappointed.</review_text>
I expected more african vocals in it.. thats the main reason i brought the cd, i recently became a fan of that kind of music.. it had like 3 songs on there that i liked, besides that this album is garbag</review_text>
On the track,"Cleo's Mood",it sounds like something that BookerT.And The MG's,along with the Mar-Key Horns would've cut.It sounds Like Steve Cropper on the guitar,and Booker T.Jones on the keyboards.The sax style is definately Jr.It's a soothing piece</review_text>
This young woman has a fine coloratura soprano voice, albeit a little underpowered, but she simply has no understanding of musical architecture. There is too much emphasis on virtuosic technique and no regard at all for musical subtleties. In fact, I suspect the only reason this little filly was favored over so many of her betters is that she looks mighty tasty in that skimpy frock and short-shorts. Once again, sex sells and the vox vulgus dominates at the expense of true art</review_text>
This is humor? When does the humor begin? Is it close to the end cause I reckon that this ain't funny. Maybe the fans of this guy can go home and beat there spouses with banjos and leave the rest of us alone, I reckin</review_text>
I really don't want to be mean, but I find this album very shallow.  Classical Indian music is a very complex, subtle and beautiful thing.  Comibining it in this way may help to get these wonderful tabla players to a wider audience, but the true energy has been tainted and lowered to make it palatable to simple-minded people who need westernized electronic and wishy-washy "world music" cliches.  I don't find this music to be uplifting or enlightening or interesting.  And this is not coming from a strict old fundamentalist of anything, I have delved deep into the avante guard, minimalism, "new music", eastern and western music theory, microtonal, etc. I would recomend jsut being a non-westernized album and getting the full benefit of tabla playing.  However if your mainstay is jungle/drum&bass, then this would be a step up for you, so go for it, it is worth the pruchase in that case</review_text>
This was the worst thing I've ever heard, except maybe Clap Your Hands Say Yeah.  My cousin who has absolutely no musical taste introduced me to them and I hate them forever</review_text>
this album had two good songs at the most. ralph was good with new edition. it's apparently obvious that he can't stand alone. bobby should have been the lead for new edition. then we may never have seen this terrible album. ralph isn't that good of a singer. this shows that just because your the lead singer in a group doesn't mean you are the best. ralph is miles behind bobby</review_text>
This Air Supply should've been cut off a very long time ago.  Whenever any of their songs comes on the radio I immediately shut it off.  Bad ear candy is all they ever recorded.  Mindless, sappy garbage.  Even Bread's music  was more interesting than this</review_text>
The 1 star is for this 5 star CD box set being no longer available. Does anyone know why or if it will be reissued soon? I have the Highlights CD and the "Live at the Plugged Nickel" double LP - but not being able to buy this is disappointing and puzzling.Thank you in advance for any help.Scott K Fis</review_text>
Jimi Hendrix was an ideal guitarist to lead a power trio, and he thrived in that format.  He inspired other groups to attempt it, with varying degrees of success.  But the Experience was a unit, able to soar on stage in extended live versions of Hendrix's compositions. Had it not been for the demon of discontent within the trio itself (that curses so many otherwise excellent bands), the Experience might have created several more inspired albums than it did before falling apart.The album BAND OF GYPSYS was jarring upon its release to those of us looking for Hendrix to continue to maximize the potential of the Experience.  At the time, loosely associated groups that traded off lengthy lead parts in a more or less generic old-style blues format were common and certainly not original -- much less cutting edge.It's true that Jimi does some respectable work on this record against the backdrop of the blues grooves supplied for him, but there's an odd and unwelcome shift in the balance.  Buddy Miles became a kind of intrusion into the world Jimi had fashioned in his previous work.  On a Hendrix album, songs sung by Buddy Miles didn't move the bar; they did not elucidate Jimi's universe.  Buddy's drum work was simply not in the style of Mitch Mitchell, and that was a large step down from the Experience's innovative grooves in songs like "Fire," for example.  Listen to "Fire," and then listen to any cut on "Band of Gypsys."  Listen to Hendrix's wild half-sung, half-wailed vocals on the previous albums, and then listen to Buddy Miles sing "Changes."You can't reconcile the two styles, and that would not be quite so bad if it weren't for the obvious fact that Band of Gypsys, under Buddy Miles' unfortunate influence, were not a step backward toward traditional blues rather than another reach into the future already painted by Jimi's previous work in tracks like "Are You Experienced?" and "Third Stone from the Sun."  Jimi's guitar work put him several steps ahead of the blues in terms of making his instrument perform overdriven rock tone poems and distorted rock concertos on his behalf.Band of Gypsys turned Jimi backward into a lead player in a blues band, which one might even have mistaken as being headed up by sideman Buddy Miles. That's not what people bought a Hendrix album for.It just didn't work very well as a release from what people still considered the Hendrix Experience.  Jimi seemed to have gone off track somehow, and the effect was to make him seem a little less what he had been up to that point.No doubt people got smoked up and enjoyed portions of the album that seemed like an intimate studio groove, but the cohesion of the Experience, the clear creative identity of the Hendrix Experience was not there.  You can say it was as simple as the fact that we missed Noel Redding and Mitch Mitchell, and that may be true.  But whatever the line-up, people were not entirely ready for Jimi to share his stage with any other would-be featured players.</review_text>
It's not great music to dance to</review_text>
First show on Broadway I ever left at intermission. I bought the tickets because I didn't think I could go wrong seeing a show directed by Strohman, starring Craig Bierko who was fantastic in Music Man and was flat flat flat in this show, and music by Harry Connick Jr. whom I have loved forever. It taught me that everything has it's place and Harry's place is not a Broadway stage. I hope for his sake, he does not try again. If I could rate something at zero stars, this would get that rating</review_text>
I'm a hardcore Lynch fan and find this album a big dissapointment. I like his older season of da sicc style nott this new stuff. In one song they're talking about louie vitton, thats not the lynch i kno</review_text>
I am completly shocked at how high the scores for this album are on amazon.  Trust me, I am not someone who claims to be a music expert, but I am a big fan of Jam/Funk and Jazz fusion.  I play bass, I understand music, and Umphrey's is among my favorite bands (others include 311, Widespread Panic, Deep Banana Blackout, Red Hot Chili Peppers, Soulive, Medeski Martin Wood).  In general I am open to all kinds of funky music, and Umphrey's usually puts out.  In my opinion, this band had the talent and unique sound to become the next generation of funk (following the Red Hot Chili Peppers and 311).  With this album I was expecting them to develop their sound from Anchor Drops into an album that could achieve mainstream success like RHCP's Blood Sex Sugar Magic did, while staying true to their unique roots in Jazz, blues, rock and even some metal.  Like I said, they fuse genres like no one else can...THIS album, however, was a complete failure in the areas I have described above.First off, I can understand how reviewers point to the production quality, and the musical talent displayed throughout the album.  Umphreys Mcgee is insanely talented, and no effort could hide that from the listener.  HOWEVER, to be blunt this album is boring as hell, has no funk or rock in it period, and is frankly somewhat depressing.  IF your expecting wild guitar improv, explosive beats and fun, uplifting music--ignore this album.  If you are a fan of Umphrey's live show and their past albums--ignore this album.  If you tend to be willing to overlook production quality in search of funkier, jazzier guitar rifs and bass experimentation--do not buy this album.  The only way I can summate this album is that its a typical indy type album.  Slow songs without enough music, little variance from song to song, depressing lyrics, and a slow pace.  Some say this is Umphreys showing their full range, I say this is them bottling up their range in a more mainstream package that is not all that enjoyable.The only reason I wrote this review is that Im amazed by the other reviews on this page.  I wish I had never heard this album, it is a pathetic effort from a band as experimental and fun as Umphreys Mcgee.  They missed a golden opportunity to come out with the next great funk compilation, this album is a step in the wrong direction. I strong advise the listener who likes to be entertained by music, rather than production quality and introspective lyrics, to steer way clear of this album.  This was a massive dissappointment beyond any album release I have ever heard (including By the Way from RHCP, which is an achievement in musical creativity compared to Safety in Numbers)</review_text>
I may not be an expert on steel drums, but I do listen to Jimmy Buffett a lot! He has a great steel drum drummer. After listening to this cd, I gave it away in a white elephant gift exchange this past Xmas</review_text>
This cd its just horrible, they sold only 10,000 copies enough to pay for their instruments lol ! There are better bands than this an example is bleeding through so i think no one cares about a re release peace out</review_text>
It seems that even the best bands have only a finite number of great melodies in them, and the Flower Kings exhausted theirs in their first four cds.  Here we have yet another double-helping of their ageless wisdom, strewn across two cds to our fiduciary detriment.  Though not as crass and offensive as Stolt's "Wall Street Voodoo" or Bodin's "I AM", this is nevertheless lyrically naive to the level of silliness.  There are a few good instrumental passages mixed in this release, but not enough to justify its purchase.Stolt said in a recent interview something to the effect that "...peace & love never go out of fashion..."  Well, neither does informed maturity, and you won't find any of that in this group's recent output.  Just more utopian preaching and good vs. evil typecasting.Their liner notes advocate sending money to Greenpeace and Amnesty International, but I would counter that any American would be better investing their extra cash at St. Jude's Children's Hospital.  I'm going to sell my copy of "Paradox Hotel", and probably several more Flower Kings cds, to do just that.There are some sick children out there who need our support and encouragement far more than these would-be hippies</review_text>
I have been a Ronstadt fan since the early 70's, and although the Nelson Riddle stage and the Mexican stage were not my style, I still loved her vocal perfection.  This is truly the only album I haven't played more than twice (I didn't like it the first time, which surprised me, so I tried it again). It doesn't showcase her voice or her talents. The songs are very ho hum.  Linda, put out a Christmas album (been waiting for years), and try to get sweetness back for this old fan</review_text>
Jonny's conversion is fine and I hope he is happy, but this album was not good if you are expecting the blues guitar work of his early albums.  If you want christan rock maybe this could be for you, but he missed the mark with me big time</review_text>
She doesn't sing... SHE YELLS!!! And using one of Ednita's songs as she did with "Lo que son las cosas" is just sacrilege at its "best" (or worst). It's really easy to hit it big with your first single when the song is already a classic by itself. She has absolutely nothing on Beyonce or Cristina Aguilera. Her cd is just plain bad! If you want to hear good music by latin women with beautiful powerful voices (and that actually SING), you might want to look for La Lupe, Celia Cruz, Ednita Nazario and Lucecita Benitez... and these are only the ones I remembered at the moment</review_text>
The Firm(a conglomerate consisting of Nas, AZ, Foxy Brown and the relative unknown Nature(who took the place of original member Cormega after a heated dispute))...came up with the "brilliant idea" to collaborate on a full album...after the release of "Affirmative Action" from Nas' It Was Written album.  After enlisting the assistance of Dr. Dre's Aftermath Records and production by the infamous Trackmasters,  The Firm's album is subpar to say the least...it sounds like each individual artists is trying too hard to outshine the other and many of the beats consisting on this album are just a lil too sample heavy...."Hardcore" for example.  However, I will admit, there are some shining moments by all four members....and some half decent production....i.e. "Phone Tap"..."F**k Somebody Else"(lyrics are forgettable since Foxy is doing what she does best on the mic...talking about sex and its many forms....I think you might be able to masterbate to this one...LOL).  I will give this a decent try but I can't go no further than that.  I will agree with one reviewer saying that listening to the group as solo artists is a more satisfying</review_text>
If this isn't worst Dead album then In the Dark is</review_text>
You know the music industry is in decline when people are giving this single a perfect rating.  Run for cover</review_text>
There is not enough space for me to explain why this film(and soundtrack) are woefully inadequate of the name Dr. Seuss.The Fact that there are so many songs on the album screams commercialism(what the book was complaining about, wake up people!) and James Horner's score which has a couple of nice moments but doesn't have that Seussian sound. 'Where are you Christmas' is annoying beyond all reason and I mean both versions. And whose bright idea was it to have Jim Carrey mangle 'You're a Mean One'?If you're looking for a more Grinch like score, go find Elfman's Nightmare Before Christmas</review_text>
I've owned this cd, but didn't keep it for very long because it's too poppy and slick for my tastes. I guess when about 1981 came around Billy just wanted to distance himself from the brilliance of his 70's style, and on this offering, he kind of wanted a 50's or 60's kind of sound. This stuff is just to slick for this hombre. He never made a solid album, after the release of GLASS HOUSES, in about 1980. This is the kind of stuff that yuppies rave about, but if you've got some integrity, you'll probably want to steer clear of this one, and buy anything he recorded in the 70's</review_text>
I bought this album on the strength of positive reviews and personal charts displayed on amazon.com and amazon.co.uk. These suggested that Eloy's Silent Cries and Mighty Echoes album was redolent of Pink Floyd and Yes. Actually it is, but only both bands at their very worst. The album opens with an inept attempt at Gilmouresque doodlings circa 1973, moves on to some truly rank singing, with the singer's phrasing hardly assisted by a strong German accent and thus the suspicion that he doesn't understand the absurdity of the lyrics. Actually, at times the lyrics do remind one of Jon Anderson at his silliest, although we forgave Mr Anderson and Yes because they were superb musicians and songwriters. With Silent Cries & Mighty Echoes the tunes are pooor and for progressive rock, the song structures are of almost childlike simplicity. That this album was made in the late seventies is extraordinary in itself. It would have been appalling in 1972. To discover it was recorded in December 1978 is gob-smacking. Unforgiveable tosh</review_text>
I heard from a number of people that Amon Amarth were an excellent death metal band, so with that in mind, I though I'd try OSFTGH. What I hear, and it certainly seems I'm missing out on something, is sloppy musicianship and poor songwriting. Just because you have mead dripping from your beard, and you scream out lyrics that contain, no mercy, vengeance and "it's your time to die" does not mean you can create "authentic" Viking/metal. These idiots could definitely take lessons from: Enslaved, Manegarm, Falkenbach to name a few. Don't fall for the hype!</review_text>
This CD just doesn't have the quality it should. Some of the songs have had the lyrics cut out or removed such as Danny Boy. I have the Cassette and it was great but this just doesn't do justice to Ray Price or his  songs</review_text>
I knew this wouldn't be the Sia from Zero 7's album. Little did I know exactly how bad she could be without the superior talents Zero 7 have behind the mixing boards. The song production is terrible. I couldn't find one song I really liked on this CD. Sia truly has a unique voice but it's evident that good production can make a star out of a flashlight. Still, I'm severely disappointed, particularly because I had to pay for this CD as an import</review_text>
i deeply love the music of joni mitchell. it is for this reason that i feel the need to warn you, to dissuade you from being too early enthusiastic about this album aven before having heard it (as i stupidly did). the fact is that so many people spend so much energy in praising it (a new mature joni! a return to the roots! a brilliant acoustic album! and nonsense like these...) that it is very disappointing and frustrating to see (well, hear) that joni has not changed from her foolish and useless music of the last 15 years (except "dog eat dog" which is superb, but only from a lyrical point of view - musically it's an '80s disaster). it is the first joni mitchell album that i felt spleepy listening. ok, some lyrics are quite good, but nothing compares to the joni of the '60s and '70s. so, i really do not get the point: it is so obvious to me that she has nothing left to say (how painful it is to face reality!), so, why should all of you praise her? just because of what she did in the past? ok, let us say that she WAS the greatest singer-songwriter of her generation (according to me, much better than bob dylan) and let us praise her forever because of that; but i truly cannot accept that we still flatter her in everything she does, even if what she does is boring and flat music pretending to be art. i would like to strongly dissuade you from buying this album (and anything else from 1982 up to now - except, as i said, "dog eat dog"). if you are still trying to introduce yourself through the divine music of joni mitchell, try anything you want from the 60s and 70s. really, anything. try to be open-minded and let her music flow through your veins. you have to be prepared, for it could be beautifully dangerous: once you know her, you will never let her go away from your soul</review_text>
At no point in my following review am I by any means intentionally downing Hank Jr. I am just trying to give an honest review of this cd.At the time this album was realeased, Hank Jr. was riding high, winning big at the CMA's and ACM's.  He was also releasing some of the most critically aclaimed country records of his recording career.  But then for some reason he decided he needed to record some rock and roll.To me this cd is a studio recorded version of a Hank Williams Jr. live concert.  The only difference is he didn't botch the vocals as he does on his live show.  The music is decidedly 80% not country, it drifts towards eighties rock.If you trace Hank Jr.'s recording career, you can point at this cd at the one that started the downward spiral that he has only began to pull himself out of.I must say though, this cd contains one of Hanks last top 10 hits, "If the South Woulda Won," which is an hard to find recording on his compilations.  I'd say this cd is kinda essential collecion wise, just because of that song.</review_text>
Ignore the big word "Karaoke" on the cover and the microphone shown, this is just a music CD, it does not display anything in a karaoke player</review_text>
This Album Is not what I call a album First 4 trackz are the tightest with the tightest beats.  Best track on here is &quot;I practice Looking Hard&quot; probably one of the best trackz he eva made in his whole career I love that song but otha than that &quot;Captain save a hoe&quot; and &quot;Mail Man&quot; are a discrace. He shouldnt have even made this cd until he got more track</review_text>
I got hooked on Tiesto about 5 years ago. Heard a live taping on the radio of him a couple of weeks ago and they said its from this album. Neverhteless, it wasn't but it was still tiesto though right? Well...the hits on this CD are about 5 years old. The build ups are terrible and I felt like the songs were redone about 10 times from other various artists. Stick with "Tiesto:Nyana" ...10130340345435 times better</review_text>
Wen i bouht dis cd i thought is waz my holmes on it but it was jus sum dude wid a big azz hoodie and hat.  when i put dis in my playa it was broken the rappers, main peter, voice sounded liek a blender.  dah turntables sound like my moms bong a bubblin damn nigga was my favorite track but that wasn't on dis cd.  I wish i had da real copy and not da malufunked up one.  peace out dawg KEEP IT REAL AND STAY WON WID DAH UNDERDAWGZZ</review_text>
I bought Kayslays Pain From the Game about a week before it came out in most stores(my local cd store likes to sell their copies ahead of schedule;).  I read that it featured production by Swizz Beatz, Kanye West, Eminem and the Heatmakerz.  And as far as rappers go, most of the Shady/Aftermath camp is on here somewhere along with a ton of other big artists (fat joe, Ghostface Killah, Raekwon, Scarface, Memphis Bleek and Prodigy, etc).  So I expected this cd to be a big step up from the Streetsweeper Volume 1 mixtape (which I would give 3 stars at best).  But for all the talent on this cd there's not many good songs.  I thought the production was pretty weak.  Some no name guy produced most of the cd but even the kanye west, swizz beatz and eminem tracks are pretty bland.  If you have to have every song your favorite rapper or producer ever made, grab this disc.  If your looking for good music leave this one alone</review_text>
Denis Leary's whole act is stolen from Bill Hicks nearly word for word. Save your money and search Amazon for Bill Hicks</review_text>
This Entire CD & HBO special is stolen material. All this material was originally written & performed by Bill Hicks. Buy Hicks DVD "Bill Hicks Live - Satirist, Social Critic, Stand-Up Comedian" if you want the material in its true formhttp://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/tg/detail/-/B0004Z33FK/qid=1130712550/sr=1-1/ref=sr_1_1/104-5459925-2315938?v=glance&s=dvdBill Hicks was also paid tribute on TooL's Aenima album</review_text>
As owner of Every single Chill/Lounge music CD I am aware of, this was the biggest dissapointment in a long time.  Ultra Chill series 1-4 was outstanding.  While Ultra Chill 05 is not a complete disaster, I could not find one song worthy of a 5/5 star rating.  Quite a few 4 star songs and lots of 2-3 star songs.  Some of the better songs were repeated on older Chill discs or present on other series of lounge discs.  There is a lot of Jazz and Latin chill on these two discs, which I also like, but the Jazz/world/latin chill tracks here were repeats or nothing great.I think the person that rated this 5 stars doesn't own a lot of lounge/chill and is probably a lot easier to please.  I'm very dissapointed.  Maybe this 'genre' is all dried up! :) Oh well...I'm off to listen to "Chillout Seesions 8"... Hopefully it will be a lot better.  I highly reccomend Chillout seesions by Ministry of Sound.  Chillout sessions 1-7 are outstanding... Time to go listen to the new 8!</review_text>
Amazingly this compilation has managed to get together some of the most untallented performances of Brahms' music. With a few exceptions the moto of this CD can be summed up as 'no understanding and appreciation for a musical genius'. The choice of music is also quite perfunctory. There are many Brahms pieces that could have served better the bedtime purpose. Buy at your own risk. My only fear is that some people will get their first impressions of Brahms from this CD..</review_text>
There is at times, a fine line between noise and music. NIN not only crossed that line in this cd, but stomped on it a few times in the process. Not even close to the calibre of WITH TEETH, this cd is a waste of time and an insult to the talent that resides within this group of musicians.Songs that go from semi-music to irritating noise and last four times as long as one can abide, while "playing" the same thing over and over and ...well, you get my drift.If great music is your thing, pass this one up. Or write me a note and tell me why on earth such a great group would release such an abomination</review_text>
Despite all reviews posted here in this page are given 5-stars to this release, I need to be honest and explain why I am giving just one poor star. No, I am not crazy. Let me explain my point-of-view, and after that you can decide if this JH album really deserves more stars. Just to start, this album does not have a spinal-column that could guide the band(?) or the musicians thru a solid path. There are tracks played by a duo, trio, 4tt, and sometimes a very loose quintet, and each of these tracks have a different mood, without any presence of a jazz soul, or even a real smell of jazz. Maybe the intention of recording these tunes was to make a homage/tribute to Mr Strayhorn, or maybe a recognition for Mr Henderson value in the 20th century Jazz History as one of the most important hard-boppers ever. But the result was very poor. If you really love Joe Henderson (as I appreciate), try any of his albums from the 60's (as a band-leader or as a sideman), mainly those from the Blue Note era. In time: I gave one star, in memory of his brilliant carreer. This particular album deserve zero-star.</review_text>
Almost 10 years later... and I am still waiting for the punchline.  I think this is the most properly named album of all time... as the easiest summation is:  it lacks ANY punch and keeps you waiting for something that never comes!  Its terrible, especially when contrasted with Pornograffitti.  Gone are the great guitar tone, riffing, rhythm, power, and groove that marked most of the prior three albums.  It's what the forth side to "III Sides To Every Story" could have been... "Yours, Mine, The Truth, and THE SUCK".  The songs are lackluster, but its really the guitar sound that kills this album album.  "No Respect", surprisingly, by name, is the only song worth any respect and the only song near upbeat on the album.  "Waiting for the Punchline" still remains in my top 5 worst albums of all time... I dont write negative reviews unless a CD is really bad in general or really bad compared to the bands other work.  In this case, it fits both... its bad for Extreme... and stands up as exceptionally bad among all other bands' albums as well.  Conversely, in my opinion, III Sides and Pornograffitti are 4 and 5 star albums, respectively</review_text>
As others have noted, this was a time of turmoil for the group. Now trimmed back to a fourpiece (they had just lost guitarist/singer Bob Weston and singer Dave Walker), they also changed producers after 5 straight albums they had either self-produced or collaborated with Martin Birch on. This CD also leans really heavily on material from Bob Welch (this would be his last release with the band) and it suffers deeply for that.Most of the few highlights here are furnished by Christine McVie. The title cut is a nice lament about male prevarication. The understated "Prove Your Love" is also a winner. Of the Welch contributions, the only real standouts are the mystical "Bermuda Triangle" and gentle closer "Safe Harbour".There are plenty of miscues, filler, and outright bad material here. McVie's "Come a Little Bit Closer" is produced like it WANTS to be a hit, but it's much too slight to stick in the memory. Welch's "She's Changing Me" sounds like Chicago colliding with the Mac...the horns don't work here. The handclap bridge in "Silver Heels" seems too poppy and out of place in the context of the rest of the tune, which is execrable anyway.The silver lining to this disc is that what might have been a death knell turned into the band's finest hour just one album later..</review_text>
An absolutely lackluster effort from some very talented musicians.I gotta say, I could have used a little more cowbell</review_text>
After breaking the collective hearts of the soft rock-loving populace by leaving the powerhouse group Chicago, Traitor Cetera made a half-baked attempt to reconcile himself with his fanbase by recording this stinker.  It's coincidental that the first track is titled "Big Mistake", as if Traitor knew his leaving one of the premier groups of our time was the worst decision he would ever make.  I bought this album way back in 1986 with some birthday money, and after I had listened to the album once, I made myself go and apologize to all of my family members for wasting their money so foolishly.What else is here?  Oh, you have the "Karate Kid II" ballad "Glory of Love", a tune so nauseating it's made me completely ignore the second film in the canon, and go straight from the original "Karate Kid" to "III" and "Next" whenever I do my yearly film marathon.  I just pretend the second film never existed.  It also has the semi-smash "Next Time I Fall", where Traitor makes it a point to hog the spotlight completely from guest vocalist Amy Grant.In short, if you a) thought Cetera's leaving Chicago was a great decision, or b) like your music pointless and nauseating, by all means get this album.  If you want music with real heart and soul, just go buy some Chicago.  You'll be glad you did</review_text>
I cant understand how anyone can give this album more than one star.  Luckily I got this cd for free when they were handing them out to everyone who came to their shows on their 2005 tour.  I love classic Journey, but this band has gone downhill faster than I ever thought possible.  Most of the songs are terrible-boring music and even worse lyrics.  'Arrival' was pretty mediocre, but this is about 5 steps DOWN from there.  Granted, Steve Augeri does complete justice to the old songs in concert and really sounds great, but he obviously has nothing to offer in the way of songwriting.  The only way this band will ever create quality new music is if Perry were to stop sitting around at home and come back to the band.  Otherwise, the band should seriously consider not making any more new music and just go on tour every couple of years</review_text>
A lame group of angry teenagers screaming about themselves. Ironic lyrics like "Image of the Invisible" do not make them intellectual. This trash is not music. Get it off my radio! If only I could give 0 stars..</review_text>
Method: Take a monster, genre defining album you recorded over 15 years ago, borrow the voicings, polyrhythms and sound effects, rearrange them to slightly (but not *that*) different tunes, crib the album art (cheesy then; cheesier now) and re-release.The point? Well, to The Man, it's obvious. There's one born every minute. But for genuine, discerning afficionados of electronica? Search me. Like a good souffle, it was better the first time.Indeed, inventing Oxygene Parts 7 - 13 is almost as pointless an exercise as going back and re-recording the original album from scratch. And guess what turned out to be Jarre's next project?Whoops! Writer's block, perchance?Olly Buxto</review_text>
I never write reviews for anything, but this one was so bad, I couldn't help myself. Everybody has different tastes, but if you like music with any kind of structure or melody at all, you will not like Belladonna. I could not make sense of it at all, it rambled on and on, never getting to the point, never picking a path, never building on a theme. It bored me with it's vague attempts to build a song. I listened to it 2 times just to make sure I wasn't imagining how bad it was, and then I dumped it. It was not my style, and I don't see how it could be anybody's style, but that's just me. I felt obligated to voice my opinion and possible save somebody out there from being bitterly disappointed. Good Luck on your listing adventures</review_text>
I love the "smoky" piano bar sound of this album.  I picture my best girl having a couple of pops late at nigh</review_text>
I wanted to give this CD as a gift to my 7 year old niece who loves the movie.  I listened to it first to make sure the quality was good. I was so surprised when all I heard was music and no words.  Although the music is nice, I know she would not be too impressed. We had seen the movie together and we loved Mr. Ray's song and wanted to know the words.  It's too bad that I'll have to return or sell it</review_text>
Item never came.  However in their defense refund was promptly given out.  I only wish that I had a chance to receive this one</review_text>
I understand why so many people like Dido..She is beautiful, has a decent voice, comes across as a decent human being and is inoffensive...This album is the same - 'inoffensive'...some might say, bland...The tracks that work for me are 'Thank You' (used on Eminem's 'Stan'), but is done solo here and it works, 'Hunter' and 'Here With Me'...The rest just disappear into the background like a passing car...Nothing much happens, nothing inspires...I really want to like her, but it's all been done before..</review_text>
This is a Cd of the history of the band. Interesting but was not a music CD. Was not worth the price</review_text>
This will be the third time I have tried to post a review of this unacceptably bad album, and I suppose I have been too harsh, because neither of my previous efforts have been posted. Lets keep this one simple. This is not music, plain and simple. I purchased this due to glowing recommendations from other reviewers on this site, and was terribly disappointed. It basically consists of massively distorted (and detuned) guitar and bass monotonously droning on and on for nearly an hour with no coherence, structure, or anything approximating the actual ability to play an instrument. Call it performance art, experimental noise, whatever. It's simply not music.</review_text>
Dan Fogelberg is an extremely talented songwriter and performer. Unfortunately, the songs that get the most radio play are his weaker efforts, songs that seem formulaic and &quot;safe.&quot; His best songs are the lesser known works -- listeners have to buy the albums in order to hear them. They'll never make it to the pop airwaves. Serious Fogelberg fans will be disappointed by this greatest hits cd. &quot;Greatest hits&quot; is not synonymous with &quot;greatest music.&quot</review_text>
I love the song &quot;NASCA LINES&quot; which I first heard on a Putamayo world music CD, so I ordered &quot;UNDER ONE SKY&quot; since it has &quot;Nasca Lines.&quot; I figured all the music would be as good, but I was so disappointed. It was very jazzy, which I hate. I'm going back to the Putamayo CDs</review_text>
I am very dissapointed with this DualDisc, because there is no comment (worning) about DVD region protection. What can I do with this disc - region 1, in Europe (region 2)? My message for Sony Corporation is: "This format will not exist for long with DVD region protection! Sorry.".My first, and last DualDisc. Back to the SACD</review_text>
While the sound of the stream is relaxing and well recorded, there are way too many birds around. The CD describes their sound as distant and faint, but that's far from accurate. The parts of the CD where all you hear is the stream alone don't add up to more than 10 minutes, and never last more than a minute. For the most part you will hear the stream and plenty of birds, rather close and sometimes very loud.Buyer beware: the 30 second samples you get here are precisely from the parts with no birds at all! Very misleading</review_text>
Once "The Very Best of 10cc" was released in 1997, it was the collection to have.  That collection included 15 tracks that spanned 10cc's career, ending with the Godley and Creme hit "Cry."  So why would this CD be released, especially since the only thing it offers over the prior CD is "Channel Swimmer" and "Don't Hang Up?"  Buy the CD "How Dare You" and "The Very Best of 10cc" and you will have three times the music you have on this CD for only twice the price.  An unnecessary addition to the 10cc portfolio</review_text>
(With the possible exception of Klemperer's Fidelio.)I am deeply comforted to see from other reviews that others are finally getting the message. As Mr Clinton's campaign team would say, "It's the singing, stupid". Do *not* be mislead by the starry names, this thing barks and yowls like New Year's Eve in the cats-and-dogs home.Do not pass Go, do not waste $35, go directly to Josef Krips on Decca Legends for three discs of perfect joy</review_text>
This live album/in-studio acoustic EP is hard to figure. Most of the live stuff is selected from BLS's &quot;Stronger Than Death&quot; album, which wasn't all that great to begin with. The only good thing being; that album was so poorly mixed that live versions of &quot;All For You&quot; and &quot;13 Years Of Grief&quot; sound much better and immediate than their studio counterparts. A new heavier version of &quot;No More Tears&quot; tries to please, but fails by showing Zakk Wylde's gruff vocals don't always work. Unexpectedly, the bonus acoustic EP is the far better attraction. &quot;Like A Bird&quot; is the best song Neil Young never wrote and &quot;Blood In The Well&quot; shows Zakk's soloing chops in full form. BLS needed some better songs before doing a live record. End of story</review_text>
I bought this CD for "Hole In The Earth", a very dynamic, driving and quasi-psychedelic rocker, and mostly got what I expected - more of the same along a continuum, sometimes pushing their envelope in either direction, as I expected.And then I came upon "Pink Cellphone", a rotten apple if there ever was one. This vile little stinker is as if one of the band's groupies wandered into the control room in a methamphetamine haze, defecated on the mixing board, and then described her experience, in no uncertain terms, into an answering machine. If there was ever a reason to switch from buying an artist's complete CDs to just purchasing individual tracks off of the web, this is it. Congratulations, guys, you have not only lodged a very descriptive and literally filthy image into my head, but convinced me, and I'd wager, many listeners, that our faith is ill placed with the musical choices that pop musicians make when assembling their "B" sides. To say nothing of the bad taste and lack of respect for your audience that this demonstrates.Someone should wash the Deftones' mouths out with a bar of soap - maybe a few bars.</review_text>
I bought two copies of this SACD, both had glitches and would not play in my player correctly, be forewarned. I dont have any other problems with other SACDs so I assume it is in the production somewhere. They would lock up for no reason, this is right out of the box, both copies.</review_text>
Awful. I mean, really awful...and I liked "Self Portrait" because you knew Dylan was just trying to have some fun with his image. This album is just a disaster. The lyrics are OK on most songs (I've seen worse by Dylan), but the music is unexciting, not very creative, and downright embarrassing on some tracks. Why, oh, why did you have to make an album like this, Bob? Such talented people at your disposal for these sessions, and you threw it away on garbage arrangements. Shameful. Really sad.</review_text>
This CD was devoid of any of Govi's usual emotional imprint or soaring guitar work. Frankly, it was just a bunch of New Age background noise that one would hear on elevators. Some of the Craig Chaquico-style stuff was interesting, but better left to Craig. Try 7th Heaven, Mosaico or Guitar Odyssey instead</review_text>
right the people i work with love this band and album so really i was pressured into buying this album..so i bought and i thought i was going to be blown away due to the hype from my friends but in reality this sucks more than the mudvayne album i've just reviewed terrible distorted guitars bad production off key singing, half baked lyrics the only good thing is the cover and maybe one of the singles are vaguely average apart from that the rest sucks...don't be fooled by the hype by the press this band sucks so will babyshamble</review_text>
Carter Burwell's soundtrack music to &quot;Rob Roy&quot; was an early sign that he was not just getting it right. The score is all wrong but so is the movie. This movie needed an uplifting score. Carter Burwell could not deliver it</review_text>
Well it was an obvious path to musical collapse, she should have stopped at Tidal.  If I'd been dating her for the talent she showed on her first CD I would have broken up with her over this piece of haggis.  The course of the last three CD's drew a trendline right from stardom into a melodic pit.  The lyrics on Extraordinary Machine were not only not up to their namesake but worse than the melodies.  The number of great reviews on this site only go to prove once again the masses prefer pablum in lieu of something complex and cognitive.Her original Cd with it's collection of diminished and augmented chords set to deep overlays of texturing, blended with truly poetic lyrics has been replaced with a distilled musical joke.  What on earth gave her the impetus to try to go 'artsy' by experimenting with music predating the second world war I'll never know.  It's obvious her angst is no longer producing art, rather it is being replaced with contrived resolution and the equivalent of a musical epitaph.Eat it up people, it's all about not having to think.  It's the kind of tripe that happens when someone is trying to hard to think of how to outdo their first brush stroke of genius and is confronted with musical block.  Judging by the news her father is ruining her life and creativity as so often is the case in todays less than feminine half of the culture.</review_text>
This album was released in 1999. And now, seven years later, this album does not even matter. Britney Spears is remembered not for her musical talent but for her inability to parent a child. Great music lasts dozens of years for its complexity, innovation, creativity, and ability to transcend cultures and generations. Great music stirs something inside the listener, and matters to the person who created it. Britney Spears and the ridiculous product that her record companies have created is none of these things. It saddens me to see the number of copies an album such as this sells originally. And yet, the great albums of all times sell thousands of copies years - decades, even - after their release. Music like this, Britney Spears and her peers, disappears into the folds of time. It does not matter.</review_text>
When will artist realize you can't change the old classics.  The only successfull R&B group to sing the classic "Night and day" to their own beat was the Temptations CD "What women want" the best rendition I have ever heard.  Smokey does have the voice for these kinds of songs.  Another good CD with classics is Willie Nelson's Stardust</review_text>
Ignore the unique cover, clever song idea( there is 30) whichrepresent a comic book. Ignore all that. It simply is not good.What is this? I dont even know how to describe this music.It's not even songs, but more a bunch of really short experimental, non-sensequel, inerworkings of annoyance. Theywill start off with a riff as if they are going on to a song,but its only a tease, until they stop and go slow, to say," geton with it!!!!!!!!" Add a bunch of zany sound effects, not tomention the recurring anoyance of a high pitched voice ringingout, sci-fi clips and completly hoarse vocals that are screams,and sounds,that add up,to one of the most pointless albums ever put out</review_text>
I had high hopes for this cd. I love norwegian metal, and I love viking stuff so I thought this would be great. I was at least hoping it would be good. What I heard was a bunch of uninspired, mediocre, a dime a dozen metal songs. I mean there is enough good to save it from being a total waste, but not enough to give it even 3 stars. The high points are The fate of Norns, The persuit of Vikings, and Arson. These songs are bad @$$ and fun to listen too.An Ancient Sign Of Coming Storm 5.5 just mediocreWhere Death Seems To Dwell 5.5 very repetitiveThe Fate Of Norns 7 This one is pretty good. It has a repetitive punchy opening riff that gets stuck in your head long after listening to it.The Pursuit Of Vikings 7.5 This is my favorite song from this cd. Pretty Bad A$$.Valkyries Ride 5.5 Tedious MonotonyThe Beheading Of A King 5.5 Same as ValkryiesArson 7.5 A bit of a slow starter but it picks up towards the end with some melodic guitarOnce Sealed In Blood 5.5 a bit faster than some but still a downer.All in all nothing horrible, and there is some good songs. The music is a little on the simple side which doesnt necasarily make it bad. I like a lot of simpler music like Darkthrone and Burzum. The problem is that when it comes to simpler stuff I like it to have some really good aptmosphere. That is precisly what is lacking here. I will still listen to it occasionally hoping that it will grow.</review_text>
This never should've been pressed.  They should've taken the mix and thrown it out.  DO NOT BUY!!</review_text>
I really think Snoop is a good rapper. He should only have stopped 10 years ago. I'm very tired of his gizzle wizzle nizzle stuff, and I don't like none of the beats here. And what's left then? nothing.I found out after i bought this album:I'm not a snoop fan anymore...Old School is the bes</review_text>
This Is as Bad as The Film.in Fact Just Like The FIlm The Soundtrack is the same old Formula.Will&amp;His Movies&amp;Music Never change the same Old Beat.The Rest Of The Soundtrack is just as  bad.UNORIGINAL&amp;BORING.What A Waste of KOOL MOE DEE</review_text>
What a load of junk.  GU 29 CD1 was OK.  Everything else these two have done separately is pretty useless.  Make sure you hear a sample before buying this.  Don't say you weren't warned.</review_text>
But for "The Drugs don't Work," which is marginal at best,this album is boring...cookie-cutter, nothing original</review_text>
What an outrageous group, how can anyone like this rubbish. Maybe an horde of brainless people. How I feel happy in being intelligent, and live my life with things of absolute quality and not consuming this kind of food for mediocres. How said Romans, "it's just bread and circus to the poors". Give to people what they deserve, rubbish! It's because you mediocre people that buy this, that this kind of people, the members of this group, get money and laughs behind the scenes about how dumb people can be. It's the same horde that buy, Beyonce, Spears, Madona, and other outrageous poor music.</review_text>
please make these songs available to listen - with windowsmedia!</review_text>
I am a huge fan of Thomas Newman but really this CD presents nothing new. It comes across as merely a re-hash of the airy, atmospheric, melody-free cues from his other recent scores. It has none of the originality of American Beauty or Road to Perdition. Frankly, as much as I like his scores, I don't think this warranted a CD release, it's just got too bland and ordinary, no matter how beautifully constructed and pristine it all sounds. A pity</review_text>
I have to admit that even though i am a big fan of diesel boy, this cd was very boring.  The beats are too similar on every track, and the cd as a whole just has no &quot;feeling&quot; to it.  If you want to hear him at his best, by 97 octane</review_text>
From the twang of his guitar to the cowboy hat perched on his head, George Strait is totally and completely revolting. I mean, for goodness sake the man's like 100 years old! How much longer is it going to take for everyone  to realize that? If you like this kind of music, please go to Charter  before you're beyond help. Take this as a warning-don't buy the  cd</review_text>
Zoolook~ Jean-Michel Jarre is a case where the artist is way to avant-garde for his own best. After having made amazing albums such as Oxygene, Equinox and Magnetic Fields he unfortunately creates this mess of an album. I find it a bit too much like modern art, i.e., confusing, confounding and impossible to grasp. It also seems like Jarre was a bit over confident when he recorded this album. He had recorded some of the best synth albums of all time and decided to create a total arts album and it just does not work. This is an album that should have stayed unrealesed since it is just to avant-garde and sounds more like an experimental sound session rather then as a well produced album. Very disapointing indeed!</review_text>
I like Machine Head a lot.  Many people disliked "The Burning Red" and called them sell-outs, but I appreciated the effort to make something different.  Then came "Supercharger".  I have listened to it a dozen times, looking for that hook or spark that will get me to listen and love it.  It never came.  This is a bad CD by a great band.</review_text>
I love Milton Nascimento's early work (&quot;Travessia&quot; and  &quot;Clube Da Esquina&quot;), but this does not reach that level by far.  My main objection is that it does not live up to the promise delivered by  the famous names of the participants like Herbie Hancock, Wayne Shorter,  Pat Metheny a.o. &quot;Vera Cruz&quot; is OK, but the rest is just too  pretentious. Just as a warning to all Brazilian music lovers out there:  this is certainly not a must have, apart from die hard Milton fans. I would  rather recommend to check out the latest releases by fellow Brazilian  Caetano Veloso (&quot;Livro&quot; and &quot;Prenda Minha&quot;), because  they are really indispensable</review_text>
I remember when this recording came out and Wynton Marsalis was being hailed as the second coming of jazz. I picked it up right away. I was mystified by the souless mimicry of Art Blakey's Jazz Messengers and Miles' 2nd great quintet--this punk was supposed to be the savior of jazz? Listen as Wynton negotiates technically difficult arrangements, stopping on a dime! Marvel at his ability to explore the full range of dynamics within two bars!! Gape in wonder at the fussy arrangement of Think of One that strips the tune of any semblence of swing!!! I get it, Wynton--you've mastered the trumpet, technically speaking, which is no mean feat. And you can read music. Bully for you. The only trouble is that you have nothing meaningful to say. Ordinarily, I'd feel sorry for you, having wasted all those hours of practice, except that you trashtalk musicians whose dirty drawers you aren't worthy of washing. People like John Coltrane, Joe Zawinul, Miles Davis, Wayne Shorter, Herbie Hancock...I could go on and on, but I think you get the point. This music is jazz by and for people who think that the best way to honor the past is to preserve it like a roach in amber, thus killing it.</review_text>
My wife got this CD for me because I like the music from the movie Cast Away.  She saw the words &quot;Cast Away&quot; in large and prominent print.  She saw the picture of Tom Hanks, very large.  She assumed it was the soundtrack for the movie and not just the 10th track of 10 on  the CD.  In hindsight she should have read the entire panel on the CD.  I guess the producers of this CD didn't think the rest of the music could stand on its own and so they deceptively packaged it this way figuring most people wouldn't waste time returning it.  If you had it listed in the rate column, I would give it a negative rating instead of just the one star</review_text>
sinceramente, no puedo entender la devocion de muchas perosnas, incluso renombrados artistas, hacia este musico... ungido de la leyenda GRAPE, amparado en el descontrol y la libertad absoluta que encierra la locura, esta coleccion de temas no genera mas que sentimientos encontrados..lastima, piedad, curiosidad...no se , me genera igual sensacion que muchos discos de erickson (13th.....).. en ningun momento se me revela como la creacion de un genio.. en fin, son opiniones, nada mas.</review_text>
Great fan of the man they call 'Sugar' Zucchero, but this outing is really below par. This CD consists of rerecordings of older songs, with the addition of other famous singers. Did he send the original recordings to these people, en did they ad little pieces here and there? It sounds like it! None of the songs have gotten' better compared to the originals.To me this cd is a total rip off intended to make easy money (and get more attention for 'Sugar' outside of Italy?). Don't buy it, get 'Oro', 'Shake' or 'Blue Sugar' instead</review_text>
This cd is, without a doubt amazing.  Stars are lost because prior to recording, you would think the guitarist would invest in a damn NOISE GATE for his guitar rig.  His tone is crushing & sounds perfect, but the second he stops playing, every time SSSSQQQQQQUUUUEEEAAAALLLLL.  It's annoying to the point of only being able to tolerate so many songs at once, because it is a chronic problem in every song.</review_text>
This album bores me out of my mind. Only two decent tracks: Bad boys and Bonnie and Clyde. And I'm no avid radio listener. BET and MTV actually hit the nail on the head with these tracks. So i guess they good for somethin</review_text>
id advise not to buy the album.  listening to it is like contacting gonorrhea.  trust me ive done both</review_text>
When I first saw this album I thought "Heavy D....WITHOUT The Boyz?!  That can't be a good thing."  Here's the problem with this album: Heavy D took the "jiggy" route.  When I heard "Big Daddy" for the first time, I thought it was pretty tight and that it had that Heavy D feel to it.  So after hearing that, I went and copped the disc.  When I got home and read the liner notes, my jaw hit the floor.  There was Heavy D....smoking cigars, iced out, and playing the big willie role (the popular theme for the "jiggy" crowd in '97).  At that point, I realized that original MCs were quickly becoming extinct.  After years of success with his group, Heavy D had jumped the fence while simultaneously alienating his fan base all at the same time.  That might not have been such a bad thing had this album been at least somewhat decent.  There are about three tracks on the entire album that are even worth a listen.  There's a lot of lazy and predictable production (we're talking obscene amounts of beat jacking).  On "I'll Do Anything" Heavy D and Tony Dofat COMPLETELY jacked Hall & Oates for their tune "I Can't Go For That (No Can Do)" and it only gets worse throughout the album (I won't even get into how the Gap Band's "Yearnin' For Your Love" was abused on "Keep It Comin'").  There aren't enough good songs on this album to make Heavy's change of heart seem very believable.Avoid this album y'all.  It's not completely terrible, but it comes dangerously close.  There are songs that border on wack and there are songs that are completely wack.  Sadly enough, this can be said for the majority of the songs on this album.  I was very disappointed in Heavy D and lost a little respect for him after hearing this.  I can only reccomend buying this if you can find it used for less than $3.00.  Otherwise, avoid at all costs.Standout Tracks: Big Daddy (My Favorite) and "You Can Get It" feat. The Lost Boyz & Soul For Rea</review_text>
Aerosmith were one of the worst most annoying bands of all time. They only made 3 decent songs in Same old song and Dance, Seasons of wither, and Janies got a gun. Rest of the songs just stink explosively. Avoid most albums from this hugely overrated band, steven tyler screams, he can't sing at all??? this is music for drug addicts</review_text>
(it?)I have many of David and Japan's albums, but this thinly composed album is repetitive, boring and annoying. I think there were some hidden tracks too, but I just wanted the album to be over. You are better off with "Dead Bees on a Cake" , "Secrets of the Beehive" or any bee related titled album of his</review_text>
As you might think, I am not a die hard fan of JMJ, I think that when only die hard fans rates an album, it makes you think that with such a high rating, everybody should love this album and this is not the thruth.Not everybody like this king of musical experimentation, some do but some don't...I like Oxygene and Equinoxe, and even after all those years, they are still good to listen too.  Rendez vous offers some really good moments, but we are far from the perfection as Oxygene or Equinoxe. Rendez-vous is easier to get use to that Zoolook is, but we are far from a near perfect album.  That's all</review_text>
The CD came without a CD case and the CD did not play.  I am very disappointed</review_text>
this cd isnt real good if you like compilations than get the ruff ryders c</review_text>
Listening to this C.D. first gave me a headache, then it made my stomache churn. It is SO uninspired, it's not even funny (or listenable). Yeah, it's loud, but I can be loud, too, if I had some pots and pans and a "guitar." Don't get this, it's nothing but d-r-i-v-e-l</review_text>
If I can't buy the cd with ALL THE SONGS that were played in the movie then I won't buy it. I know one cd could cover the entire movie so why can't this be done? Does it concern copy rights and releases</review_text>
Rhymefest is an Ok rapper and the first two joints are bumping. Man, I thought I was in for a classic hip hop album , It was like the Lakers wereahead by 30 points then all of a sudden the other team caught up and eventually won the game because after that it was just wack track after wack track. I admire his thought provoking lyrics but if the beat ain't hittin I could care less what you're rapping about. Rhymefest used so many R&B singers I thought I was listening to some old New Edition or After 7 joints not that I don't like those singers but I don't want to hear that on no hip hop album. If you want to hear some real Chicago hip hop check out All Natural the best besides Common to ever come from the city of wind</review_text>
I love plenty of Contemporary Country music... everything from "New Bluegrass" (Alison Krauss & Union Station) to "New Country" like Reba McEntire, Rascal Flatts, Brad Paisley, Martina... even a lot of Faith & Shania.But I think this CD is crap.The single star is for the only good song on the album, "Heads Carolina, Tails California" -- but really, 1 star for one good song out of ten is a bit too generous.  I'm astounded at how bad the other 9 songs are... elementary-school rhyming, uninspired melody lines, stupid lyrics, below-average accompaniment, etc.One of the most annoying things to me is her habit of overpronnouncing every word in a song... I'd guess someone told her at some point that she slurs her words, and she was trying to overcompensate.  The result should be titled "Hooked on Phonics, starring JoDee Messina."  Listen to the preview of "On a Wing and a Prayer" for a good example of what I'm talking about.I thank my lucky stars I borrowed this cotton candy from the library, rather than shelling out $16 for one song.  Do yourself a favor and buy "Heads Carolina, Tails California" online if you must have it</review_text>
This is by far the WORST KMFDM RELEASE... No Esch, No Schulz, just Sascha and Skold messin around with a little Pig..   At first listen this album is not bad but once you get used to it, this album is really boring..  Dirty, Skurk, and Preach/Pervert are really the only songs worth listening to.  I was embarrased to listen to "Risen". It was just lyrically horrible I don't know what's wrong with them.  Now in Skold's defense, he is a badass, his voice is cool and he's a good writer his solo album is good.  But we had him in Symbols, Adios, MDFMK, and Attak it was just a bit much. This album is bland at times good and most times pretty bland.  Not what you think when you think KMFDM, though Urban Monkey Warfare is still cool... whatever I am one guy buty it, if you like awesome, if not sorry..</review_text>
This whole post crap grunge is crap.  If you want real rock check out GNR, ACDC, and any band pre grunge.  I know this is a review but how does this grab ya. Oh and I won't mention the thousands of stupid bands that sing like their trying to go to go to the bathroom. &quot;Oh how did we wind up like this?&quot;  Exactly what I'm trying to figure out.  Tesla's got more talent then all these bands and they can't get any airplay give me a break</review_text>
I'm not exactly sure how to classify this, nor do I think it really deserves the time.  How this album has garnered so many positive reviews is beyond me.  My only guess is that some tired, pretentious teen on MySpace raved over it and voila, the clique was born.Now, I really wanted to like this and gave it numerous listens.  But each time, it sounds more and more like these guys were just doing some busy work around the house, started humming some melodies and then recorded them.  Immature and pretty much unoriginal.  And just because an album is labeled "concept" doesn't automatically qualify it as a masterpiece.  If you want a flawless concept album that actually has an interesting story just go and buy "The Wall".  Unless your circle of friends has threatened to emascualte you for not owning this, don't bother with this bloat.</review_text>
The singing is terrible on "Fly Me To The Moon".  Don't take my word for it.  Listen to the free sample supplied by Amazon.com .  At 16 seconds into it, when she sings "all I worship and adore", she goes almost a whole note sharp for several notes!  Even someone with no musical training can hear it.The rest of the pieces sound fine</review_text>
OK - let me preface my comments by justifying the 2-star rating...It's Rodney Dangerfield - he was a class act.  As for the CD:  If you're looking for a few songs by a comedian accompanied by someone's cheesy clavinova, then this CD is for you.  I bought this because of the last track, "Rappin' Rodney", and boy was I disappointed. It sounds like it was recorded from an old worn out cassette.  Do yourself a favor - get all of Rodney's DVD's with his standup material and remember him for what he was - a comedy legend</review_text>
I received this 2CD set in the mail and was horrified at the sound quality of the so called "mastering".  I have original un-mastered copies of some REO Speedwagon albums that sound BETTER than this set!  I love REO to death and the track listing is good to go, but in all honesty, this compilation falls flat on its face in regards to sound quality.  The band seriously needs to find a good remasterer and give the fans what they have been waiting for.  I cannot recommend any previous greatest hits releases that even come close.  Save your money and wait</review_text>
Hysteria.**I see great polarities in the reviews of this record. I fall in the camp that sees this as a overproduced microtargeted superficial pop record designed for radio and MTV. I consider that shrewd writing & marketing. Brilliance is a term I'll reserve for Led Zeppelin.I tend to like my rock harder, with two arms and less cheesy. Sadly, this record doesn't fit the bill. For that, Pete Willis era Def Leppard suits me much better.I don't need to give you a song breakdown by breakdown. The important factor here is what you enjoy. If you enjoy superficial 1980s MTV pop or mindblowing heavy rock - that distinction will determine your opinion here. This album is definetly the former.I'll beg to differ with the Amazon reviewer - it *DOES* sound dated. Its a record thats signifigant for its hype. When listened for its depth. It is symbolic of the later part of the decade which it was released.Prepare to be transported back to the spandex era on plopping this disc in</review_text>
Most of these idiot reviewers are missing the fact that this CD is missing lot of songs which define Extreme.  The implication that it is a &quot;Best of&quot; and not a &quot;Greatest Hits&quot; should have included more from their self-titled album.  Tsk-tsk, this doesn't include &quot;Mutha (Don't Wanna Go to School Today)&quot;, how can that be</review_text>
Oh man, this sucks really bad. Good thing nu-metal is dead. THRASH METAL IS REAL METAL, this is for posers</review_text>
There's always the argument that if Bach had had a modern piano, he would have composed for it. Let's consider another possibility: if some style-insensitive time machine had delivered a piano to Bach's doorstep, he might have tried it out and rejected it as a bad idea, since it so obviously fails to serve the paramount musical ideals that inspired the High Baroque composers.For listeners who understand what Bach meant by equal temperament, it's worth noting that the standard temperament of the modern piano bears no close connection to what Bach was trying to demonstrate in these "pedagogical" compositions. In other words, the point is lost.</review_text>
To much guitar, drowns out all the other instruments.  Survivor was made famous by heavy keyboards and drums, not guitars.  I was expecting another Burning Heart, Is this Love, High on you.  No songs on this albums have that sound.  The vocals by Jamison are top notch, but none of the songs sound like the Survivor I remember.  Survivor guitars were only there to complement the keyboards, bass and drums, not drive the whole song. I guess Jim Peterik was the man behind Survivor all along.  I give the CD 2 stars for Fire makes Steel, the rest are throw aways.  ***Recommended for die hards only*** I highly recommend 'When Seconds Count' for anyone getting started with Survivor</review_text>
If you are short on money, do not buy this C.D.  You will regret it.  However if you are trying to get rid of a gift voucher or something side one is really good, especially the Dr. Evil &quot;just the two of us&quot;.   Really this is not a good album, as side two is rubbish.  I still haven't  listened to it all the way throug</review_text>
When John Cipollina was in the lineup and he and rhythm guitarist Gary Duncan were in the groove, there was no better sounding group than QMS. Cipollina's talent was awe inspiring. Unfortunately, one of Quicksilver's overbearing and domineering members ways led to Cipollina's departure. Without Cipollina, QMS sounded like just another mediocre rock group, despite the talents of Duncan, Freiberg and Elmore. I saw them at the Hollywood Palladium 33 years ago and can verify this.If you want to hear them at their best, buy the 1st album, Happy Trails, or Lost Gold and Silver</review_text>
Yes, she has a great voice, but this entire CD is so overproduced, so lifeless, so very boring that I had to force myself to listen to the entire thing - searching desperately for a track that measures up to the voice. She sounds as bored as I was on every song. I hope she wakes up soon before we all fall asleep</review_text>
Nana has a beautiful voice, but her singing is monotonous, predictable.  She lacks passion. Sometimes you feel she is reading the lyrics instead of  really interpreting the song. In addition to this, the arrangements are  unfortunately very poor. Her soprano range deserves a proper orchestra.  Only love could be the perfect background music for a romantic dinner with  candles, but this is not the album I would like to listen to again and  again</review_text>
As a Gene Autry fan, particularly of his Christmas recordings, I was really looking forward to this release.  But...what a disappointment!  I will look over the dropouts - obviously the source tapes have deteriorated - but what happened to the final three cuts?  They are so laden with noise reduction artifacts that they are barely listenable.  And, I know the disc is short, but were the 2 second pauses between tracks REALLY necessary?  Talk about choppy. No flow at all.This CD did make me do one thing...go back into my archives and pull out my original Grand Prix vinyl.  I think I'll be doing a transfer and retire this CD to the bottom shelf.</review_text>
Blues singers shouldn't try to go mainstream. If they do try and succeed, fine. That means they've stayed true to their roots. When they try and fail (as Susan has done with Hope and Desire), one would hope they'd try to get back to where they started. For me that was Just Won't Burn. I guess when one is happily married with children, it's hard to sing the blues since you're not feeling them . . . you're faking them</review_text>
Gonzalo is a fantastic pianist.  This CD however is meant to capture his more thoughtful and sensitive side.  However, it is languid and the tunes don't stand out.  It is hard to tell if track 2 is really track 4 as the plodding bass and minimalist approach on piano make for sleepy moments - if driving later in the day.  I have heard him with fire and brimstone and sometimes it goes over the edge of taste.  But it is exciting.  Not here.  There is barely a hint of any Cuban influence in this music as well.  Now some will like the gentleness I suppose, but with weak material and not much diversity, it sits pretty flat with me</review_text>
Will not run on my computer... love the content however I keep my music on my hard drive and was looking forward to working out with this album on my MP3.  I will be demanding a refund!  DO NOT BUY if you have a MP3 supported car stereo, if you plan on playing at your computer.. IT WILL NOT WORK DUE TO ILL CONCEIVED PIRACY PROTECTION!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
Not his best stuff. He's running short of lyrical ideas, he recycles his own lines, like Star Wars recycles "I have a bad feeling about this".Beats are usually cool, I don't care for the popish tracks with the singing. I didn't mind it so much when he sang REALLY BAD back on his first album, but now it's no longer funny, it sounds like pop.Anyhow, organized religion is crap. I thought KRS understood this back in the day. What happened? Now he's got his own little organization and his own little phylosophy, and his only little diciples and crap, I dunno, it's posative, but then again it's gay like some of his modern tracks.Anyhow it is cheap, if you have to finish off your collection as I do, then buy it, otherwise go buy his anything BoomBap on back. Or check out:Kool KeithEl-PGang StarrMr. LifJedi Miind TricksPublic EnemyNon PhixionSir MenelikMost of which is better than KRS' latest works</review_text>
